_	In another departure from the small engine policy, several 2-6-0+0-6-2 Beyer-Garratts were acquired for the Toton-Brent coal trains but interference from Derby saw these receive standard small axle-boxes and short-travel valves with the result that they were poor performers.
_	Like Mecca, the city of Medina only permits Muslims to enter, although the haram (area closed to non-Muslims) of Medina is much smaller than that of Mecca, with the result that many facilities on the outskirts of Medina are open to non-Muslims, whereas in Mecca the area closed to non-Muslims extends well beyond the limits of the built-up area.
_	Unfortunately, the commander of the prize crew hoisted too much sail with the result that "Dorade" overturned, drowning all 19 members of the prize crew.
_	In the Lagrangian framework, of course the result that the corresponding momentum is conserved still follows immediately, but all the generalized velocities still occur in the Lagrangian - we still have to solve a system of equations in n coordinates.
_	is a conduit metaphor asserting that ideas are in words, which are on pages, which are in books, which are in libraries—with the result that "ideas are in libraries."
_	The Schrödinger perturbation theory for two interacting atoms at a separation "R", large compared to the radii of the atoms, leads to the result that the charge distribution of each is distorted from central
_	This was primarily because of Glen Canyon's remote location and the result that most of the American public did not even know of the existence of the impressive gorge; the few who did contended that it had much greater scenic value than Echo Park.
_	The control system caused the stage to rotate uncontrollably with the result that the propellants were pushed to the outer edge of the tanks by centrifugal force and could not drain down into the fuel feed lines properly.
_	These presentations contained a very great number of random image sequences and continuities, with the result that none of the performances were alike.
_	Because the island is small and flat, only 200 islanders have taken out the special licence allowing them to keep their own car, with the result that the few streets are virtually car-free.
_	That day she sighted five French luggers and sailed towards them, but they dispersed and ran inshore, with the result that she lost them.
_	Stephenson had resolutely refused to deviate from his preferred track gauge with the result that one side of the railway line, which had already been laid down, had to be relayed slightly more than half an inch further from the other rail than previously, in order to provide for compatibility with the "Adler" (locomotive).
_	Henceforth, Testi's career took him on a long series of travels of a diplomatic nature, notably to Vienna, Rome, Venice and Turin, with the result that in April 1635 he was awarded a feudal demesne that brought him the title of "conte"
_	Despite military stationing, incidents went on whenever or wherever least opportunity was available with the result that curfew was enforced in the area from June 7, 1985.
_	The brothers had earlier founded the Ganong confectionery company and in 1884 dissolved their partnerships with the result that James became sole proprietor of the soap making business.
_	New opportunities for engaging in volunteerism are opening up with the result that more people are becoming involved and those already participating can expand their commitment.
_	This necessitated the construction of new residential areas, with the result that Heerlen & Hoensbroek grew closer to each other.
_	He instilled the fear of God into us, with the result that fear remained the only emotion that the heart felt for the Creator.
_	Water had seeped into the viaduct for decades, weakening the bricks, and the oak pilings that supported it were beginning to rot, with the result that the entire structure was gradually settling.
_	Cricket mirrored social change and there was a parallel evolution with the result that cricket-related violence became less frequent.
_	Wing deliberately beached her, with the result that no lives were lost, and most of her cargo was salvaged.
_	He therefore marries Rosamond Vincy, "the woman in the novel who most contrasts with Dorothea", with the result that he "deteriorates from ardent researcher to fashionable doctor in London".
_	Also, Hudson related that when he pulled Doris Day out of bed, he forgot to let go of her ankles “…with the result that my leading lady crashed to the floor.”
_	Up until the end of 1991, over $1.4 million was spent under the phasing down policy, with the result that the population of Wittenoom fell from over 90 in May 1984 to about 45 in March 1992.
_	"Compas", which was armed "en flute", put up resistance for about 20 minutes, with the result that she suffered nine men killed and wounded before she struck.
_	Insufficient venous return results in increased pressure in the capillaries with the result that both fluid and cells may "leak" out of the capillaries.
_	The village, however, was further north than anticipated, with the result that only Captain James Egan's 2nd Cavalry Company K of 47 men, accompanied by Second Lieutenant John G. Bourke and newspaper reporter Robert Edmund Strahorn, charged into the village from the south, while the other companies were delayed by the distance and rough terrain.
_	As Sibelius had barely completed the piece in time for the premiere, Nováček had insufficient time to prepare with the result that the performance was a disaster.
_	They encounter two members of the Loop Gang and befriend them, with the result that they get to meet their boss, Angles Carson (Mickey Knox).
_	Amtrak did not retain either train in 1971preferring the "Empire Builder" for Chicago–Pacific Northwest servicewith the result that train travel between the Pacific Northwest and Denver required either going west to California or east to Chicago.
_	A study of singleton live births came to the result that childbirth has a standard deviation of 14 days when gestational age is estimated by first trimester ultrasound, and 16 days when estimated directly by last menstrual period.
_	In his interview with "Metal Forces", Walkyier said that "having been told of the preparations he must undergo before meeting the spirits, Brand deviates from this with the result that the spirits come too soon."
_	The South African Defence Force's increasing involvement in the Border War from the mid-1970s produced an increased demand for junior officers, with the result that the Defence Force decided that junior officers should be "task qualified" within their respective services before becoming eligible for admission to the Military Academy.
_	A cohort study came to the result that women with a time interval from LEEP to pregnancy of less than 12 months compared with 12 months or more were at significantly increased risk for spontaneous abortion, with risk of miscarriage of 18% compared with 4.6%, respectively.
_	In early 1947 a Reorganization of New Zealand Military Forces removed the distinction between Regular and non-Regular soldiers, with the result that the Territorial Force New Zealand Ordnance Corps (NZOC), ceased to be a separate Corps, becoming part of the NZAOC.
_	According to some observers, "improvements in government policies and programs in income support payments, and services such as education, health, public housing and child care, and the progressive nature of the income tax system, have all contributed to the result that Australia appears to have become a more equal society over the period from 1981/82 to 1993/94".
_	However, the Environment Agency have modified the upstream lock gate, in order to improve flood control, with the result that the headroom below the guillotine gate is too low for boats to enter the lode.
_	By the rules of the limited voting system for the at-large seats, each political party could nominate five candidates and voters could only vote for five, with the result that the majority party could only take five of the seven seats, leaving two for the minority party.
_	Feigning drunkenness one night, she gets André to help her to her bedroom and undress her, with the result that he marries her.
_	His veterinary practice is based in his home, with the result that he finds it impossible to escape the dual pressures of fatherhood and running his business.
_	"dentata") was described, with the result that "Caladenia leptochila" subsp.
_	Tiphupa intensively practiced the methods taught by Marpa and others, and methods he received in India from Naropa’s students and other masters with the result that he reached realization as a mahasiddha.
_	While Stoltenberg was Prime Minister, Norway's defence spending increased steadily, with the result that Norway today is one of the NATO allies with the highest per capita defence expenditure.
_	Over time, as the suburbs of Liverpool grew, the brook came to receive much of the sewage of the township of West Derby, with the result that it became highly polluted.
_	In the summer of 1985, however, Waller finally got the better of Tommy when he managed to persuade the local council that Barnes United had disbanded, with the result that the council gave the use of their pitch to a girls' hockey team.
_	With this physiologic destructive process, the maternal blood vessels of the endometrium are opened, with the result that the spaces in the trophoblastic network are filled with maternal blood; these spaces communicate freely with one another and become greatly distended and form the intervillous space from which the fetus gains nutrition.
_	In June Gentile and Nicola Gallo were denounced and tried for heresy and blasphemy by Calvin himself with the result that Gentile was sentenced to beheading.
_	The final partition line ('Radcliffe Line') eventually confirmed Wavell's division of the district, with the result that Batala became part of India.
_	In addition, Graves followed the BLNFS order of ogham letters put forward by Macalister (see above), with the result that this has been taken up by New Age and Neopagan writers as the 'correct' order of the letters, despite its rejection by scholars.
_	The town suffered from a significant fire that raged through the town centre on 15 March 1725, with the result that many of the main streets of the town were destroyed including Castle Street, Castle Hill and the north side of Market Hill.
_	Unfortunately, the above definitions have the result that two sentences/sentence-tokens which have the same meaning and thus express the same proposition could have different truth-values, e.g. "I am Spartacus" said by Spartacus and said by John Smith; and e.g.
_	Reporters without Borders further noted in its report on the murder that “Zacatecas is notorious as a drug-trafficking hub” where “Journalists are under constant pressure from both organized crime and the local authorities, with the result that censorship or self-censorship is common.”
_	The north-eastern entrance was widened at this time, with the result that it precisely matched the direction of the midsummer sunrise and midwinter sunset of the period.
_	Localities in China have assumed much of the responsibility for identifying heritage sites, with the result that 300,000 such sites have been declared, many without state protection and support.
_	Translators whose work has had very significant cultural effect include Al-Ḥajjāj ibn Yūsuf ibn Maṭar, who translated "Elements" from Greek into Arabic and Jean-François Champollion, who deciphered Egyptian hieroglyphs with the result that he could publish the first translation of the Rosetta Stone hieroglyphs in 1822.
_	This would have caused her to take the sea on her port beam with the result that she got sufficiently off her course to strike a sandbank thereby causing her to founder between the Bar lightship and the Q1 buoy, sinking in the Mersey approach channel (at ).
_	Lengthy negotiations between the Council and James Anderson Mowbray, Thomas's son, were undertaken in 1903, with the result that Mowbray offered portions 48–50, parish of South Brisbane, to the Council for , and assisted in its purchase with a mortgage.
_	Another issue was that the main RAM was used to store the screen display, with the result that the available screen size would gradually decrease as the size of a program increased (and vice versa); with 1 KB RAM, running a 990 byte program would result in only one row of characters being visible on the screen; a full screen (32×24) would leave only 384 bytes to the programmer.
_	Major issues like housing, transportation, sanitation, and health care have been addressed and improved greatly by the government by introducing various development programs, with the result that pilgrims now enjoy modern facilities and perform various rites at ease.
_	For example, PTSD is diagnosed based on 17 major symptoms (e.g., flashbacks, startling, nightmares, fears), but these often are placed on attorneys' websites under clear headings such as, "Do you have these symptoms of PTSD?", with the result that plaintiffs can be coached all the easier in how to present with this disorder.
_	The Japanese had not expected to capture Singapore and were therefore unprepared to run the city, with the result that Charles continued in the fire brigade for some months.
_	He not only gave the manor of Titchfield itself but also extensive lands dotted around Hampshire, and this property was expanded by major grants from local aristocrats and King Henry III (who also granted the monastery important legal privileges in 1231), with the result that Titchfield was placed on a firm financial footing from the beginning.
_	He also thought the novel's "allegorical significance" weak, with the result that it "starts out superbly, trumpets blaring and banners flying," but "peters out sadly."
_	The Genie has a major supporting role in the "Aladdin" television series, although his contributions are sometimes limited; as an apparent side-effect of being freed from the lamp, his powers have been downgraded from his original 'phenomenal cosmic powers' to 'semi-phenomenal, nearly cosmic powers', with the result that the once-omnipotent Genie is now incapable of undoing some of the spells he is confronted with and lacks some degree of his old intellect.
_	Only much later did this skill obtain official recognition, with the result that it eventually spread throughout the armed forces.
_	Born in Bloomsbury in London, England, he never knew his father – who was killed during the First World War – and when he was six his mother died as a result of having a botched abortion, with the result that Chilton was brought up by his grandmother.
_	The psychology of artists and other highly creative people has been studied from the diagnostic perspective of "DSM's" psychiatric classification of mental disorders, with the result that some outstanding creative individuals may be considered to have various degrees of psychopathology.
_	He is known as "Prince Yuki" and "Prince Charming" at school, where he has a fan club headed by Motoko Minagawa that tries to "protect" him from other admirers, with the result that Yuki is further isolated, and he is pressured by his popularity to become president of the student council despite his misgivings.
_	In the late 1990s, the Forest Service began consolidation of many ranger stations, with the result that Forest Service jobs moved to the town of Randle and the new Cowlitz Valley Ranger Station.
_	Contacts are often made by depositing the transition metal and forming the silicide by annealing with the result that the silicide may be non-stoichiometric.
_	There was a large demand for Canadian white pine, oak, and elm, both in European and America, with the result that lumber prices were high.
_	At the time, the band was in the midst of legal disputes with their manager, Matthew Katz, with the result that certain songs written by band members were instead credited to their road manager, Tim Dell'Ara.
_	In the event, the DUP and UUP both fielded candidates which split the vote, while the nationalist vote mainly went for the SDLP over Sinn Féin, with the result that the SDLP took the seat despite a majority of votes cast for unionist candidates.
_	At the 1660 Restoration, the Commonwealth era was obliterated from the legal record, with the result that Charles II's regnal years officially begin on January 30, 1649 (the death date of Charles I).
_	The Marshall takeover also meant that a number of excellent sales people joined Wilsons with the result that overall growth increased.
_	If that work is not done, price information would not be available, with the result that the trading process would become difficult or impossible to operate.
_	His subsequent publications caught the attention of the railway ministry, with the result that Karl Gölsdorf recruited him to the ministry, where he worked as a design engineer.
_	A study of the United States and multiple countries in Europe came to the result that women who continue to cohabit after birth have significantly lower probability of having a second child than married women in all countries except those in Eastern Europe.
_	Another study, on the contrary, came to the result that cohabiting couples in France have equal fertility as married ones.
_	On the other hand, during Hill's observation of chloroplasts placed under dark conditions and in the absence of CO the artificial electron acceptor was oxidized but not reduced, terminating the process, with the result that there was also no production of oxygen and sugar.
_	These problems were not resolved by the sale to McCaffrey, who did not even have enough money to pay for circulation postage, with the result that not every "Galaxy" subscriber received a copy of the final issue.
_	A study in France came to the result that employment instability has a strong and persistent negative effect on the final number of children for both men and women and contributes to fertility postponement for men.
_	It also came to the result that employment instability has a negative influence on fertility among those with more egalitarian views about the division of labor but still a positive influence for women with more traditional views.
_	From this time on, the jaw of the fetus grows as it would normally, with the result that, when born, the jaw of the baby is much smaller (micrognathia) than it would have been with normal development, although it does continue to grow at a normal rate until the child reaches maturity.
_	According to Transparency International, Argentina has sufficient legislation and institutions dedicated to the prosecution of corruption in the public sector, but enforcement is highly inadequate, with the result that "impunity continues to trump integrity."
_	Charles had fought from August, 1642, to March, 1646, with the result that the Parliament only had to reduce the few strongholds that still held out for him.
_	Regarding cohabitation as a fertility factor, a large survey in the United States came to the result that married women had an average of 1.9 children, compared to 1.3 among those cohabiting.
_	In 2011, it was estimated that at current production levels there was only enough ragstone left in the quarry for another four years' quarrying, with the result that new sources of production were sought.
_	which again gives the result that "TSS" = "ESS" + "RSS" if and only if formula_28.
_	Thomas Breeds, another prominent local man, applied to the High Court of Chancery arguing that the funds were being improperly administered, with the result that he himself rented them for £210, no higher bid being received at a public auction.
_	The expenses of the case were paid by the funds, with the result that the Saunders school had to close for five years, but afterwards two separate masters were appointed.
_	He gained the patronage of William IV for his son George, with the result that the latter was admitted to St Paul's School in 1833 at the request of the monarch.
_	The joint judgement of Kiefel CJ, Bell and Keane JJ noted that all 9 charges laid under the "Protesters Act" were discontinued "because the direction given was not correctly referable to 'business premises' or a 'business access area.'", with the result that "some lawful protests will be prevented or discontinued and protesters will be deterred from further protesting."
_	In statistics, a misleading graph, also known as a distorted graph, is a graph that misrepresents data, constituting a misuse of statistics and with the result that an incorrect conclusion may be derived from it.
_	In July 2018, the crisis was cited by the junta to amend laws, with the result that the monastic community could no longer choose their own leading council members, but these were to be chosen by the Thai King, and possibly the ruling NCPO.
_	If rather than 365 days there are , if there are persons, and if , then using the same approach as above we achieve the result that if is the probability that at least two out of people share the same birthday from a set of available days, then:
_	"In February, 1885, the Reverend C. G. O'Keeffe of New York, while visiting Nassau, organized the few Catholics, with the result that on 25 August 1885, the cornerstone of the first Catholic Church in the Bahamas was laid by Georgina Ayde-Curran, wife of Surgeon Major Ayde-Curran of the British Army.
_	They all agreed on a Cold War consensus to the effect that all good Americans were ideologically united, with the result that potentially divisive civil rights issues were not emphasized.
_	The LNWR reused names and numbers from withdrawn locomotives, with the result that the numbering system was completely haphazard.
_	The term "progressive" refers to the way the tax rate progresses from low to high, with the result that a taxpayer's average tax rate is less than the person's marginal tax rate.
_	Charleston was more used to hurricanes; historical preservation groups immediately stepped in to begin salvage and reconstruction, with the result that one year after Hugo, the city was virtually returned to normal.
_	Due to the location of the field in an ecologically sensitive area, hydrographic, hydrodynamic and meteorological studies modelling storm, wave and ice-flow conditions were done, with the result that an artificial island holding a drilling and production facility was built in 1985.
_	On this account Boeke defines a dual society as a society where "one of the two prevailing social systems, as a matter of fact always the most advanced, will have been imported from abroad and have gained its existence in the new environment without being able to oust or assimilate the divergent social system that has grown up there, with the result that neither of them becomes general and characteristic for that society as a whole."
_	Sometimes this is as simple as eliminating the result that makes no physical sense (a negative surface energy) or the result that is clearly incorrect by virtue of being many orders of magnitude larger or smaller than it should be.
_	The attempt was abandoned in the 1990s with the result that the political leadership within the state are also the leaders of the party.
_	Parker also appealed to Lord-chancellor Nicholas Bacon, as did the Duke of Norfolk, with the result that, after some delay, Walker was installed a canon of Norwich on 20 December 1569.
_	Changing sides in 1805, he fought for Napoleon, with the result that, by the peace of Pressburg in that year, he obtained the Breisgau and other territories at the expense of the Habsburgs (see Further Austria).
_	Inadvertently (as described in a piece called "A Movie" by Stein), he and Moallic apparently contributed to the arrest of U.S. Army thieves, with the result that they were invited to ride (together, in their Renault) in the famous victory parade through the Arc de Triomphe in July 1919.
_	By deliberately bowling wide, Lambert caused Beauclerk to lose both his temper and his wicket with the result that Lambert won the match by 15 runs.
_	The band, originally called 'Vent', started to collaborate in December 1994, and received considerable media attention, mostly because of the presence of Hunt, with the result that they were invited to produce a session for Radio 1 before they had recorded anything at all.
_	This uplift caused the plain above which the hills now rise to be elevated, with the result that rivers flowing to the north and south eroded most of the softer sediments onto the lower part of the Great Plains.
_	He started out in engineering science on a scholarship at the University of Toronto, but then became preoccupied with existential questions, leading him into unconventional areas of study, with the result that he graduated in 1974 with an interdisciplinary BSc.
_	The strong prevailing south-east wind of summer (October to April), being off-shore, moves the warmer top layer of water out of the bay – with the result that a compensating strong inflow of icy cold water is set up into the bay.
_	Although Maria's uncle saved Wolfe's life in a shootout at Cetinje fifty years earlier, a love triangle also developed between Wolfe, Milos, and Alexandra, with the result that Wolfe and Stefanović have had no contact for many years even though they have been living in the same borough for the past few years.
_	Siddeley was itself bought by the now cash-flush Rolls, with the result that there was only one engine company in England.
_	Potential difficulties with primary sources have the result that history is usually taught in schools using secondary sources.
_	Because vagrants can not "enter any one spike, or any two London spikes, more than once in a month, on pain of being confined for a week," he is required to keep on the move, with the result that long hours are spent tramping or waiting for hostels to open.
_	In 1493, he refuted the accusations that the majordomo of Ferdinand II of Aragon made against Pope Alexander VI, with the result that the pope made him papal secretary on December 25, 1493.
_	All participants in the study were tested blind with the result that they did not discover whether they were gifted or not.
_	Any timbers needed for architectural and shipbuilding use were imported from the mainland, with the result that most Nantucket whaling, fishing, and maritime trade was carried on in vessels purchased from shipbuilders elsewhere in New England.
_	Most proprietors took this option, with the result that the capital was little increased.
_	After the Franco-Prussian War, the numbers of troops in the Field Artillery increased substantially, with the result that the two large previously existing bands, the RA Band, and the RA Brass Band, because they were dismounted, found themselves without duty.
_	In the early stages of Alzheimer's disease, whose symptoms of dementia are called "mild cognitive impairment", the person typically loses 8 to 10 IQ points per year, with the result that a person of previously normal intelligence usually becomes intellectually disabled in less than five years.
_	He founded several monasteries, as did Bishop Emmeran of Poitiers, with the result that before long, most of the people professed Christianity and relations commenced between Bavaria and Rome.
_	Bill Price himself wrote on this issue "Careful consideration was given to the existing specification with the result that we decided to list the 16-valve Sprint cylinder head to enable us to virtually transplant the Sprint rally engine into the car.
_	With Shankar's segments having been poorly received, Harrison then reworked the show's setlist, with the result that "The Lord Loves the One" and another "Material World" track, "Who Can See It", were dropped for the rest of the tour.
_	The answer may lie in the fact that the criticism by Ravad undermined confidence in Maimonides' work, while Isserles (who actually corresponded with Karo) does not simply criticize, but supplements Karo's work extensively, with the result that the Ashkenazim then accepted the "Shulchan Aruch", assuming that together with Isserles' glosses it was a reliable authority.
_	However, in that same year the collection "Heavy Hitters", a set of covers featuring Schenker and a revolving group of heavy metal all-stars, was marketed as a Michael Schenker Group album, with the result that Schenker only received a flat fee.
_	A few members of the team did not hide their innermost feelings, with the result that Hutton came under severe criticism, although his behaviour was blameless."
_	Unfortunately, it quickly transpired that, under the effects of the enchantment, the two had slept together, with the result that Snow had become pregnant.
_	Lots were given away to every person who would erect a building, with the result that the town grew very rapidly.
_	He has a fan club headed by Matoko Minagawa that tries to "protect" him from other admirers, with the result that Yuki is further isolated.
_	Huey gave the album a rating of five stars and stated that ""Pyromania"s slick, layered Mutt Lange production turned into a painstaking obsession with dense sonic detail on "Hysteria", with the result that some critics dismissed the record as a stiff, mechanized pop sell-out (perhaps due in part to Rick Allen's new, partially electronic drum kit)."
_	As a result of Schellendorf's plan, most of the Ottoman operations were fought in Ottoman territory, with the result that in many cases they directly affected the Empire's own people.
_	Upon joining the company he promoted rapid growth with the result that in 1900 the business owned a total of 24 ships.
_	While the French received all of Artois, England had eliminated the greatest Spanish privateering base with the result that merchant shipping losses were much reduced.
_	Schoenman successfully sued Magee for libel in the UK, with the result that the first printing of the British edition of the book was pulped.
_	The problem is further simplified with the use of group theory and in particular Bloch's theorem, which leads to the result that the energy eigenvalues depend on the crystal momentum formula_1 and are divided into bands.
_	As a direct consequence of the interpretation one usually obtains the result that any recursive function whose totality can be proven either in I or in C is represented by a term of F.
_	In the sacramental union the consecrated bread is united with the body of Christ and the consecrated wine is united with the blood of Christ by virtue of Christ's original institution with the result that anyone eating and drinking these "elements"—the consecrated bread and wine—really eats and drinks the physical body and blood of Christ as well.
_	The series' name deviated as translations were published across Europe, with the result that it is known as "Rick Master" in Germany, "Rik Ringers" in The Netherlands and Flanders, "Riku Oksa" in Finland and "Allan Falk" and "Rick Hart" in Scandinavia.
_	The points at the junction were rigged to the fence, with the result that when the dynamite laden wagon breached the fence, it derailed at the points and spilled its load of dynamite on the ground, where it burned out harmlessly without exploding.
_	As a papal nuncio at Cologne Kaspar was later the zealous servant of the Counter-reformation, which directed its efforts against the Erasmian tendency which Gropper had once represented; with the result that in 1596 Gropper's Enchiridion, "the most detailed and most important pre-Tridentine dogmatic of the Reformation period," was put upon the Index Librorum Prohibitorum.
_	One study comparing a mild treatment (mild ovarian stimulation with GnRH antagonist co-treatment combined with single embryo transfer) to a standard treatment (stimulation with a GnRH agonist long-protocol and transfer of two embryos) came to the result that the proportions of cumulative pregnancies that resulted in term live birth after 1 year were 43.4% with mild treatment and 44.7% with standard treatment.
_	The Aos, being the first Naga tribe to embrace Christianity in 1872, have played a pioneering role in every aspect of Naga life over the past century and half and so has the ABAM which was instrumental in spreading the Baptist faith to the rest of the Nagas with the result that 90% of present-day Nagaland population is Christian with 80% professing the Baptist faith.
_	But law came in, with the result that the trespass multiplied; but where sin increased, grace abounded all the more, so that, just as sin exercised dominion in death, so grace might also exercise dominion through justification* leading to eternal life through Jesus Christ our Lord.
_	Duhamel's principle is the result that the solution to an inhomogeneous, linear, partial differential equation can be solved by first finding the solution for a step input, and then superposing using Duhamel's integral.
_	In August 1837, during a visit to Liverpool, he was induced to carefully study the Hebrew New Testament, with the result that on 13 April 1838 he was baptised a member of the Church of England.
_	His mixture of strong social reforms and steady government proved a powerful election combination, with the result that the Conservatives governed Britain either by themselves or as the leading component of the National Government for most of the interwar years and all through the Second World War.
_	A systematic review and meta-analysis came to the result that assisted zona hatching is related to increased rates of clinical pregnancy and multiple pregnancy in women with previous repeated failure or frozen-thawed embryos.
_	In statistics, the probability integral transform or transformation relates to the result that data values that are modelled as being random variables from any given continuous distribution can be converted to random variables having a standard uniform distribution.
_	Many state legislatures also changed to Democratic-Republican control, with the result that many new Democratic-Republicans were voted into the Senate.
_	The Imperial troops under Raimondo Montecuccoli remained inactive while Zrinski hastened to relieve the castle, refusing all assistance, with the result that the fortress fell.
_	Thus, the crane ‘grew’ and ‘wandered’ with the building with the result that today all extant construction cranes in England are found in church towers above the vaulting and below the roof, where they remained after building construction for bringing material for repairs aloft.
_	The Prefect of Police gave the same advice, but the government did not follow it, with the result that 80% of the 2,501 people listed on Carnet B volunteered for service.
_	This race was on 6 May 1868 with the result that Kelley was again World Champion.
_	The movie posits Grendel's mother as a monster ("Hag") who demands monthly sacrifice from the Danes; king Hrothgar and his wife Wealhþeow have agreed to the scheme, with the result that by the time the hero Beowulf comes to the kingdom of the Danes there are almost no children left, and Hrothgar bemoans the fact that he has become as monstrous as the monster.
_	Chrétien's work even appears to feed back into Welsh Arthurian literature, with the result that the romance Arthur began to replace the heroic, active Arthur in Welsh literary tradition.
_	Then Sugar became a 'killer,' throwing punches with reckless abandon to both head and body with the result that Artie was beaten to the floor.
_	In the 1860s, the anti-trundling campaign was taken up by Charles Babbage, who blamed the boys for driving iron hoops under horses' legs, with the result that the rider is thrown and very often the horse breaks a leg.
_	Separated from his Catholic friends, Rastell does not seem to have been fully trusted by the opposite party, for in a letter to Thomas Cromwell, written probably in 1536, he says that he had spent his time in upholding the king's cause and opposing the pope, with the result that he had lost both his printing business and his legal practice, and was reduced to poverty.
_	Back in Germany 1743, he joined the Moravian Church, whose mission in Sweden now came under his direction, with the result that many radical Pietists joined the Moravians.
_	Southern Iraq during Akkadian period seems to have been approaching its modern rainfall level of less than per year, with the result that agriculture was totally dependent upon irrigation.
_	The Chi-Stelle remained both indifferent and helpless in the face of the this development, with the result that the position of "Chief Signals Intelligence", a parallel headquarters had to be created to manage signals matters pertaining to Germany.
_	Harlan, joined by Burton, concurring in part and dissenting in part, took the view that the taxable event was the grant of the options, and not their exercise, with the result that the gain to the taxpayer was to be measured as of the date of the grant of the options.
_	“Some of Sartre's technical devices seem to be deliberately designed to disconcert and confuse the reader, For example, he often uses the pronouns "il" or "elle" instead of a character's name, with the result that the reader, at least temporarily, is uncertain to whom the author is alluding, This tends at times to have an irritating and disorientating effect, but it appears to be exactly Sartre's intention.
_	Until the summer of 1942, no difficulties were encountered in intercepting American radio communications, with the result that inter-net relationships could be easily ascertained.
_	The sum spent was similar to that raised for Rochdale Cenotaph, but the committee in Leicester decided to spend the entire sum on a monument (rather than a fund for wounded servicemen or war widows as in Rochdale), with the result that Leicester's is the largest and most imposing of Lutyens' war memorials in Britain.
_	The mold is broken to release the piece, with the result that each cast piece is one of a kind.
_	The Scots' raids meant that men had to become soldiers, with the result that the land became impoverished.
_	The city suffered heavy bombardment by 1,000 planes, including those of the USAAF's 447th Bomb Group, with the result that the city was razed, and 1,500 civilians killed, in what has been described by the historian Howard Zinn as a "crime".
_	Miss McNeill sold off the remainder of the estate for development over the ensuing years with the result that the house is now surrounded by 19th and 20th century development of mixed quality and the old home farm buildings are converted into dwellings.
_	When Foster learned of this problem, he had several direct meetings with Winston Churchill with the result that an effective procedure was put in place to provide the prisoners with needed care and protection.
_	He did not complete the diploma, but the nineteen-year-old Henson's work was promoted by Shmith to Jennie Boddington, inaugural Curator of Photography at the National Gallery of Victoria with the result that Henson's first solo show was exhibited there in 1975.
_	In an interview with Bill Flanagan (for the book "Written in My Soul") conducted eleven days before his death, George made it clear that he felt the demise of Little Feat was due to his having allowed the band to be run democratically, with the result that Payne and, to a lesser extent, Barrere, had a presence as songwriters and in production which was disproportionate to their abilities.
_	"The Sacramento Bee" notes that large cities like San Francisco and Los Angeles both attribute their recent increases in homeless persons to the housing shortage, with the result that homelessness in California overall has increased by 15% from 2015 to 2017.
_	The species exhibits a wide phenotypic plasticity in studies such as field observations, with the result that historically many species have been described, when current thought treats it as a single species.
_	That cabinet, however, doubtless influenced by the wishes of the King, to whom Emancipation was anathema, was now determined to firmly resist the Catholic demands, with the result that Ireland rapidly drifted towards rebellion.
_	The queen appealed to the pope and was seconded by her brother of England, with the result that the Pope's sanction was obtained on 18 February 1515.
_	The monarchs of Sicily rejected the declaration, and, when a few years later the island came under the rule of Charles VI, Holy Roman Emperor, Pope Benedict XIII negotiated with him, with the result that the Decree of Pope Clement XI was withdrawn and the "monarchia Sicula" restored, but in an altered form.
_	But incomes and legal costs continued to rise with the result that more and more people on low incomes were being shut out of the system.
_	Mestaer owned two ships named Harleston, apparently in quick succession selling one and buying the other, with the result that they are readily conflated:
_	The authorities had, however, prosecuted many guardsmen for such infractions, with the result that by 1988 fewer violations of legal norms were being recorded.
_	Domestically, many of the economic difficulties of the previous year continue in areas remote from the capital, with the result that the gap in living standards between Kabul and the more distant provinces widening.
_	As the process continues, and "the libido leaves the bright upper world ... sinks back into its own depths...below, in the shadows of the unconscious", so too what comes to the forefront is "what was hidden under the mask of conventional adaptation: the shadow", with the result that "ego and shadow are no longer divided but are brought together in an—admittedly precarious—unity."
_	Reinhardt and his accompanying guitarists initially utilized a range of models then available in France, however with the appearance of the Maccaferri guitar - correctly the Selmer-Maccaferri, and subsequently just Selmer - gravitated to this make for the majority of appearances and recordings, with the result that such guitars (and copies/derivations of the same) are today frequently marketed as "gypsy jazz" instruments and used almost exclusively by players of the style on account of their unique tone and responsiveness to the playing style.
_	Towards this goal, the Hooper became a center for testing thousands of birds and selecting the ones free of the bacteria, with the result that germs and disease largely disappeared from local commerce.
_	Hey had been plagued by injury in his first two years at the club and retired as a player after 1949, with the result that Parramatta fell back to ninth in 1950 before winning nine matches in 1951.
_	In the Science Fiction story ""Delenda Est"", renegade time travellers from the far future interfere at the Battle of Ticinus, with the result that Publius Cornelius Scipio and his son, the future Scipio Africanus, are killed.
_	Some remnants of this situation remain, with the result that, for instance, New Zealand is still in the care of this Congregation.
_	Up to this point, Reid and his small head office staff had been trying to make all key decisions, with the result that, despite its small size, the chain was slow-moving and inflexible.
_	The cheaper housing has made it attractive to immigrants, with the result that it has a considerable cultural and ethnic mixture.
_	I, several ingredients of postage stamp ink that had previously been imported from Germany became unavailable, and the domestic materials that replaced them had significant gritty impurities, with the result that the stamp printing plates became worn much more quickly.
_	The historiography of the Vietnamese-backed People's Republic of Kampuchea regime, which ousted the Khmer Rouge in 1979, was to emphasise Nim's role as a 'moderate' socialist, with the result that his story is still prominently featured in the Tuol Sleng museum.
_	On the night of the 24th, the weather worsened and her single anchor did not hold her securely, with the result that she drove onto a reef and foundered.
_	Gregory in 1800 attacked the system whereby the fellows of the Royal College of Surgeons of Edinburgh acted in rotation as surgeons at the Royal Infirmary, with the result that the younger fellows were excluded.
_	A survey conducted in 2007 reached the result that the users of the SPIRES database wanted the portal to provide more services that at that time already 30-year-old system could provide.
_	Millard recruited often from his "alma mater", the University of Missouri's School of Journalism, and was influenced by the recommendations of its dean Walter Williams, with the result that there was from 1911 a "Missouri News Colony" which was "one of the recognized groups of foreign journalists alongside the large British contingent and a smaller caucus of Australians" in Shanghai.
_	This was exactly the result that the SDP/Alliance campaign needed, as it meant that many Conservative voters could be tempted to vote for the SDP in order to defeat Labour.
_	Auto manufacturers continued to build up their in-house styling departments and bodyworks, with the result that LeBaron became less important to most of its customers for design ideas and bodies.
_	From the late sixteenth century attitudes began to change, and witches were seen as deriving powers from the Devil, with the result that witchcraft was seen as a form of heresy.
_	On the way the convoy ran into severe weather with the result that "Prince of Wales" foundered with the loss of all on board.
_	"Big Daddy" (Eugene Clark), an unusually intelligent zombie, directs his fellow zombies to use firearms against the human defenses, and later leads the zombies in an assault on the human city, with the result that the electric fence that kept the zombies out now keeps the humans trapped inside.
_	These orders were delivered with great dispatch and with the result that on the 21st headquarters, 1st and 3d Battalions of the 20th Infantry, Col. Marion P. Maus, commanding, reached San Francisco and reported for duty, being followed the next day by field and staff and the 2d Squadron, 14th Cavalry.
_	As heard earlier on the album, on "Another Brick in the Wall, Part 1", the muted D is treated with a specific delay setting, providing three to four loud but gradually decaying repeats, one dotted-eighth note apart, with the result that simply playing quarter notes (at 116 beats per minute) will produce a strict rhythm of one eighth note followed by two sixteenth notes, with rhythmic echoes overlapping.
_	Carey characterizes Meyendorff's thesis as a landmark study of Palamas that "set Palamas firmly within the context of Greek patristic thought and spirituality" with the result that Palamism is now generally understood to be "a faithful witness to the long-standing Eastern Christian emphasis on deification (theosis) as the purpose of the divine economy in Christ."
_	The period 1939 - 1945 coincided with the Second World War, and as slaughter on the frontline continued there was a shortage of politically reliable men to serve at the concentration camps, with the result that inside the camps daily administration was increasingly delegated to inmates.
_	Cadmium levels are high in Finnish elk liver and kidneys, with the result that consumption of these organs from elk more than one year old is prohibited in Finland.
_	By 1970, protests started against the shutdown of the "Bimmelbahn" railways, with the result that no or only very short official notice was given when a rail section was shut down and there were no more celebrations.
_	Bagot, however, defended his doctrine before this assembly with the result that the censure was removed.
_	This was criticised at the time, with the result that the museum ceased to collect contemporary items and did not do so again until the 1960s.
_	Thus, technically, he never wintered on the Antarctic mainland, with the result that he was not awarded the Silver Polar Medal
_	With the result that his son, under contract to Standard, became selectable for dei rout Leiwen (Red Lions).
_	The first leg was abandoned in 86th minute and was registered with the result that was reached 2–0, and Hajduk Split was punished by having their three matches behind closed doors.</small>
_	Although Monmouthshire was included in the 16th century legislation, it was treated anomalously, with the result that its legal status as a Welsh county fell into some ambiguity and doubt until the 20th century.
_	Kubota forces were hard-pressed to defend their territory, with the result that the alliance troops had made serious advances by the time the war ended in northern Honshū.
_	In the circumstances, the bond had failed to create a deemed pledge over the property of W CC, with the result that the appellant was not a secured creditor.
_	When Arthur’s acquisitions were combined with those of his father, total acreage for the Ashford estate was 33,298 with the result that Lord Ardilaun owned most of County Galway between Maam (Maum) Bridge and Lough Mask.
_	It has been argued that Gladstone mishandled the Bradlaugh affair, giving the opposition a religious cudgel which they used for years, with the result that his second ministry was not nearly as successful as the first.
_	Another version states that Andrew Knox lay in wait for Hugh with nineteen others and ambushed him at the shingle beach with the result that he attempted to defend himself until he was forced back into the sea and drowned.
_	"Spencer" sailed south-southeast and the other two British vessels sailed southwest by west, with the result that they lost sight of each other.
_	Martin believed that simplicity would lead to efficiency and took care to eliminate complicated operations, with the result that the prototype was rapidly put together by a small group of 12 semi-skilled workers.
_	According to a German account, all but the two radio operators were able to escape from the sinking U-boat, but the survivors were subsequently attacked while in the water with the result that only 13 of the crew of 34 survived.
_	In the summer Legore played baseball, and someone said it was professional baseball with the result that Legore was barred from football as a 'professional.'
_	She had a crew of 90 men, but her captain, Don Joaquin de la Cheva and most of his officers were ashore, with the result that there were only 75 men on aboard.
_	As conditional sales became popular for financing industrial equipment and consumer goods, U.S. state legislatures began to regulate them as well during the early 20th century, with the result that they soon became almost as complex as the older forms of security interests which they had been used to evade.
_	With De la Cierva's autogyro, the rotor was drawn through the air by means of a conventional propeller, with the result that the rotor generated sufficient lift to sustain level flight, climb and descent.
_	However, corrupting, destructive elements eventually began to grow and significantly impact the society, with the result that the civilization declined and the continent itself eventually submerged.
_	Afforestation programmes have been pursued vigorously with the result that a forest belt of stretch has been created in the Zetang City, on the bank of the Yarlung River which helps in erosion control due to wind and river action, and also enhances the beauty of the city.
_	These changes were challenged in a round of public consultations, with the result that revised recommendations were made.
_	Antiphon was also a common personal name in Ancient Greece, with the result that it is not always easy for scholars to distinguish between different bearers of the name:
_	Arthur also ordered Sir Gawain, Merlin, and a few others to maim Querig and to cast a spell turning her breath into an oblivion-inducing mist, with the result that Saxons would forget about the massacres.
_	The two grids were oriented differently, with the result that only every third northwest-southeast street in DL185 actually continuing southeast beyond Burrard into DL541.
_	The number of prospective pupils continued to rise over the following years, with the result that between February 1844 and October 1849 the sisters established four convents (in Longueuil, Belœil, Saint Lin and Saint Timothée) employing 30 teachers and enrolling (as of 6 October 1849) 448 pupils.
_	He also added that "However, our engagement with Islamabad has unfortunately not yet yielded the result that we want."
_	During a two-year sojourn in England beginning in 1901 she traced her family's relationship to King Arthur and his court, with the result that much of her work became focused on medieval legends.
_	His mixture of strong social reforms and steady government proved a powerful election combination, with the result that the Conservatives governed Britain either by themselves or as the leading component of the National Government.
_	Senate hearings, held by a subcommittee of the Committee on the District of Columbia, started on March 6, only three days after the march, and lasted until March 17, with the result that the District's superintendent of police was replaced.
_	The expedition, supported by a fleet under Nasar, was initially successful in its operations to recover the cities of Calabria, but the dual command of the land forces proved fatal when Apostyppes and Prokopios quarreled: during a battle Prokopios found himself in danger, but Apostyppes refused to send troops to his aid, with the result that Prokopios' part of the army was defeated and he himself slain.
_	In modern times, much of the river water is used for irrigation, with the result that the Eurotas is almost dry during the summer months.
_	Also during this period, a series of floods caused by typhoons motivated the municipal government to construct a tall levee along the riverfront, with the result that the embankment now stands some 10 metres higher than street level.
_	On 17 July 2010, PSV and Hamburger SV agreed to a loan deal, with the result that Berg played for PSV the 2010–11 season.
_	Subsequently, the mines were privatized, followed by decreased demand for lignite, with the result that the last mine in the area closed in 2009.
_	He predicted "a huge crisis" and "the blow-up of credit card finance" in 2008, with the result that consumer credit card spending limits would be "slashed" by card issuers.
_	He ran into Elmer Rasmusson, an Anchorage banker whilst in Seattle, with the result that Rasmusson loaned him $125,000 to get going again.
_	About 330 million years ago Gondwana had drifted over the South Pole, with the result that an ice sheet several kilometers thick covered much of Africa, and other parts of Gondwana.
_	Too often in World War II, such aircraft suffered accelerated development or limited service, with the result that teething difficulties came to be regarded as permanent limitations".
_	Something similar happened in Sanskrit, with the result that a new vowel "-i" or "-a" was added to many words.
_	The one seeks the good of the soul and the other cares for earthly well-being, with the result that the church is denied the power to make laws, even in the persistent silence of human legislation.
_	This feature has helped the bank by limiting competition from other banks, with the result that Joyo Bank has been able to command a 38% market share of deposits and 42% share of loans in Ibaraki.
_	Finally, when Parliament was held in A Coruña, many members were bribed and others denied entry, with the result that the subsidy was approved.
_	The pressure steadily built, with the result that the United States declared war on the United Kingdom on June 12, 1812.
_	Wartime disbanding of other orchestras enabled Webster and Sargent to recruit leading British players such as Anthony Pini and Reginald Kell, with the result that for a few years the Liverpool Philharmonic had a strong claim to be the finest orchestra in the country, until Walter Legge set up the Philharmonia after the war.
_	At the request of the pope he drew up a report of two hundred pages on the Inquisition in Portugal, with the result that after a judicial inquiry Pope Innocent XI himself suspended it for five years (1676–81).
_	They suspiciously distrusted the government, with the result that French morale in the face of the war with Germany was badly prepared.
_	They entered into negotiations with Mr. Thomas Savin (the contractor for the Hereford, Hay, and Brecon Railway), with the result that in 1862 he agreed with the Commissioners to rebuild the bridge in consideration of having the tolls assigned to him for 99 years.
_	The testing concluded in June 1996, with the result that the ASRAAM did not meet the US requirements.
_	At the Pressburg diet in 1840, Dessewffy was already the leading orator of the more enlightened and progressive Conservatives, but incurred great unpopularity for not going far enough, with the result that he was twice defeated at the polls.
_	Lord Rossmore and the "Shirleys of Lough Fea" had competed for many years for the largest room in County Monaghan with the result that the drawing room at Rossmore was extended five times.
_	And Aubrey forgot to advertise the opening of the restaurant, with the result that no customers turn up.
_	Contact was made between Partisans and the prisoners with the result that at the end of August a group of seven slipped away past a sleeping guard at 15:00, and at 21:00 the men were celebrating with the Partisans in a village, away on the Yugoslav side of the border.
_	Wind data has been collected from the site for over two years and the raw data has been compiled and assessed by Global Energy Concepts of the United States with the result that the selected site shows excellent potential for wind generation.
_	If the recontracting process does not explain real world behaviour then the result that the price-taking equilibrium point will be reached by competitive traders will not necessarily be true.
_	Using the result that formula_27, one has
_	These four companies pooled their patents, with the result that all other manufacturers had to obtain a license and pay $15 per machine.
_	There is a small community of aboriginal people in Vancouver as well as in the surrounding metropolitan region, with the result that Vancouver constitutes the largest native community in the province, albeit an unincorporated one (i.e. not as a band government).
_	The answer to the second question is therefore that Article 9 of the Directive effects an exhaustive harmonisation of the protection it confers, with the result that it precludes the national patent legislation from offering absolute protection to the patented product as such, regardless of whether it performs its function in the material containing it." at [62-63]
_	In 1824, My Duong, the eldest son of Prince Canh, was apparently accused of incest with his mother (Prince Canh's widow) by mandarin Lê Văn Duyệt, with the result that he was banished from the royal court, while his mother died in prison.
_	Hill made only 58 hour-long episodes in the 20 years he worked for Thames with the result that, in the UK, the show was generally promoted as specials, but the programmes were re-edited as 30 minute episodes for overseas markets.
_	She returned home but her condition deteriorated with the result that she spent the last 20 years of her life in a mental home until she died in February 1942.
_	In major semi-arid river valleys, annual flooding renewed soil fertility every year, with the result that population densities could rise significantly.
_	The school saw its GCSE results increase from 32% under the former Tamworth Manor High School to 40% 5A-C GCSEs in the result that were published in August 2007.
_	However, an Australian study came to the result that potential donors who would still be willing to donate without a guarantee of anonymity were not automatically more open to initiate or extended contact with offspring.
_	It is a dimensionless quantity, with the result that its numerical value does not vary with the choice of units of measurement, only with the choice of particle.
_	At the request of Freeman's wife, Colonel William M. Fenton argued the case before the Michigan Supreme Court, with the result that Bay County was declared a fully organized county.
_	And that when they do recover they will be just the same Huns as they have been, with the result that they will revert to militarism which is the only thing they do really understand".
_	6. At the end of Series 1 her operation is botched by substitute surgeon Mr. Chinnery (see below), with the result that in Series 2 Barbara can't tell what sex she is any more.
_	Consequently, the proportion of white voters supporting McGovern was utterly negligible, and even the newly enfranchised and loyally Democratic African-American population did not accept McGovern’s radical ideas, with the result that for the second time in three elections one of the historically strongest members of the former Democratic Solid South became the most Republican state in the nation.
_	From later diary notes by Therese and a letter by Stackelberg in 1815, it appears that Josephine was too weak to resist his amorous advances – with the result that she was pregnant when the two sisters returned, with Stackelberg, to Hungary in the summer of 1809.
_	The venture was an initial success with the result that a Canadian mining company, Amanda Mines Ltd, proposed a merger with Metalliferous Holdings Ltd.
_	In April 1888 the Italian forces, numbering over 20,000 men, came in contact with the Ethiopian army, but negotiations took the place of fighting, with the result that both forces retired, the Italians only leaving some 5,000 troops in Eritrea, later to become an Italian colony.
_	Developments in stadium and auditorium design, as well as in recording and broadcast technology, have allowed off-site spectators to watch sport, with the result that the size of the audience has grown ever larger and spectator sport has become increasingly popular.
_	He capitulated to the Klan demand that he appoint a Klansman as police chief, with the result that the police department became in effect a Klan organization.
_	"Gridley"s antiaircraft fire helped to protect the aircraft carriers, with the result that Japanese air strength was virtually ended with this battle.
_	Bettesworth turned with the result that the French vessel got stuck in a position where "Curieux" could rake her deck.
_	The north bank was a serious problem, as it was built on a peat subsoil, and defied attempts to raise it, with the result that the Bourne Fens often flooded.
_	Proposed subgroups are difficult to recognise, having similar 'lily-like' flowers, with the result that some members of the group have been included in different subgroups at different times.
_	Furthermore, he deemed that a bridge had been constructed in a hasty manner with the result that, when tested, it exhibited very great deflection.
_	Even after the original vowel had merged with "ī", the old spelling "ei" continued to be used for a while, with the result that "ei" came to stand for "ī" and began to be used in the spelling of original occurrences of "ī" that did not evolve from "ei" (e.g. in the genitive singular "-ī", which is always spelled "-i" in the oldest inscriptions but later on can be spelled either "-i" or "-ei").
_	Set against the ups and downs of an ancestral Muslim family spanning over half a century, it subtly builds upon the bitter-sweet experiences of family members and their interactions, arising out of concrete situations, with the result that Razaq's dreams of freedom are shattered and he is left with the desolate silence of the asylum.
_	Neil Garnham QC, counsel to the inquiry following Climbié's death, later said to her, "there is a terrible danger here—is there not, doctor—of social services on the one hand and you on the other each expecting the other to do the investigation, with the result that nobody does".
_	He later qualified this in deriving the result that in a model of exchange equilibrium, price ratios would be proportional not only to ratios of "final degrees of utility," but also to costs of production.
_	Although these were substantially cut, they still took up most of the magazine, with the result that the other stories tended to be very short.
_	Duminy’s trading activities from Cape Town were interrupted by the outbreak of the American War of Independence in mid-1778 because France entered the war in support of the American rebels, with the result that armed conflict soon extended to the Indian Ocean.
_	The older South Nitshill neighbourhood is on the northern side of Parkhouse Road; this was almost entirely redeveloped in the early 21st century with the result that its buildings are newer than many of those in the more recently established Parkhouse.
_	Entering a tournament in that city, and receiving the odds of the queen, he lost every game, whereupon he took up the study of Bilguer's "Handbuch", with the result that in 1862 he won games from the leading German chess player Adolf Anderssen at the odds of a knight.
_	During her absence from the lists she had been lengthened, with the result that her burthen had increased.
_	He worked with Sir Frederick Abel on improving the properties of black powder, making it burn more slowly to produce more gas and a more consistent pressure, with the result that he was able to increase muzzle velocities from 1600 to 2100 feet per second, while the energy developed increased by about 75%.
_	While an undergraduate, Cliff took classes at the University of Missouri School of Law, with the result that Cliff had accumulated three years of law school credits before he actually graduated from law school.
_	Unfortunately, according to the Olympic Games of 1924 British Report: "in the final pool of the individual foil event, he [Seligman] slipped in the course of his second fight and strained his leg, with the result that he was compelled to retire – a most unfortunate happening, since he had previously won his fight against Roger Ducret of France, the eventual Olympic winner."
_	He preached against "idolatry" with the greatest boldness, with the result that what he later called the "rascal multitude" began the "purging" of churches and the destruction of monasteries.
_	Nevertheless, the assault of the 2nd New Zealand Division had drawn in both 15 and 21 Panzer Divisions, with the result that there was a wide gap in the Axis lines to the south west.
_	In February 2010, Cash disagreed with members of her constituency association over strategies to win the seat, with the result that David Cameron, the leader of the party but not yet prime minister, intervened to sack Amanda Sayers, chair of the Westminster North Conservative Association.
_	He still has the troll mirror shards in his eye, with the result that he sees all the bad that people have ever done.
_	The Rotary District took up the scheme with the result that Rotary International, Britain and Ireland published a leaflet about the idea to encourage other Rotary Clubs to sponsor a similar club.
_	The on-board "ImageBLITZ" image trigger uses the live picture of the camera itself as a flexible and accurate sensor, with the result that the process synchronisation takes care of itself.
_	Extensive use was made of artillery and airstrikes to dislodge VC who established fighting positions in the stronger concrete buildings within Saigon, with the result that 13,830 homes were destroyed, 421 civilians were killed, 1,444 were wounded and approximately 150,000 were made homeless.
_	This posed a direct threat to British hegemony on the seas, with the result that negotiations for an alliance between Germany and Britain broke down.
_	The manor has been much changed since it was first constructed, without historical records being kept detailing this process, with the result that the exact age of the existing buildings is unclear, as is their relationship to the whole as it existed in Tudor times.
_	Of the department names, 32 are not unique within Argentina, with the result that 75 departments have identically or similarly named counterparts in one or more other Argentine province.
_	The area began to appear informally during the early 1930s, after the pound had left the gold standard in 1931, with the result that a number of currencies of countries that historically had performed a large amount of their trade in sterling were pegged to sterling instead of to gold.
_	Incalculable harm has been caused by simply glossing Ioudaios with ‘Jew,’ for many readers or auditors of Bible translations do not practice the historical judgment necessary to distinguish between circumstances and events of an ancient time and contemporary ethnic-religious-social realities, with the result that anti-Judaism in the modern sense of the term is needlessly fostered through biblical texts.
_	So impressed was Edge with the result that he contracted to buy six more cars, and set up a showroom in London from which to sell them.
_	This length/velocity discrepancy interacts with the nonlinear length and velocity-force relationships that have evolved in response to such a disruption with the result that the leg extends further into the hole, and thus keeps the bird’s body stable and upright.
_	Bertrand Russell subsequently noticed the contradiction, and when he published it in his 1903 book "Principles of Mathematics", he stated that it had been suggested to him by Burali-Forti's paper, with the result that it came to be known by Burali-Forti's name.
_	She was also responsible for their schooling, with the result that all three were given high scholastic marks when they eventually entered the German school on Antwerp's rue Grétry, considered one of the best private schools in the city.
_	Pemberton was so impressed by Dexter’s findings that he immediately captured over two thousand toads for release in the sugar cane fields of Hawaii, with the result that all the major Hawaiian Islands had had toads released by 1934.
_	Both sides were forced to the negotiating table, with the result that in June 1991, all apartheid laws were finally rescinded- opening the way for the country's first multiracial democratic elections three years later.
_	Bingham passed on the intelligence with the result that the British at Poona were able to capture the Frenchmen.
_	He would also often write stories for newspapers at short notice, with the result that he was unsure exactly how many short stories he had written and there is no sure total.
_	Although the Christadelphians were suspect for their pacifism, and pro-Jewish interpretations of prophecy, Maier maintained a "strangers and pilgrims" attitude to Germany's politics, with the result that most of the Christadelphians avoided arrest until war broke out and conscription was introduced; several were imprisoned and Albert Merz was executed in April 1941.
_	As "Valparaiso" was blown towards shore, her anchor hooked and broke the chains of the brig , with the result that "Calder" too wrecked on shore.
_	By trusting his judgment over that of the pilots he was ordered to use, Jackson saved the convoy from grounding on the Haak Sand off Texel, although one transport did ground with the result that the Dutch captured her and the 250 men of the Fifth Regiment of Foot she was carrying.
_	By the time Fox regained office in 1806 as member of Grenville's Ministry of All the Talents, Ponsonby's health was poor, with the result that his wife urgently pressed his claims for a peerage, arguing that it was merited by his opposition to the Regency Bill and the Union, and by his staunch support for the Foxite whigs at Westminster.
_	The two remaining transmitters in Europe (Anthorn, UK and Sylt, Germany) will no longer be able to sustain a positioning and navigation Loran service, with the result that the UK announced its trial eLoran service would be discontinued from the same date.
_	Uncertainty about "Laconia"s location delayed the rendezvous between the ships, with the result that "Laconia" was torpedoed by the German submarine before "Laburnum" could arrive on the scene.
_	Hine always seemed to receive the first two premiums - with the result that any new ideas on asylum design were being stultified".
_	In accordance with Indian statutes, these associations have domestic authority over trust properties and have the right to grant or restrict entry and use, with the result that the associations frequently prohibit the use by the offspring of a "mixed marriage", that is, where one parent is a Parsi and the other is not.
_	A diminution of the numbers of predators (otters, lobsters and fish) can result in an increase in urchin numbers causing overgrazing of kelp forests with the result that an alga-denuded "urchin barren" forms.
_	Scottish law, however, remained entirely separate from English law, with the result that the law courts and legal profession continued to exist in Edinburgh; as did the University and medical establishments.
_	Armitage went on to dominate the league in the 1995–96 season but disbanded midway through the season, with the result that their record was expunged from the table.
_	Political and trades union activity was banned, with the result that various political organisations, including the Trades Union Confederation (""Confédération générale du travail"" / CGT) itself, "went underground", becoming progressively incorporated into the wider French Resistance movement.
_	On 15 March, he asked Indonesian National Party chairman Suwirjo to form a cabinet, but he failed, with the result that Sukarno himself called a meeting on 14 April of party leaders and military officers, at which they were all asked if they were prepared to join the cabinet.
_	Since the 1970s, parts of these roads are numbered A4226, with the result that the A4226 radiates from Weycock Cross roundabout in "three" directions.
_	In the confusion, Whitlam and his advisers did not immediately tell any Senate members of the dismissal, with the result that when the Senate convened at 2.00 pm, the appropriation bills were rapidly passed, with the ALP senators assuming the Opposition had given in.
_	Its greatest period of growth was between 1830 and 1850, with the result that much of its architecture is in the Greek Revival style popular during that period.
_	The "Star" also reported the result that Ontario premier Dalton McGuinty's "Children’s hospital in Ottawa celebrates big expansion" closely resembles Joyce's "A Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man".
_	They were deployed on the lines from Schiltach to Schramberg and from Waldenburg to Künzelsau, but proved to have very high maintenance costs, with the result that three of them were retired by the Württemberg State Railways.
_	But he lived on into the age of the stiff upper lip, with the result that later generations, hearing of his tears on a visit to his mother's grave or at the funerals of old friends such as Henry Wilberforce, thought him not only sensitive but melancholy.
_	Other ironstone quarries did not take this care when replacing the overburden with the result that the restored ground was poor for agricultural use.
_	A survey in the United States of more than 10,000 physicians (not only obstetricians) came to the result that 34% of physicians would perform an abortion in certain situations, even if it were against their own beliefs.
_	For the first time, pointed arches, rib vaults and buttresses were used, with the result that massive walls were not longer needed to stabilise the building.
_	Although a considerable number of men had found employment in different capacities, a policy of retrenchment was adopted as was general on all railroad due to business conditions, with the result that all of the smaller terminals were eliminated, thus removing this source of employment.
_	Like its fellow site at Killamarsh, it became a focus of interest for railway enthusiasts, but was much less accessible without trespass, with the result that fewer photographs survive.
_	There is no objection in modern law to the remuneration of the mandatary, with the result that it is difficult to distinguish the contract of mandate from that of letting and hiring of work or services.
_	According to , the Samaritans sought to "frustrate their purpose" and sent messengers to Ecbatana and Susa, with the result that the work was suspended.
_	The Marathas were defeated soon after at Asadpur by the combined forces of Shuja-ud-daula and Hafiz Rahmat Khan, with the result that they quit not only Rohilkhand but Delhi also.
_	Hawkins regularly convened all-night rehearsals following long club shows, with the result that the young musicians quickly developed great technical prowess on their instruments.
_	"Perhaps in recent times there has been a tendency to over-accentuate this type of short face, with the result that a few of the cats seen at shows have faces which present a peke-like appearance.
_	On numerous occasions when he could have secured many of the closing wickets, he refrained from so doing, to enable another of the younger bowlers to procure a wicket or two, with the result that he was responsible for the developing of several young bowlers to the advantage of both club and State."
_	This gentleman acted similarly towards the Gaelic League of Foynes, which proposed to hold its Feis on a Sunday, and to appease him the Feis was held on a week day, with the result that numbers of people were deprived from attending it.
_	Efficiency can often be expressed as a percentage of the result that could ideally be expected, for example if no energy were lost due to friction or other causes, in which case 100% of fuel or other input would be used to produce the desired result.
_	These layers are generally peeled away prior to cooking or serving raw, with the result that the stems often provide a smaller amount of food than one might assume from their intact appearance.
_	Partington, who describes it as an iron pot filled with [huo] yao, literally "fire drug", a low-nitrate gunpowder or proto-gunpowder, sometimes lowered on chains, that sent forth "fire… out of every part," with an incendiary effect over many yards that could pierce metal to which it was attached, producing a "noise like thunder" that could be heard for miles, with the result that "the men and the oxhides were all broken into fragments ("chieh sui") flying in all directions".
_	Delbrück vigorously opposed the policy of the Prussian government in dealing with the Danes and the Poles, with the result that he was twice subjected to disciplinary penalties as a professor and therefore, in Prussia, a civil servant.
_	During his tenure at Harvard, Cross supervised more than a hundred dissertations, with the result that many of today's senior scholars in Hebrew Bible and Ancient Near Eastern studies are his former students.
_	With the arrival of the Americans into the War in 1917, many keen British basketball players, found out more about the game and in 1918 an American YMCA Physical Director brought some influence to hear on the District Associations in England, with the result that the local rules were altered slightly and the game became more like the American game.
_	Many of the specimens are isolated from other trees with the result that there is minimal transfer of pollen and few seeds are set.
_	While the two are on the premises, a thief steals Babe Ruth's famous bat Darlin' (Whoopi Goldberg), with the result that Yankee’s father is blamed and temporarily dismissed until Darlin can be found, as result Stanley also blames Yankee for stealing it and for setting him up.
_	Following his father's death, his mother returned to the Duchess's service, with the result that Turner had access to the gallery at the palace.
_	This happened, with the result that the professor stated that the Spraggs were frauds.
_	In mid-1993, the "Department of Mines and Energy" reopened the coal sector to foreign investment, with the result that the leading Indonesian coal producer now is a joint venture between UK firms – BP and Rio Tinto.
_	However, Plevris contends that "Of the 1,400 pages of my large book, the condemnation encompasses only several paragraphs, of which portions were extracted, with the result that another meaning was given to the words and truth is distorted due to the alteration of phrases".
_	Charley Hannah entered a contract dispute with the team, with the result that Sean Farrell began to be trained at tackle.
_	After Edward Stratemeyer's death in May 1930, his two daughters, Harriet Stratemeyer Adams (1892–1982) and Edna C. Squier (1895–1974), ran the company, with the result that Garis stopped writing for the Syndicate in 1933 after several disagreements.
_	Wartime disbanding of other orchestras enabled Webster and Sargent to recruit leading players such as Anthony Pini and Reginald Kell, with the result that for a few years the Liverpool Philharmonic had a strong claim to be the finest orchestra in the country.
_	Some years later an opposition started that charged only half these rates, with the result that the original enterprise reduced its interest to the same level, charging, however, 2 öre per krona per mensem for bulky articles—a figure now usual for pledges of that description.
_	This wasn't the result that Ritchie wanted, and he continued escalating his political campaign.
_	On one such occasion, over Tokyo, Eaton led his formation of thirty Mustangs into cloud with a faulty artificial horizon in his plane, with the result that he and his comrades, who were following his lead, became badly disorientated and were fortunate to avoid collision; RAAF historian Alan Stephens considered this a not-atypical example of the casual attitude to flying safety exhibited at the time by the veteran pilots of World War II.
_	Once back in Virginia, Rolfe married Jane Pierce and continued to improve the quality of his tobacco with the result that by the time of his death in 1622, the Colony was thriving as a producer of tobacco.
_	The houses and streets have subsided with the result that river levels are, in parts, higher than the surrounding houses.
_	However, when in February 2009 the Holy See declared that the change should have waited until the whole of the Missal had been translated, the bishops' conference appealed, with the result that those parishes that had adopted the new translation of the Order of Mass were directed to continue using it, while those that had not were told to await further instructions before doing so.
_	Many isolated occurrences resulted in violence, with the result that both sides were taking to arms.
_	It is worth noting that demand outstripped supply on release with the result that numerous bootleg versions of the CD version are in circulation.
_	Daendels displayed a firm attitude towards the local Javanese rulers, with the result that the rulers later were willing to work with the British against the Dutch.
_	Mesnard "defended his Ship in a very gallant Manner", with the result that "Cyane" had three men killed and nine wounded.
_	The position of crown rabbi outlasted the schools, and while the government viewed the crown rabbis as being the only official rabbis, the communities continued to have rabbis schooled in the traditional ways, with the result that many communities had two rabbis, an "official" one for dealing with the Tsar, and a "spiritual" rabbi for dealing with all the traditional religious and family roles that rabbis usually dealt with.
_	Lafia designed the "Art+Culture" site to feature an algorithmic engine that can generate a cloud of connections between artists practicing in Design Arts, Film, Literature, Music, Performing Arts, and Visual Arts with the result that the connections can reveal surprising, playful, interesting or inspiring relationships between artists, art disciplines, art movements, and cultural themes.
_	Remixers Andrew Weatherall and Terry Farley were supplied with an alternative chorus vocal, with the result that the chorus hook on their mixes runs ""We've" got the world in motion" rather than the original ""Love's" got the world in motion".
_	It was under his patronage that Saint Boniface expanded Frankish influence into Germany by rebuilding the German church, with the result that, within a century, the German church was the strongest church in western Europe.
_	The vessels exchanged fire over a four-hour period, including more than two hours of intense combat, with the result that both vessels sustained extensive damage to masts, sails, and rigging.
_	The book had been originally published by Gaspereau Press, a boutique firm based in Nova Scotia which is one of Canada's only book publishing companies that still binds and prints its own books, with the result that the firm had difficulty meeting the increased demand after Skibsrud's win was announced.
_	When he refused, the administration put the low-scoring students in the hands of a more malleable faculty member, with the result that the team kept on winning."
_	He originally planned a route which would have taken the new railway to the east of Tring, but vociferous opposition from influential local landowners such as the Earl of Essex, Earl of Clarendon, Lord Brownlow and Sir Astley Cooper delayed the project and forced the route to be changed before parliamentary approval could be obtained, with the result that Tring railway station had to be sited some distance from the town.
_	This had the result that villages that had previously thought of themselves as homogenous and essentially Han were now divided between those with ethnic identity and those without.
_	There are no "nontrivial" square roots of 1 modulo "p" (a special case of the result that, in a field, a polynomial has no more zeroes than its degree).
_	He concluded that at least 116,000 combatants and civilians were killed by all sides or died "unnatural" deaths from 1975–80 (if true, this would yield the result that about 15% of the civilian population of East Timor was killed from 1975–80).
_	First priority was given to the British Army and Royal Marines, with the result that the units of the Home Guard, the very last line of defence, were quite unlikely to get one.
_	Miller chose to use plasterwork to create interiors whereas Peto made extensive use of wooden panelling, with the result that the overall impression given by "Lusitania" was brighter than "Mauretania".
_	The ISU defines a fall as a loss of control with the result that the majority of the skater's body weight is not on the blade but supported by hands, knees, or buttocks.
_	The difficulty with the Act is that if the Convention Parliament had no authority, then the succession of William and Mary was of no legal effect, which meant that they were not capable of giving Royal Assent to any bill in the next parliament, with the result that even the Crown and Parliament Recognition Act was of no effect either.
_	One study came to the result that almost half of IMGs were unsuccessful in their first attempts in the pursuit of a U.S. residency position, and three-quarters began a residency after five years.
_	Unlike many of his contemporaries, Clemens seems never to have traveled to Italy, with the result that Italian influence is absent in his music.
_	First, the budgets allocated to the Policy's programmes were never sufficient to achieve its aims, with the result that many colonial officials became disillusioned with the possibility of achieving lasting progress.
_	It was said that the Archbishop was so pleased with the result that he had a new episcopal seal designed showing a bishop holding a steeple.
_	The judge voids the divorce decree, with the result that Vera and John are still legally married.
_	It used a narrower bandwidth than Radiodiffusion-Télévision Française (with the result that images appear a little less clear), but have the advantage of being able to cram a greater number of transmitters in the same zone) allowing the channel to be seen by French and Wallonian viewers as well as foreign viewers in (Germany, Netherlands, and Dutch-speaking Belgium.
_	He envisions a "decision tree" for various outcomes, such as (i) the Federal Circuit deciding the PTAB was right, in which case its order is affirmed (whether for or against invalidity) but at the expense of another layer of costly litigation to reach the result that the PTAB correctly decided to institute the proceeding now completfged; and (ii) the Federal Circuit deciding the PTAB was wrong, in which case the issue goes back to district court for a repeat of the validity resolution in that forum, even if the PTAB has correctly decided the validity issue and "even if this court agrees with the Board’s ultimate validity determination," at still further litigation costs and "squandering" of institutional resources.
_	Seeking to have a closer look at the Peacekeeper, Toby enters the same room as the robot, only for the Peacekeeper's first attempt to destroy the barrier to backfire with the result that Toby is totally annihilated.
_	Decades of punishment for speaking Native languages resulted in greatly decreased transmission, with the result that few indigenous Alaskans still speak indigenous languages in the 21st century.
_	It has had many fires and thefts with the result that the church that exists nowadays has had many restorations and modifications.
_	Approximately 1.6 million phone customers and 230,000 internet users in the three states were added to FairPoint's customer base, with the result that the Northern New England customers represented 85% of FairPoint's customers.
_	Moreover, there was no system in place to relieve officers, with the result that the same policemen had to serve in the rioting for three days without rest.
_	Voter turnout was 35.96%, with the result that the referendum was valid and binding.
_	It is also very energy-intensive, with the result that the cement industry is a large emitter of carbon dioxide.
_	Placenames are explained by reference to legends which are linked to them by means of pseudo-etymological techniques, where sometimes fictitious stories are adduced to explain the existing names, with the result that some of these legends are only to be found in the Dinnshenchas, where they serve their explanatory purpose.
_	The funding for colleges did not keep pace with the growth in student numbers, with the result that only four colleges were built.
_	The opposition of the tribesmen, although at times subdued, was never overcome entirely with the result that it was constantly necessary to have a gun boat in the vicinity of the island.
_	During the Japanese era (1895-1945), no new missions were allowed, with the result that Catholicism and Presbyterianism remain the largest Christian denominations.
_	The flotilla successfully negotiated the passage with the result that all the vessels were at anchor by noon.
_	the poet takes care to mention every knightly name that would cause a rustle of recognition among his hearers, in a tradition as old as Homer, with the result that the "Chanson d'Antioche" was taken as history by heralds and genealogists of a later generation.
_	This is usually due to the result that the encoder had failed to practice audience analysis at first.
_	“It is more burdensome for a small bank to keep pace with the development of our country than for a large bank, with the result that the effective growth and comparative influence of smaller banks will probably in the future decline in comparison with that of the larger banks.
_	His mother interfered with his studies, often withdrawing him from school, with the result that he lacked discipline and his classical studies were neglected.
_	The interaction of the outcome of 11-plus streaming (middle class into grammar schools and working class into secondary modern schools) and better funding of grammar schools produced the result that middle-class children experienced better resourced schools offering superior future educational and vocational options while working-class children experienced comparatively inferior schools offering more limited prospects for educational and vocational progress.
_	However, the British Government failed to foresee the needs of the future, with the result that the building had to be replaced by another on practically the same site.
_	Patronage was regulated in 1711 (Patronage Act) and abolished in 1874, with the result that ministers must be elected by members of the congregation.
_	Nevertheless, the assault of 2nd New Zealand Division had drawn in both 15 and 21 Panzer Divisions, with the result that there was a wide gap in the Axis lines to the south west.
_	Specifically, the system was based primarily on the voluntary nature of the role, and the stratification of Athenian society: most of those Athenians to be included on the list of trierarchs had been so before, or were descendants of former trierarchs, with the result that the families providing the trierarchs tended to be the same ones from generation to generation.
_	The reorganization resulting from the crisis directed more attention across the river from Wisconsin into Minnesota and out into the rest of the Midwest with the result that the corps doubled in size from 53 to over one hundred members and moved into Division II competition for 2004.
_	Not only have these issues led to public outcry and protests but harmful representations of Asian women are frequent, with the result that future opportunities for them may well be tarnished in the process.
_	As an example, two fibers coupled end-to-end may not be precisely aligned, with the result that the two cores overlap somewhat.
_	Fashion (and wealth) continued to dictate what was worn on these occasions; but in the late eighteenth century, a degree of fossilisation began to set in, with the result that women in attendance at royal courts were still, in the early nineteenth century, to be seen in garments with side-hoops, redolent of forms of dress fashionable in the mid-1700s.
_	The sponsors of the Memphis Open refused to allow the three to play in the Canada Cup with the result that the players withdrew from both events.
_	It has a greater affinity for lead than calcium, with the result that lead chelate is formed by exchange and excreted in the urine, leaving behind harmless calcium.
_	In 1919 and 1920 many of Evan Thomas, Radcliffe's vessels were time chartered to other companies, but 1921 saw the slump really biting with the result that many of the company's vessels were laid up for extended periods simply because no cargoes were available to them.
_	Yan Xishan continued in his attempts to work with both sides, creating the impression among Li's supporters that he was a "stooge" of Chiang, while those who supported Chiang began to bitterly resent Yan for his willingness to work with Li. Because of the rivalry between Chiang and Li, Chiang refused to allow Nationalist troops loyal to him to aid in the defense of Guangxi and Guangdong, with the result that Communist forces occupied Guangdong in October 1949.
_	The plate was of the type intended to produce visiting cards; and another improvisatory aspect of the production is that each of the six stamps on the plate was engraved individually, with the result that no two are identical; each denomination exists in distinctive variants.
_	Before he does, he manages to flirt with the female clerk, Helen Rogers (Anne Jeffreys), with the result that she refuses to identify him in the subsequent line-up after the robbery, even though she recognizes him from a police photo.
_	A second attempt was made with the result that the "Kentwell" was thrown violently against the hull of the "Hopelyn" causing serious damage to the lifeboat, so much so that coxswain Fleming had to get his boat clear of the wreck and sands and return to shore.
_	In the 1750s there was a boom in creating new turnpike trusts with the result that by the end of the 18th century almost all main roads were turnpike roads.
_	Most concern circulates around the result that, consuming too much time for language arts and mathematics may limit children's experience—and curiosity and interest—in sciences.
_	In the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, French furniture of the classic period 1660-1815, has been collected as passionately by non-French "amateurs", with the English in the historical lead, and has set record prices consistently, since the Hamilton Palace sale of 1882, with the result that it is represented in many national museums.
_	She sneaks into the club, with the result that Stanley is banned for violating its "no women" policy.
_	One dealer advertising a so-called "cut price" sale invariably causes other dealers to cut below him in retaliation, with the result that all dealers in the community are forced to sell the particular article at a price which yields no profit.
_	He worked untiringly to secure subscriptions for a capital campaign, with the result that the foundation stone for the cathedral was laid in 1895.
_	He trained locals in leprosy treatment, with the result that leper colonies in the area became unnecessary.
_	The border between Costa Rica and Panama crosses Paso Canoas from north to south, with the result that the city is both Costa Rican and Panamanian.
_	There was fierce internal and political debates over the use of Douglas DC-9s or Boeing 727s; with the result that Iberia bought Boeing 727s thereby boosting Boeing's flagging production line.
_	The alveoli are open (via the airways) to the atmosphere, with the result that alveolar air pressure is exactly the same as the ambient air pressure at sea level, at altitude, or in any artificial atmosphere (e.g. a diving chamber, or decompression chamber) in which the individual is breathing freely.
_	On July 10, 2003, the Supreme Court judge accepted the prosecution's arguments, with the result that Satō is currently serving a 14-year prison sentence.
_	Additionally, in regard to lighting, by the end of his career (he retired in 1832), Sanquirico adapted to the introduction of gas lighting with the result that "his painted scenery showed a sensitivity to the nuances of light".
_	Because the FBI was keeping Bentley's testimony and its investigation of Remington secret, it raised no objection, with the result that Remington remained in fairly high-level government posts.
_	The organic chemists at [DuPont] replied by synthesizing camphor from the turpentine of Southern pine stumps, with the result that the price of industrial camphor sold in carload lots in 1939 was between 32 cents and 35 cents a pound."
_	The soil over the limestone is a fairly heavy clay which retains water, with the result that it helps keep vegetation alive during times of drought, but creates very wet conditions for long periods during the winter months.
_	A clause in the 1756 Act stipulated that no buildings should be constructed within of the road, with the result that most of the houses along it lay behind substantial gardens.
_	"To save a friend, you would condemn another man with the same stroke, and which one was unknown [...] with the result that only the most vulnerable, the loners, the weakest or the luckless, those with no one to defend them, were left to the hands of the executioner."
_	However, these rulers also encouraged the revival of the ancient Persian dualistic faith of Zoroastrianism and established it as the state religion, with the result that the Christians were increasingly subjected to repressive measures.
_	Host-mediated pathogenesis is often important because the host can respond aggressively to infection with the result that host defense mechanisms do damage to host tissues while the infection is being countered.
_	The southwestern coastline of the Olympic Peninsula is also the northernmost non-glaciated region on the Pacific coast of North America, with the result that – aided by the distance from peaks to the coast at the Last Glacial Maximum being about twice what it is today – it served as a refuge from which plants colonized glaciated regions to the north.
_	This visit was followed by several others, with the result that Leopold III and Lilian fell in love.
_	The LNWR reused numbers and names of withdrawn locomotives, with the result that the numbering system was completely haphazard.
_	In addition to setting an example of courage and valour for his crew, he fought a remarkable strategic battle – with the result that the "Hampshire" sank, the "Dering" retreated, and the "Hudson Bay" was captured complete with its cargo.
_	Websites, as well as word of mouth, are responsible for repeating these misattributions, with the result that they are commonly believed.
_	Unlike most traditional vampires, Wellington's vampires do age to a degree, with the result that their need for blood increases significantly as their body decays over time; the oldest vampire in the series, at over three centuries of age, has reached a point where she will allegedly require five to six gallons of blood just to walk on her own, with younger vampires taking on the responsibility of 'feeding' their elders by bringing them blood.
_	Human factors, however, brought about a change in the equilibrium in the mid-20th century with the result that the entire coastline of the northern Adriatic is now degrading.
_	In fact, European university put many works about the natural world and the study of nature at the center of its curriculum, with the result that the "medieval university laid far greater emphasis on science than does its modern counterpart and descendent."
_	He was so impressed by the result that he circled the reading on the computer printout and wrote the comment "Wow!" on its side, leading to the event's widely used name.
_	Its catchment area is used almost entirely for agricultural purposes with the result that the water of the Luhe is of good quality, enabling many species of fish, crustaceans and mussels to thrive there.
_	He concluded that at least 116,000 combatants and civilians were killed by all sides or died "unnatural" deaths from 1975–80 (if true, this would yield the result that about 15% of the civilian population of East Timor was killed from 1975–80).
_	The Lil'wat and St'at'imc chiefs agreed to the proposal, with the result that the Lil'wat became also known as the Lower St'at'imc, and the former Upper St'at'imc (formerly just St'at'imc) became known as the Upper Lillooet.
_	Attempts were made to restore the ground with the result that a Hambledon v England XI fixture in 1908 appears in the generally accepted list of first-class fixtures.
_	The Chetnik actions in response to Operation Southeast Croatia severely weakened Partisan defences with the result that they suffered significant casualties and lost a great deal of territory.
_	The use of drinking and eating vessels in gold and silver, the ideal in ancient Rome and Persia as well as medieval Christian societies, is prohibited by the Hadiths, with the result that pottery and glass were used for tableware by Muslim elites, as pottery (but less often glass) also was in China, but was much rarer in Europe and Byzantium.
_	The stone is still in its place but has toppled over with the result that the inscription is no longer readable.
_	Investigators, clinicians, and research authors frequently analyze and discuss the effects and efficacy of this intervention as a whole, with the result that it is often difficult to attribute positive or negative outcomes to any of the specific techniques that contribute to guided meditation.
_	Don's correction was not always noticed, with the result that the name "L. scandens" became associated with the illustration of "L. erubescens", creating confusion between the two species.
_	A plant with deep red flowers that grew upon the summit of the hill of Amon Rûdh in Beleriand, with the result that the hill looked as if dripped with blood.
_	When the council finally met on 26 April, the chamber was invaded by members of tenants groups and council staff with the result that the meeting broke up and was cancelled by the Mayor.
_	These vacant homes are often poorly maintained and sometimes attract squatters and/or criminal activity with the result that increasing foreclosures in a neighborhood often serve to further accelerate home price declines in the area.
_	Rents have not fallen as much as home prices with the result that in some affluent neighborhoods homes that were formerly owner occupied are now occupied by renters.
_	Members cannot opt out of such solicitations, with the result that it sometimes appears that a member is soliciting an endorsement for a non-existent skill.
_	Iscoramas were bespoke, hand-made examples of optical engineering, and ISCO quality control never achieved the consistency of contemporaneous Japanese optics, with the result that Iscoramas can often display quality issues which are relatively rare in mass-produced lenses.
_	Song-popularity counters told the owner of the machine the number of times each record was played (A and B side were generally not distinguished), with the result that popular records remained, while lesser-played songs could be replaced.
_	The financial hardship that beset the North American diocese as the result of the Russian Revolution resulted in a degree of administrative chaos, with the result that other national Orthodox communities in North America turned to the Churches in their respective homelands for pastoral care and governance.
_	According to Keynes’s account on p295, wages will not change if there is any unemployment, with the result that the money supply will change to the same extent in wage units.
_	Due to the position of Uelen by the sea coast there are also many instances of fog and mist per year with the result that sunshine hours are very low especially when the adjacent ocean begins to thaw.
_	As "Valparaiso" was blown towards shore, her anchor hooked and broke "Calder"s chains, with the result that "Calder" too wrecked on shore.
_	The entire country became a single electoral district, and mandates were awarded to parties instead of individual candidates, with the result that successful parties often distributed their mandates out of numerical order to candidates on their electoral lists.
_	Scott Atran writes that "publicity is the oxygen of terrorism" and the rapid growth of international communicative networks renders publicity even more potent, with the result that "perhaps never in the history of human conflict have so few people with so few actual means and capabilities frightened so many."
_	For example, a review in 2013 came to the result that oligospermia and azoospermia are significantly associated with being overweight (odds ratio 1.1), obese (odds ratio 1.3) and morbidly obese (odds ratio 2.0), but the cause of this is unknown.
_	Live worms and insects are commonly used as fishing bait, with the result that they are either eaten alive by fish or drowned.
_	In 1977, Heybroek collected the tree in Japan, with the result that there is now a small forest of Japanese elm in southern
_	Barnard was also able to encourage the government to end the gold escort with the result that his company's coaches, equipped with armed guardsmen, would be fully in charge of the movement of gold from the Cariboo to the Coast.
_	The immune system is truly a sentinel system of the body, with the result that health and disease are carefully balanced by the modulated response of each of its various parts, which then also act in concert as a whole.
_	The radio message was not understood at the 716th MP Battalion headquarters who were dealing with multiple other attacks around the city with the result that over the following hour, two more jeep patrols drove through the intersection and were engaged by the VC with 2 more MPs killed and 2 wounded.
_	At the time the emigration started, Israel had a policy of scattering the population around the country, and was experiencing a housing shortage, with the result that Georgian Jews were assigned housing in different parts of the country.
_	Italy was to be the scene of a dispute between the main continental powers, with the result that the Italians were left with only a secondary role in their own destiny.
_	His arguments for paganism (possibly modelled on those of Celsus) are taken up one at a time by Octavius, with the result that the assailant is convinced.
_	Justices Stanley Reed and Felix Frankfurter joined in this dissenting opinion, while Chief Justice Harlan Stone simply agreed with the result that the dissent suggested.
_	In 1858, Prince Alexander came into conflict with members of the Council, with the result that he was compelled to abdicate in favour of Miloš Obrenović, who returned to power for the second time.
_	Despite the 10,000 R.P.M. redline, the oversquare bore and short stroke kept the piston speed low, with the result that the engine always sounded relaxed, even at peak revs.
_	When Wagenaer arrived, he observed that many of the unmarried vrijburgers were beginning to cohabit with their slaves, with the result that 75% of children born to Cape slaves at the time had a Dutch father.
_	A large survey in the United States came to the result that married women had an average of 1.9 children, compared to 1.3 among those cohabiting.
_	The horizontal tails, mounted on top of the fuselages, were similar straight tapered surfaces but set further forward on the fillet on the IS-13, with the result that the IS-12's cut-out for rudder movement in the elevators was not needed.
_	She told him to kiss the first stone he found in the morning on his way to court, and he did so, with the result that he pleaded his case with great eloquence and won.
_	Howard Rutherford Shaw was awarded the Navy Cross for "promptly heading for the submarine with the intent to ram, with the result that it was possible to drop depth charges at the right time and place, damaging the submarine so severely that she was obliged to intern at Santander, Spain, for the remainder of the war."
_	However, the ballot was called into question on procedural grounds, with the result that a new election had to be called three months later.
_	Before white settlers arrived in the area, buffalo were drawn to the spot due to the presence of buffalo grass and fresh springs, with the result that the area was known as prime hunting ground to several tribes of Indians, including the Comanche, Wichita, Kiowa, Apache, Seminole, and Tonkawa.
_	On the way the convoy ran into severe weather with the result that "Prince of Wales", which had also left St Helena with the rest, foundered with the loss of all on board; this had been her maiden voyage.
_	However, Vietnamese appears to have been heavily influenced by its location in the Mainland Southeast Asia linguistic area, with the result that it has acquired or converged toward characteristics such as isolating morphology and phonemically distinctive tones, through processes of tonogenesis.
_	"A law and ordinance was made by Tairdelbach Ua Briain-and no better law was enacted in Mumu for a long time—with the result that neither cow nor horse was housed [at night] but allowed to wander at will."
_	The LNWR reused numbers and names from withdrawn locomotives, with the result that the numbering system was completely haphazard.
_	Lastly, all ammunition came from one source, with the result that all rounds were identical within manufacturing tolerances.
_	These clocks were also known as Act of Parliament clocks because they became popular after the British Parliament passed an Act in 1797 levying a tax on domestic clocks with the result that people relied on public clocks for their time-keeping.
_	In 1917, Breaux's father abandoned the family, driving them into poverty, with the result that for the majority of their income, the family depended on performances at dance halls.
_	An application of this theorem is the result that every class in the ideal class group of a number field contains an integral ideal of norm not exceeding a certain bound, depending on , called Minkowski's bound: the finiteness of the class number of an algebraic number field follows immediately.
_	The decision was announced on June 30, 2008, with the result that the conviction and ban were upheld.
_	In contrast to his predecessor he made sure to maintain good relations with the city elites and regularly consulted with the local notables al-Qasim ibn Muhammad ibn Abi Bakr and Salim ibn 'Abdallah ibn 'Uthman, with the result that his administration soon became extremely popular among the Medinese.
_	During the "power stroke", which causes movement, the AAA ATPase motor domain undergoes a conformational change that causes the microtubule-binding stalk to pivot relative to the cargo-binding tail with the result that one microtubule slides relative to the other (Karp, 2005).
_	Spire sutures are deep, with the result that the whorls are somewhat rounded in profile and can easily be distinguished.
_	Mendel reasoned that each parent in the first cross was a homozygote for different alleles (one parent AA and the other parent aa), that each contributed one allele to the offspring, with the result that all of these hybrids were heterozygotes (Aa), and that one of the two alleles in the hybrid cross dominated expression of the other: A masked a.
_	Deglane was declared the victor, and Johansson was so disgusted with the result that he withdrew from the competition.
_	Many withdrew across the Drina into German-occupied Serbia to avoid being engaged, which severely weakened the Partisan defences with the result that they suffered significant casualties and lost a great deal of territory.
_	In the early days of philately it was the practice to cut the stamp out and dispose of the rest of the wrapper with the result that some intact wrappers are now rare.
_	A link between the two was soon established and Ghana St Mirren received brand new black and white St Mirren FC kits after their Chairman met a supporter, Stuart McIntosh, at the Normandy Hotel near Paisley with the result that McIntosh sent the club the kits.
_	French fire disabled "Boreas" aloft with the result that "Boreas" could not engage "Sirène" again until the following afternoon.
_	Not until 64 years afterwards did this lead to the result that in accordance with the agreed settlement, the Netherlands offered its full apologies to the survivors and paid compensation of 20.000 per person.
_	During the decades following the war, while other mainstream automakers increasingly used components bought in from specialist suppliers, Peugeot stood out on account of the extent to which they manufactured in-house their own components and sub-assemblies, with the result that Peugeot’s Sochaux facility performed an unusually broad range of manufacturing activities.
_	Fearful of the danger of insurrections against him, in 1727 he tested the attitude of his subjects by hiding in his palace for many days, with the result that the nobles and populace were alarmed.
_	Unlike their 36th (Ulster) Division counterparts and the Ulster Volunteers who manned it with their own trained military reserve officers, the southern Volunteers possessed no officers with previous military experience with the result that the War Office had the 16th Division led by English officers, which with the exception of Irish General William Hickie, and the fact that the division did not have its own specific uniforms, was an unpopular decision.
_	As noted above, this Millian view has the result that (1) and (2) express the same proposition.
_	According to the firm's estimates there is only enough ragstone left in the quarry for another four years' quarrying, with the result that new sources of production are being sought.
_	The removal of Gatwick Airport and the surrounding area from Surrey into West Sussex met some fierce local opposition with the result that the parishes of Horley and Charlwood were subsequently returned to Surrey in the eponymous Charlwood and Horley Act 1974, leaving the airport to stay in West Sussex.
_	In September 1970 Ó Caoimh withdrew from the Arms Trial, with the result that the case had to be re-heard after six days of evidence had already been given.
_	Both ships beat on the sharp coral, with the result that they sank quickly.
_	The factory diverted Chief Engineer Jack Williams from AJS 7R development to address the problems and modify the bikes for racing - with the result that Ron Langston and Don Chapman won the prestigious Thruxton 500 long distance endurance race on the AJS Model 31.
_	However, Littleton had denounced the Tammany Hall political machine, with the result that Tammany Boss Charles F. Murphy would not support Littleton's Senate bid and instead supported William F. Sheehan.
_	Ohno commented to the result that monotremes and marsupials were not considered to be ancestors of true mammals, but they have diverged very early from the main line of mammals.
_	A study of singleton live births in the US came to the result that childbirth has a standard deviation of 14 days when gestational age is estimated by first trimester ultrasound, and 16 days when estimated directly by last menstrual period.
_	The said agitation and the violent activity reached a very serious proportion in the last week of June, 1979 with the result that Army had to be called by the State Authorities on 23.6.1979, so as to restore normalcy in the area.
_	They disregarded his advice however, with the result that when Valdez' army returned to continue the siege on May 26, 1574, they were in as poor a condition as they had been previously.
_	A systematic review came to the result that altruism and financial compensation are the main motivations to donate, and to a lesser degree procreation or genetic fatherhood and questions about the donor's own fertility.
_	However, the Sejm neglected to pay for the maintenance of the Army once more, with the result that some units mutinied.
_	By his marked ability and untiring efforts in developing his inexperienced gun crews into a well functioning unit, he maintained an effective defense of his ship against repeated raids by German aircraft, skillfully controlling the fire of the Chase with the result that one enemy plane was shot down and two others probably destroyed.
_	On the other hand, in the first half of the 20th century, the New York community employed a series of "hazzanim" from Holland, with the result that the community's musical tradition remained close to that of Amsterdam.
_	As space was at a premium in the circle, a café and dining room was located on the ground floor behind the stalls and the foyer, with the result that the circle had more seats than the stalls.
_	In early 1938, Street & Smith abandoned its policy of having editors-in-chief, with the result that Tremaine was made redundant.
_	This campaign was energetically pursued after the 1960s, with the result that thousands of small pits have been established, and they produce more than half the country's coal.
_	Domestic distributors have preferred to rely a diet of dubbed Hollywood blockbusters and big-budget Russian movies, with the result that post-independence Kazakh cinema has developed something of a reputation a being more likely to be found in Western art houses and international competitions than on screens in Kazakhstan.
_	The Chiltern Radio Group did this by making use of new technology whereby a disc-jockey interjects with an identification jingle during a networked/syndicated programme by pressing a button with the result that depending on where the listener was, either "Northants 96- The Hot FM" or "Chiltern Radio 97 – The Hot FM" was heard.
_	They arrived at St. John's on 21 September but as no word of their arrival reached their sister back in Galway for another four months, they were thought to be lost at sea, with the result that Solemn Requiem Mass was had for them, and the original copies of their vows were burned.
_	Coluccio Salutati wrote to urge Da Scarperia to search the libraries there, particularly for editions of Homer and Greek dictionaries, with the result that he translated Ptolemy's "Geography" into Latin in 1406.
_	Stark's mind is "rebooted" using information that he had saved when he first injected himself with Extremis, with the result that he loses all memory of the actions he had committed after receiving the Extremis upgrade, although he has spent time researching his activities between then and his restoration.
_	According to former head of the Royal Corps of Naval Constructors R.J. Daniel, when US Admiral Hyman G. Rickover, widely regarded as the father of the nuclear submarine, initially learned of the proposed rafting system for the "Valiant" class he was dismissive of the concept, with the result that the Royal Navy gained an advantage in submarine silencing that the United States Navy did not introduce until considerably later.
_	The stratagem was entirely successful, with the result that two enemy machines were destroyed and two others were believed to crash.
_	Only a year after his son’s birth, on 19 September 1837, Francis died and it seems that contact was lost between his family at Delapré Abbey and that at Castledawson with the result that his son, as he grew up, was not aware of his possible inheritance.
_	"Allmusic" gave the album an editor rating of 2.5 stars out of 5, with William Ruhlmann's critique on the choice of producer, "Producer Flood (of Depeche Mode fame) brought his ominous, beat-heavy approach to the group's already street-smart disco persona, with the result that tracks like "Pretty Boys And Pretty Girls" had an urgency lacking on the more pop-oriented debut.
_	Vernet concluded that in order to succeed the horses would need to be retrained and set to work with the result that by 1828 he had a troop of well-trained horses.
_	On the whole they were well received and increased receipts were taken on the cars, with the result that similar modifications to further cars, believed to be four in number, were made.
_	As the nineteenth century progressed, the western suburbs became increasingly popular as a place for city dwellers to live with the result that the number of St. John's worshipers was in decline.
_	His decision may have been a reaction to the news that Andrew Hannah was on his way back to Merseyside, which could have signalled McLean's drop back into the reserves but as fate would have it Hannah also chose the new club over his former employers with the result that Hannah and McLean became Liverpool's first ever back line partnership.
_	This public sympathy for the Greeks had a significant influence on the eventual decision of Britain, France and Russia to intervene militarily in the Battle of Navarino and secure Greece's independence - with the result that, among other things, within four years Missolonghi fell into Greek hands again.
_	In India, his average was good, but the heat and humidity certainly seemed to take their toll upon his body and he did little in the Tests, with the result that he was not chosen for a Test match in 1952 even though he was gaining speed and straightness and was often extremely formidable despite conditions rarely favouring bowlers.
_	"Another boy, aged 6 years, with marked moral defect was unable to keep his attention even to a game for more than a very short time, and as might be expected, the failure of attention was very noticeable at school, with the result that in some cases the child was backward in school attainments, although in manner and ordinary conversation he appeared as bright and intelligent as any child could be."
_	It is generally quite cold and often raining, with the result that the river can be higher and faster than is perhaps ideal.
_	Márton learned of this and refused the honor when he learned that the government had rejected Hossu's appointment, with the result that Paul reserved Hossu "in pectore" and did not make Márton a cardinal.
_	The bows and spars made them subject to the forces of wind, wave, and the prop wash from the towing vessel, with the result that they often did not follow well.
_	The new mines were dropped by the RAF in the Kiel Canal, the Straits of Dover and the Western Approaches (Operation Maple and Operation Bravado), with the result that very few German vessels were able to reach and attack the invasion fleet.
_	Accurate calibration and image mapping algorithms have been developed with the result that velocity accuracies of ~1–2 m/s are possible.
_	The Bengal regiments took the first 19 numbers with the result that the regiment was renamed simply as 5th Cavalry in 1903.
_	It was also an important resource in the study of the Babylonian Talmud by the Kairouan school of Chananel ben Chushiel and Nissim ben Jacob, with the result that opinions ultimately based on the Jerusalem Talmud found their way into both the Tosafot and the Mishneh Torah of Maimonides.
_	On 13 January 2007, Connex stopped running the Siemens Nexas trains as 3-car sets until the braking issue was resolved, with the result that all services (including evenings and weekends) were operated by 6-car trains.
_	During the run-up to the 2009 European elections Syriza, amid turbulent internal developments, saw its poll share decrease to 4.7%, with the result that only one SYRIZA candidate (Nikos Hountis) was elected to the European Parliament.
_	There had been no follow-up Portuguese campaigns in North Africa, with the result that the Ceuta garrison had little to do, beyond sitting tight and eating through the king's treasury.
_	Ivermectin treatment is particularly effective because it only needs to be taken once or twice a year, needs no refrigeration, and has a wide margin of safety, with the result that it has been widely given by minimally trained community health workers.
_	On 8 March 1609 he was appointed one of a commission for preventing the dilapidation of the bishoprics, and on the 23rd he was appointed, along with George Gledstanes, Archbishop of St. Andrews, to examine the charge against John Fairfull, minister of Dunfermline, of having prayed for the restoration of the banished ministers, with the result that Fairfull was found guilty.
_	For the 2011 remaster, master tapes containing different mixes of "Hold Your Fire" were inadvertently used, with the result that the mix is noticeably different from previous releases in several places; particularly during "Mission", where string parts that were not present on the original release can be heard, and in the introduction to "Tai Shan", where wind chimes have been added.
_	"Revolutionnaire" had no casualties because the French had fired high, aiming for her rigging; the British fired into their quarry with the result that "Unité" suffered nine men killed and 11 wounded.
_	To protect Blake, the KGB was forced to keep the flow of information as normal as possible with the result that the tunnel was a bonanza of intelligence collection for the US and Britain in a world that had yet to witness the U-2 or satellite imagery.
_	Deuchars's style of modelling appealed to Lorimer with the result that he made all the plaster models for the figure work, inside and outside, carved either in stone by Joseph Hayes & his men, in oak by the Clow brothers, or in bronze cast by the Bromsgrove Guild.
_	The resulting Authorized King James Version, published in 1611, has been described as an "everlasting miracle" because its writers (that is, its Translators) sought to "hold themselves consciously poised between the claims of accessibility and beauty, plainness and richness, simplicity and majesty, the people and the king", with the result that the language communicates itself "in a way which is quite unaffected, neither literary nor academic, not historical, nor reconstructionist, but transmitting a nearly incredible immediacy from one end of human civilisation to another."
_	Both medals could be awarded to those who served during 1901 and 1902, but the requirements for the new medal had the result that few were awarded.
_	Barnum enlists clowns to help in building a museum to house his attractions (with expected comical results) and it's up to Charity to encourage him to keep going ("One Brick at a Time"), with the result that "everything about [his] museum was spectacular" ("Museum Song"); however, the museum burns down accidentally.
_	While Creighton's men were searching the house, the story ran, Williamson and Miss Kerr became more intimately acquainted, with the result that he was later compelled to marry her.
_	Throughout the design of the project these first responses and the initial vision were a constant reference point, with the result that the architects achieved a high level of integrity in the execution of the original design concept.
_	By the reign of King Henry VIII, the halfpenny was becoming a coin of lesser importance, and less effort was spent on producing good-quality impressions on the coin blanks, with the result that many of the inscriptions are difficult to read.
_	Brown and Co. About this time a great impetus had been given to the sugar industry in the Straits by the new sugar duties, with the result that Brown and Co. opened in 1846 the Batu Kawan Estate, in Province Wellesley, of which Mr. Braddell became the manager and owner of one quarter ; but the estate got inundated in a very high tide, the crop was lost, and the venture ended.
_	The next submarine in line, "K22" had lost sight of the rest of the flotilla in the mist and veered off the line with the result that she hit "K14".
_	Hancock's highly-strung personality made the demands of live broadcasts a constant worry, with the result that, starting from the autumn 1959 series, all episodes of the series were recorded before transmission.
_	In addition to watching out for naturist's interests in all 50 states of the U.S., he currently watches for anti-nudity legislation in all 254 counties in Texas since that state voted for home rule, with the result that any county in Texas can enact its own anti-nudist ordinances and laws.
_	Additionally, NHS ancillary workers formed picket lines to blockade hospital entrances with the result that many hospitals were reduced to taking emergency patients only.
_	Despite chairman Bob Murray's efforts to secure a transfer fee for the former French international, Sunderland's crippling debts, combined with Laslandes' Premiership wages, put Murray in a weak bargaining position, with the result that Laslandes was released from his contract and joined French first division club Nice at the start of the 2003–04 season.
_	This proved to be too much for the beam engine with the result that the beam broke and the engine was wrecked.
_	Such large numbers by Faroese standards put a considerable strain on transport facilities, with the result that a road tunnel (Vágatunnilin) measuring in length and running under the sea now connects Vágar with the two largest islands in the Faroes and thus the capital Tórshavn.
_	Most cathedrals of the period had a mixture of windows containing plain or grisaille glass and windows containing dense stained glass panels, with the result that the brightness of the former tended to diminish the impact and legibility of the latter.
_	The chalk formation of the hills provides exceptionally good drainage, with the result that most of these valleys are dry; indeed, surface water is quite scarce throughout the Wolds.
_	Morbius has a strong aversion to sunlight, thanks to his photo-sensitive skin which prevents any protection from major sun burn, in contrast to "true" vampires that are incinerated by it, with the result that he can move in daylight but his powers are diminished and he will stick to the shade if circumstances demand him to be active during the day.
_	Such was the shock at the result that Shankly's claim was taken seriously.
_	Problems were encountered with specifications, quality and shortage of machine tools and skilled workers, with the result that the first rifles were not accepted by British inspectors until February 1916.
_	Some of his significant achievements are his discovery, with Douglas Eardley, of a structural instability in orbiting disks of matter, called accretion disks, that form around massive condensed objects such as black holes, with wide application in astronomy; his proof, with David L. Lee, that all gravitation theories obeying the Weak Equivalence Principle (the experimentally verified fact that all objects fall with the same acceleration in a gravitational field) must be metric theories of gravity, that is, must describe gravity as a geometrical warping of time and space; his discovery, independently of Roland Svensson of Sweden, of the negative heat behavior of optically thin, hot thermal plasmas dominated by electron-positron pairs, that is, the result that adding energy to thin hot gases causes their temperature to decrease rather than increase; and his work on unusual radiation processes, such as unsaturated inverse Compton scattering, in thermal media, also with wide application in astrophysics.
_	In the second election, Arsi Oromo voters were intimidated, and the majority prevented from voting with the result that a Christian northerner was elected.
_	On the other hand, a systematic review and meta-analysis of existing randomized controlled trials came to the result that there is no evidence of a beneficial effect of PGP as measured by live birth rate.
_	Herbert was Governor of Aberystwyth in 1644 and of Newport in 1645, but he took the Negative Oath and on 6 March 1647 "petitioned to compound", with the result that he was fined £1,000 as the price of making his peace with parliament.
_	WSA mandates to use available shipping space had driven the ports to fill every available space so that some material not actually required by the overseas command was loaded with the result that NYPOE had failed to heed supply instructions to cease automatic ammunition shipping to North Africa and "Ammunition and ration stocks in North Africa early in 1943 rose to embarrassingly high levels" due to consideration of those shipping requirements over supply requirements.
_	In some instances French troops and the Garde Indochinoise were able to resist attempts to disarm them, with the result that fighting took place in Saigon, Hanoi, Haiphong and Nha Trang and the Northern frontier.
_	Among the Parsis of the cities, who were accustomed to English language literature, Haug's ideas were more often repeated than those of the Gujarati language objections of the priests, with the result that Haug's ideas became well entrenched and are today almost universally accepted as doctrine.
_	A systematic raid on the Treasury is in full swing with the result that Dr. Grau will probably find empty coffers when he takes office on October 10.
_	However, it was not decoded and transcribed in time, with the result that the attack took place while the two nations were technically still at peace.
_	He also erected a stage in Lincoln's Inn Fields, but the inhabitants intervened again, with the result that his performances there were inhibited.
_	In many instances smaller urban districts were merged with their surrounding rural districts, with the result that new districts emerged covering rural as well as urban parishes.
_	The abolitionist Liberty Party also fielded a candidate, with the result that none of the candidates won the needed majority.
_	This whole area was levelled flat for the purpose of this construction, with the result that was removed from the island's previous overall height.
_	Donal III joined the so-called Irish Rebellion of 1641 under Donough MacCarthy, Viscount Muskerry, with the result that his lands were later wasted and two of his castles blown up by the Cromwellians.
_	However, he did re-arrange the music to suit the singers' voices and in addition (as Galatopoulos states), Romani took on the re-construction of the libretto with the result that "out of the whole of Bianca, the only pieces entirely unchanged are the big duet and the romanza; everything else is altered, and about half of it is new".
_	By working together with faculty, librarians were involved in specific courses at Earlham College and were thus able to structure their instruction towards specific assignments, with the result that the instruction became directly relevant to students’ interests.
_	On March 16, 2012, the Wisconsin Judicial Commission filed an ethics complaint against Prosser, "recommending that the court discipline him for alleged misconduct", however, three conservative members of the court recused themselves from the matter, with the result that no quorum existed, and no decision could be made.
_	Later, the Caltech physics department was sufficiently impressed by the result that panels were installed permanently.
_	Port of Dunglass farm, about , consists of Dunglass Island in the river and the embankment here broke, with the result that over twenty acres was covered with a thick layer of gravel that renders it unfit for further tillage.
_	He and "Drakengard 2"s director Akira Yasui suffered from creative differences, with the result that Yoko termed their relationship on the project as a "love-hate" story in a 2013 interview concerning the series.
_	In 2005, PHI resumed the use of the Delmarva Power and ACE brands for purposes of operations, with the result that Conectiv Energy was the only remaining Conectiv brand and was restricted for PHI's energy production facilities.
_	By 1719, procuring the incorporation of a company had become difficult, with the result that it was cheaper for speculators to buy up the patent of an existing company than to obtain a new one.
_	Objections by his wives resulted in the adoption of polyandry with the result that extremely complex collateral relationships of in-laws developed.
_	However, his corporate espionage is uncovered by Bruce Wayne/Batman, with Wayne informing the board that they will deliver Luthor only ineffective versions of the components he demands from Wayne Enterprises, with the result that the laser fails to work when the missiles are launched.
_	After the elections in 1890, the alliance already mentioned between the old "Lantmanna" party and the representatives of the towns had the result that the Liberals in the Second Chamber, to whom the representatives of the towns mostly belonged, were now in a position to decide the policy which the two united parties should follow.
_	However, Britain was at war almost continuously during the 18th and early 19th centuries with the result that packet ships did get involved in naval engagements with enemy warships and privateers, and were, occasionally, captured.
_	Missing episodes were returned from overseas broadcasters, mainly from those in Europe, New Zealand and Australia, with the result that all full-length episodes now exist in the original colour format.
_	The committee found that the arrangements had all been set up in favour of Classen with the result that he had to give up the Kronborg rifle factory, which was transferred to Heinrich Carl von Schimmelmann, and pay 100,000 rigsdaler for Frederiksværk without any guarantee of contracts from the state.
_	A man-hunt ensues, with the result that the East German security services eventually realise that they have a substantial spy case on their hands.
_	The move was soon accomplished but engineers, brakies and men of the 'road' were reluctant to keep Swift Creek as the name for the station with the result that a few thoughtful hours were spent by many thinking of a new name.
_	This was the result that Huffaker was aiming for; all other universes yielded just one population density peak followed by extinction of the predator species in all cases, and extinction, or near extinction of the prey species.
_	Soon, however, war broke out; patriotic Zandonai in 1916 composed a song, "Alla Patria" ("For the Motherland"), dedicated to Italy, with the result that his home and belongings in Sacco (then still in Austro–Hungarian hands) were confiscated (they were returned to him after the war).
_	Encounter Bay is one of four bays on the South Australian coast considered by the Australian government to be a ‘historic bay’ under the "Seas and Submerged Lands Act 1973" and was proclaimed as such in 1987 and again in both 2006 and 2016, with the result that the mouth of the bay is on the territorial seas baseline and the waters within the bay are internal waters as per the definition used in United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea.
_	The dispute went to litigation, with the result that winter faction kept the NALL name and branding, while the fall faction formed the PLL.
_	The brewery kept brewing, and the Sapporo Beer Company was established in 1888, with the result that the brewery would be under the control of the company.
_	However, opposition from Westmount residents as well as instability in the underlying rock formation forced their consolidation into one station, with the result that the tunnel between Vendôme and Place-Saint-Henri is the longest on the Island of Montreal.
_	Hawkes calls this sharing “tolerated theft” and purports that the benefits of reciprocal altruism stem from the result that families will experience “lower daily variation and higher daily average” in their resources.
_	Legal action followed, which the Commoners won, with the result that the Court of Sewers were again responsible for drainage matters, but the ditches and sluices remained ruined for many year.
_	Charroux's publisher contacted Von Däniken's in March 1968 concerning evidence of plagiarism, with the result that later printings of "Chariots of the Gods" and "Return to the Stars" at least mentioned Charroux in the bibliography.
_	She also believed that most Roman Catholic writers of her time were stylistically flawed because they were "too arrogant and preachy", with the result that she wrote biographies that read more like fiction.
_	Often, each communications company and each branch of each country's military developed its own spelling alphabet, with the result that one 1959 research effort documented a full 203 different spelling alphabets, comprising 1600 different words, leading the author of the report to ask:
_	Bohn engaged Europa Records in a legal battle for copyright infringement that continues today, with the result that neither the record label nor Bohn were allowed to publish the original music used for the audio books.
_	Unlike towns settled earlier, no specific plan was made for a town center, with the result that Sanbornton Square arose organically as the principal site of civic and religious life in the town.
_	Also, during the early days of the Civil War, when contraband traffic began to flow from Maryland, Colonel Harris detailed an entire battalion of Marines to serve as United States Secret Service operators in the troubled area, with the result that the situation was well in hand within a brief period.
_	They suspiciously distrusted the government, with the result that French morale in the face of the war with Germany was badly prepared.
_	A study of more than 200,000 women came to the result that admission to inpatient care during pregnancy was associated with an 18-fold increase in the risk of venous thromboembolism (VTE) during the stay, and a 6-fold increase in risk in the four weeks after discharge, compared with pregnant women who did not require hospitalization.
_	The trainer aircraft was attacked by twelve Messerschmitt 109's whilst taking off at Calais, but Pilot Officer Deere, with the other pilot, immediately attacked, with the result that three enemy aircraft were shot down, and a further three severely damaged.
_	One succinct version of Bender's method is the result that if "M", "N" are two distinct maximal subgroups of a simple group with "F"("M") ≤ "N" and "F"("N") ≤ "M", then there is a prime "p" such that both "F"("M") and "F"("N") are "p"-groups.
_	Inserting constant molecular weight and constant temperature into the equation for the ideal gas law produces the result that density and pressure, the two remaining variables, depend only on each other.
_	the immortal principle, conjoined with the mortal one, moves backwards and forwards by virtue of its natural power; these two elements keep moving ceaselessly in opposite directions, with the result that people are able to see the one but are unable to see the other (Rig Veda I.164.38); that
_	He quoted from a sworn deposition in which a former Libyan oil minister stated that "he had been close friends with a European promoter hired by Occidental and had kept in touch with him during the bidding on these concessions, with the result that two of the best concessions, worth hundreds of millions dollars, had gone to Occidental."
_	Many of Pougnet's recordings were made in the late 1940s and early 1950s, during the shift from 78rpm to LP records, with the result that classic performances were often replaced by versions by other performers as the newer technology settled down, and have only recently become more widely available again.
_	Its role as fishery hatchery had been identified by the early 20th century with the result that fishing in its waters has been restricted in varying degrees.
_	This would cut me off from the Arabs on the Hedjaz railway; with the result that, shortly, the Turks would regain their power in the Hedjaz.
_	When the Thing and the Human Torch search the multiverse for the missing Richards' family, their first new universe visited is a world where the Thing died in the first battle with Galactus and Doctor Doom saved Earth by transferring his mind into Galactus, with the result that Earth has been spared but Doom's hunger for power has led him to devour every other planet in the universe.
_	This was carried into the Second World War when labour shortages meant that many U class locomotives were painted in plain black, with the result that by 1945 all the class were running in black.
_	On 16 October, B-17's further damaged the ship, with the result that at night she slipped off the reef and sank to a depth of 39 metres at the bow and over 80 metres at the stern, at coordinates 9-25S, 159-55E.
_	He was not reappointed to the position of interior minister when the new Council of Ministers was formed in December 2010; the position of interior minister was left vacant, with the result that Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki held the position of acting interior minister.
_	He packed his own artworks with countless other artists’ works of his collection in a chaotic manner, with the result that the investigators thought that nothing in the collection was significant, and took nothing.
_	By this the Buchanan had a delivery described by a critic as a “high round-arm trundle” and it was said that his sharply spun balls wide of the off-stump could tempt batsmen on wickets free of shooters in a manner that the previously orthodox straight, shortish and fast bowling could never do – with the result that the best professional batsmen constantly fell before Buchanan.
_	In the course of this campaign, women who chose not to wear the hijab were verbally and physically harassed, with the result that the hijab was being worn 'just to avoid problems on the streets'.
_	However, the most widely used version of the third edition did not have the psalter in the same volume, with the result that the full psalter has disappeared from the majority of Church of Scotland congregations.
_	At the 1838 coronation, the organist had attempted to play the instrument and conduct at the same time, with the result that neither function was satisfactory.
_	On the other hand, the lack of unpowered leading wheels have the result that 0-6-0 locomotives are less stable at speed.
_	The spacious lobby (called Lobby 7 after its building number) is an impressive vestibule topped by a small dome that rejects the neoclassical tradition of reducing scale between the interior and exterior, with the result that the "inner space remains at the less intimate urban scale."
_	In classical mechanics, a branch overlapping in physics and applied mathematics, mechanical similarity occurs when the potential energy is a homogeneous function of the positions of the particles, with the result that the trajectories of the particles in the system are geometrically similar paths, differing in size but retaining shape.
_	Despite being a gifted printer, the costings exceeded the quality of work that Yeats produced with the result that the press (like the guild) was often at risk financially.
_	The reviewer further wrote: "Anbazhagan's intentions are quite commendable [...] but the sad thing is that he goes about this task with less subtlety and more sermonizing, with the result that the scenes where he wishes to make a point come across as totally preachy".
_	The programme resulted in more than 3,000 people being vaccinated, with the result that the outbreak was limited to a few dozen people and about twenty deaths.
_	Microsoft Hebrew products (Windows, Office and Internet Explorer) brought logically-ordered Hebrew to common use, with the result that Windows-1255 is the Hebrew encoding that can be found most on the Web, having ousted the visually ordered ISO-8859-8, and preferred to the logically ordered ISO-8859-8-I because it provides for vowel-points.
_	The reports that Lowther obtained from his agent John Spedding indicated the works were experiencing difficulty, with the result that the Company delayed instalments of what they were to advance.
_	However, after the publication of the first issue, the parties entered into a dispute, with the result that SilverFish published a new magazine also entitled "Christian Bookseller".
_	One account recorded by al-Maqqari says that Ziryab inspired the jealousy of his mentor by giving an impressive performance for the caliph Harun al-Rashid (d. 809), with the result that al-Mawsili told him to leave the city.
_	Halfway through the voyage, while sailing south of the small rocky island of Falkonera, the aforementioned refrigerator truck which was carrying oranges and was either left unsecured or was loosely strapped, started banging on the midship loading door which eventually gave in and opened with the result that the truck plummeted into the sea where it was found floating the next morning.
_	In the intervening years, most industrialized countries built nationwide road systems with the result that, towards the end of the period, the ability to negotiate unpaved roads was no longer a prime consideration of automotive design.
_	The trend of donation of personal and family collection to the library continued as late as the 1940s with the result that it has unique pieces of rarities of books and journals dating back to 18th century; this includes donations of personal and family collections from Lala Sri Ram of Delhi, Jamnalal Bajaj of Wardha, Roormal Goenka, Batuk Nath Sharma, Tagore family collection, Jawaharlal Nehru>Nehru Family collection.
_	In Scotland feudalism and its bonds of allegiance to the local laird was associated with the Jacobite risings with the result that the Hanoverian Government took steps to undermine the system.
_	In the process, the length of the church was somewhat reduced, with the result that the tower no longer stands directly beside the basilica.
_	However, he died in March at Newmarket with the result that Robinson successed as envoy.
_	The severe climate and poorly developed infrastructure are partly to blame, but the difficult transition from Soviet times has led to the collapse of a number of companies with the result that many inhabitants have left the region.
_	In late 1943, Hinsley was sent to liaise with the US Navy in Washington, with the result that an agreement was reached in January 1944 to co-operate in exchanging results on Japanese Naval signals
_	In the light of the 1994 Accord on Afrikaner self-determination and the mistake of the South African government to not publish the abolition of the Orania Transitional Representative Council it was very likely that Orania would win the case, with the result that the High Court would cancel the elections scheduled for the next day.
_	During a visit to New York City, in 1816, he called on Father Benedict J. Fenwick, S.J., with the result that he resigned his Episcopalian charge at Fairfield, and went to New York, where he and his wife Jerusha were received into the Roman Catholic Church with their five children, Mary (born 1810); Abigail (born 1811); Susan (born 1813); Samuel (born 1814); and Josephine (born 1816).
_	Some time afterward it happened that they gained the favor of Paul I, 1st Prince Esterházy of Galántha, who was at this time prefect of the county of Oedenburg; he brought his influence to bear upon the city council in behalf of the Jews, with the result that in 1665 they were permitted to enter the city on Tuesdays and Wednesdays on presentation of a ticket, for which they had to pay 8 pfennig; but only one Jew was allowed to enter the city at a time.
_	All of their efforts are ultimately unsuccessful, with the result that all five of the women give birth the following year.
_	During the First World War, which was caused by the Titation Mutilation act, the activity of the society experienced a marked decrease and the link among the three sections got was loosened, with the result that, in 1919, the section in Milan claimed its independence and became the Society of Industrial Chemistry ().
_	It is not uncommon for the diameter of the drum heads to be larger than the diameter of the body, with the result that the drum heads are often seen mounted significantly off-center.
_	In doing so, the vertices of the two enantiomorphs coincide, with the result that the full compound has two triangular prisms incident on each of its vertices.
_	Miguel Alcubierre theorized that it would be possible to create an Alcubierre drive, in which a ship would be enclosed in a "warp bubble" where the space at the front of the bubble is rapidly contracting and the space at the back is rapidly expanding, with the result that the bubble can reach a distant destination much faster than a light beam moving outside the bubble, but without objects inside the bubble locally traveling faster than light.
_	They separated, with the result that she could only capture one.
_	This parish has also attracted Dutch, Spanish, Indian, Maroon, mulatto, English, and European inhabitants from the 17th century onwards, with the result that many observers feel that it has more people of mixed-race ancestry than can be found in any other part of the island.
_	However, because Beech-Nut's methods were as effective as agreements in producing the result that "all who would deal in the company's products are constrained to sell at the suggested prices," the Court held that the securing of the customers' adherence by such methods constituted the creation of an unlawful combination to suppress price competition among the retailers.
_	“It is more burdensome for a small bank to keep pace with the development of our country than for a large bank, with the result that the effective growth and comparative influence of smaller banks will probably in the future decline in comparison with that of the larger banks.
_	Throughout the 19th, Jellicoe and Scheer received conflicting intelligence, with the result that having reached its rendezvous in the North Sea, the Grand Fleet steered north in the erroneous belief that it had entered a minefield before turning south again.
_	A review in 2013 came to the result that a duration of this co-incubation of about 1 to 4 hours results in significantly higher pregnancy rates than 16 to 24 hours.
_	He appealed for help to Henry III, and again to his son and successor Edward I, with the result that his liability was diminished.
_	The original engine seriously limited its climb rate and maneuverability with the result that the Caudron was withdrawn from active service in February 1940.
_	Much of his work on stratified sets was developed so as to understand the notion of topologically stable maps, and to eventually prove the result that the set of topologically stable mappings between two smooth manifolds is a dense set.
_	Steer returned before he had covered more than half of his itinerary, and on returning failed to have his customs payments refunded, with the result that a hefty sum of £210 was lost to the Press.
_	This Felix was later confused with a Roman martyr named Felix, with the result that he was included in lists of the Popes as Felix II and that the succeeding Popes of the same name (Pope Felix III and Pope Felix IV) were given wrong numerals, as was Antipope Felix V.
_	In his review, Orwell wrote that "The Edge of the Abyss" "raises a real problem" – the "decay in the belief in absolute good and evil", with the result that the "rules of behaviour on which any stable society has to rest are dissolving" and "even the prudential reasons for common decency are being forgotten".
_	She begins by telling how the episode began, injuring her ankle with the result that she was unable to go running, "seeking the self-medication of endorphins".
_	Lubrication of the packing bushes also proved difficult, with the result that the piston rods wore rapidly.
_	For the first time, the government made small claim-holding feasible, with the result that individual miners sold increasing amounts of gold and diamonds to the state-operated Precious Minerals Marketing Company.
_	In 1907 Westinghouse USA went into receivership with the result that executive control of the company was taken away from George Westinghouse, though he remained as President.
_	The property slopes significantly downhill from the south end to the north end, with the result that the playing surface sits well below street level, the elevation at street level is approximately above sea level.
_	On their first date, the couple stayed out all night with the result that she was expelled and he suspended.
_	At the last minute, "Baby's Request" replaced "Cage" and the running order was revised, with the result that the working-band concept became less pronounced.
_	Use of the light weight metals that make it ideal for concealed carry has the result that there is little mass to absorb recoil.
_	When the season ended with the result that came about, it was said that all was forgiven and he would be reinstated.
_	During the 1966–69 "" television series, Shatner and Nimoy's lawyers drafted what Shatner termed a "favored nations clause", with the result that whatever Shatner received — e.g., a pay raise or script control — Nimoy also got and vice versa.
_	The Government was initially applauded by most, but the Labour Party were left in a state of confusion with the loss of several of their most prominent figures, and MacDonald, Philip Snowden and James Henry Thomas did little to explain themselves, with the result that the Labour Party soon swung fully against the government.
_	Efforts to bring public expenditure cuts produced further problems, including a mutiny in the Royal Navy over pay cuts (the Invergordon Mutiny), with the result that the pound sterling came under renewed pressure, and the government was forced to take the radical step of taking the pound off the gold standard altogether.
_	Secondly, the American Association of Advertising Agencies (4A's), instituted a task-force to investigate integrated marketing communications (IMC), with the result that the first official definition was published.
_	But in 1964, the new owners, Henrik and Ruth Berner, modernised the facilities with the result that the castle came back to life.
_	The Franklin Bank's profit fell by as much as 98% compared to the previous year, and Sindona suffered a 40 million dollar loss, with the result that he began losing most of the banks he had acquired over the previous seventeen years.
_	Unfortunately, the commander of the prize crew hoisted too much sail with the result that "Dorade" overturned, drowning all 19 members of the prize crew.
_	In 1875, the construction of the Gisela Railway linked St. Johann to the international railway network, with the result that the economy boomed and tourism began to take hold.
_	In the 1990s, Kaye was diagnosed with mouth floor cancer with the result that he lost the ability to speak.
_	He also granted permission for a lottery to be held to cover the project's financing with the result that the finished church used to be colloquially known as the Lottery Church.
_	The quadratic Casimir invariant can then easily be computed by hand, with the result that
_	The commission, presided over by Justice Peter Mahon QC, concluded that the accident was caused by a correction made to the coordinates of the flight path the night before the disaster, coupled with a failure to inform the flight crew of the change, with the result that the aircraft, instead of being directed by computer down McMurdo Sound (as the crew had been led to believe), was instead re-routed into the path of Mount Erebus.
_	Total strangers saw fit to deprecate him, with the result that he was stricken early with a guilty fear of people and an obsequious impulse to apologize to society for the fact that he was not Henry Fonda."
_	Crucible steel is steel that has been melted in a crucible rather than having been forged, with the result that it is more homogeneous.
_	At another level, individuals may avoid or escape specific short-term consequences contingent on the result that occurs but also avoid or escape long standing aversion contingencies in which those consequences participate.
_	The starting point for this generalization is the result that the sequence of points formula_20 defined by
_	Harvested growths were replanted with new saplings (usually cedar, mahogany and teak) with the result that the industry is very much alive and strong in this part of the island.
_	As a result, Lion was under pressure by independent distributors to come up with similar successes, with the result that many Blue Note albums of this era start with a catchy tune intended for heavy airplay in the United States.
_	His division of the Chronicle's authorship was followed by later authors, with the result that the Continuator was referenced in subsequent historical study footnotes of learned historians that followed him.
_	Soon after leaving port, the wind shifted to west-southwest, raising a heavy sea with the result that most of the British prizes broke their tow ropes, and drifting far to leeward, were only partially resecured.
_	This lucrative practice created incentives for states and counties to convict African Americans, with the result that prison populations in the South became predominately African-American following the Civil War.
_	He sent a papal legate to a synod of bishops convoked by Conrad at Altheim in 916, with the result that the synod ordered Conrad’s opponents to present themselves before Pope John at Rome if they did not appear before another synod for judgement, under pain of excommunication.
_	One of the primary pathways by which food or water become contaminated is from the release of untreated sewage into a drinking water supply or onto cropland, with the result that people who eat or drink contaminated sources become infected.
_	A survey of physicians in the United States came to the result that dermatologists are most satisfied with their choice of specialty followed by radiologists, oncologists, plastic surgeons, and gastroenterologists.
_	The boat action took place under heavy fire with the result that "Topaze" lost one man killed and one man wounded.
_	When this structure collapsed in 1834 Berkshire and Buckinghamshire councils could not agree on the replacement with the result that whereas the former rebuilt their half in iron, the northern half was built by the latter in wood.
_	Jan doesn't agree with their concepts of sacrifice, because long ago when he and Christopher were drafted, they volunteered for experimental drug trials, but Jan lost his nerve at the last moment and Christopher took his for him, with the result that he gained psychic abilities and lost his gender.
_	It has been said that the king was so pleased with the result that he gave Jamesone a ring off his own finger as a reward.
_	However, a recent study comes to the result that the toroidal multipole moments are not a separate multipole family, but rather higher order terms of the electric multipole moments.
_	The product had good 2D and 3D performance but produced poor 3D images with the result that it was derided in reviews, being compared unfavorably with the Voodoo1 and even being nicknamed the "Matrox Mystake".
_	By then, Key Air was operating scheduled passenger flights with Boeing 727s and its financial situation had become challenging with the result that service had to be cut back and aircraft disposed of.
_	Although it was produced with the knowledge and consent of Smith's estate, the executors were so displeased with the result that for several years they rejected any other suggestions of adaptation.
_	Although the camera was capable of 'capturing' motion, it was not a complete success because each lens photographed the subject from a slightly different viewpoint, with the result that foreground elements in the projected scene wove about relative to each other and to the background.
_	Then later on [Crosby, Stills & Nash] were in the studio nitpicking [with the result that] Stephen erased the vocal and put another one on that wasn't nearly as good."
_	He also failed to use the time available to rearrange his battlecruisers into a fighting formation, with the result that they were still manoeuvring when the battle started.
_	Mackay's boldness encouraged others of the Sutherland militia, who were in the hills near at hand, to take part in the affray, with the result that Cromartie was defeated and all his troops were either killed or captured.
_	This forced the House to be prorogued with the result that Cobar Labor MLA, Donald Macdonell, who was unwell but expected to recover, was automatically expelled for non-attendance during an entire session.
_	High altitudes have a tendency to make scenarists just a trifle giddy, with the result that the big climax of the Paramount's new photoplay has the appearance of having been composed during a tail spin."
_	It is said that after the resurrection, the Thomas sent Addai (or Thaddaeus), to the king, with the result that the city was won to the Christian faith.
_	After that, rain returned and most pitches from 20 July onwards were "sticky wickets", with the result that bowlers dominated the latter part of the season.
_	The Tennessee Butler Act was tested in the Scopes Trial of 1925, and continued in effect with the result that evolution was not taught in many schools.
_	To that end he sponsored some of Giovanni Battista Belzoni's excavations in Egypt with the result that tomb KV30, in the Valley of the Kings, is known as Lord Belmore's tomb.
_	In contemporary history, the natural rights synthesis that underlies the legal order ideal has been undone, with the result that the coherence of the rule of law ideal is compromised.
_	The clinic has made the provision of pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP) a priority, with the result that new HIV infection rates in London have dropped dramatically since the introduction of the new policy.
_	Just in front of the root of the iris is the region referred to as the trabecular meshwork, through which the aqueous humour constantly drains out of the eye, with the result that diseases of the iris often have important effects on intraocular pressure and indirectly on vision.
_	There were plans to bolster the 4 Australasians with European riders however these did not come to fruition, with the result that the 4 Australasian riders were up against teams of up to 10 riders.
_	On 18 March the British and a squadron of French ships mounted a more determined attack, with the result that three were sunk and three disabled by undiscovered mines.
_	In 1815, through a Quartermaster in the Prussian army of occupation, Urhan and Stockhausen (who corresponded with Ludwig van Beethoven) obtained a score of Beethoven's "Eroica" Symphony and set it before Habeneck, with the result that the work was introduced to Paris.
_	But in recent months the readers have turned to the reading of red-hot radical publications and anarchistic propaganda, with the result that widespread unrest developed among the cigar workers".
_	This is the result that occurred in reality, and ended with the restoration of the monarchy in France and it taking decades for France to recover its position as a stable and powerful world power.
_	The trend of donation of personal and family collection to the library continued as late as the 1940s with the result that it has unique pieces of rarities of books and journals dating back to the 18th century.
_	With the advent of the Duchy of Cornwall in 1337, the tinners at large were ousted in favour of Duchy 'yes' men with the result that the Government of Cornwall controlled the Cornish Parliament.
_	The retrospective and subjective nature of the works leads to significant emotional events being afforded greater coverage, with the result that issues of sexuality and interactions between the author and other men are highlighted, reflecting the importance of sexuality to identity.
_	Its eastern ridge divides into three parts, with the result that the foot of the mountain stretches along Ullswater from Glenridding to Aira Beck, with two intervening valleys.
_	The village, however, was somewhat further north than anticipated, with the result that initially only Captain James Egan's 2nd Cavalry Company K, of 47 men, including Second Lieutenant John G. Bourke, charged into the village from the south, while the other companies were delayed by the distance and rough terrain.
_	Limited mixing occurs because of the lack of tides and storms, with the result that the fish fauna at the surface is freshwater in composition while that lower down is more marine.
_	With the city on fire everywhere, those fleeing from one burning cellar simply ran into another, with the result that thousands of bodies were found piled up in houses at the end of city blocks.
_	During the late 1970s and 1980s and mid-1990s there were concerns that the water levels within the forest and within neighbouring Warren were falling due to a greater potential evaporation demand caused by afforestation, with the result that winter flooding was not to the same depth and that dune slack pools were drying out sooner.
_	Other objects include groups of symbols, of which some are arranged in no particularly obvious pattern, with the result that neither the order nor the direction of the signs in these groups is readily determinable.
_	She does what he wishes, with the result that he leaves for Germany, never to be heard from again.
_	Due to failing health, however, Hartnell could not participate in any of the regular filming, so his scenes were shot separately at Ealing Studios (not his garden or garage at home, as long suggested by fan legend); in the context of the episode, this is explained as the First Doctor being trapped in a time eddy when he was being sent to assist his future selves, with the result that he can only communicate with his future selves for brief moments over the TARDIS monitor while sitting in a capsule.
_	Historically, Lutherans were the majority, but Communist rule weakened Lutheranism much more than Catholicism, with the result that there are now only slightly more Lutherans than Catholics.
_	But the terms that became established were "tremolo arm" and "vibrato unit", both contrary to standard usage, with the result that electric guitarists traditionally use the terms "vibrato" and "tremolo" in the opposite senses to all other musicians when describing these hardware devices and the effects they produce.
_	Segmented regression with confidence analysis may yield the result that the "dependent" or "response" variable (say Y) behaves differently in the various segments.
_	The land attack failed simultaneously when relief forces were able to cross to Ft. St. Michael across a floating bridge, with the result that Malta was saved for the day.
_	This rejection led to the London and Paris Conferences in September and October, with the result that the Treaty of Brussels was amended by the Protocol signed in Paris on 23 October 1954, which added West Germany and Italy to the Western Union Defence Organization (WUDO).
_	He commended the author for having "successfully woven [his research] together into a coherent narrative, written in a brisk style", though he faulted Irving for having relied too heavily on Lord Cherwell's papers, with the result that he had treated "the problem as primarily one of scientific intelligence and [paid] insufficient attention to other more important aspects of the operation."
_	Kidman herself insisted that the video be used for both a BBC documentary about her career, and also in an American Cinematheque tribute, with the result that the video returned to Australian music video playlists in 2004.
_	Yamaha's later FS1r was the most advanced of their FM synthesizers, adding 8-operator synthesis and formant synthesis (hence FS), but it was a rack-mounted module and never received much attention, and so it was discontinued rapidly, with the result that units today are both hard to find and expensive.
_	Symonds' designs had more stability than was desirable, with the result that they rolled excessively and therefore were poor gun platforms.
_	The latter story was circulated throughout England, with the result that Anne lost some of the popularity she had previously enjoyed.
_	During the broadcasting of "Band Waggon" they attempted to advertise a scouring powder with the chant of "Askeytoff will take it off" with the result that an announcer came on and shut the show down as advertising was strictly prohibited on the BBC.
_	The year 1867 was also the one in which he finished the original orchestral version of his "Night on Bald Mountain" (which, however, Balakirev criticised and refused to conduct, with the result that it was never performed during Mussorgsky's lifetime).
_	Clasps were often issued to an eligible recipient after the medal, with the result that clasps were frequently attached with unofficial rivets, or worn loose on the ribbon if the recipient didn't bother to have them attached.
_	She was so pleased with the result that she declared "My Story" the first album she felt satisfied with.
_	Due to the 1803 land reform in Scania, farms were moved out of the village with the result that Backåra is now chiefly a land register.
_	While working for EMLL Águila Solitaria began bringing a live Eagle with him to the ring, having it perch on his arm until he stepped inside the ring and then often letting it fly free around the arena, sometimes with the result that the eagle would not return voluntarily.
_	Accordingly, on Sir Henry's death, John took possession, but Barbara being of tender years and ward to the king (James I) the question whether she was not entitled as tenant in tail under the original settlement was raised and elaborately argued with the result that a new point in the law of settlement was established, viz. that the barring of an entail by one of two joint tenants in tail, while it is inoperative to put an end to the entail, is yet sufficient to preclude the issue from inheriting.
_	The British system of designating listed buildings has tended to favour pre-20th century buildings, with the result that at the beginning of the 21st century some Carnegie libraries are unprotected and thus at the mercy of the developer once they are no longer required by the local authority.
_	Their destination changed when the ship on which they were travelling was torpedoed, with the result that they ended up not in Mexico but in Trinidad where the British promptly interned them.
_	In German, the distinctive case endings formerly present on nouns have largely disappeared, with the result that the load of distinguishing one case from another is almost entirely carried by determiners and adjectives.
_	Two of the boilers from the withdrawn 918s were transferred to 55 Class engines at that time, with the result that the receiving locomotives effectively became "quasi-918s" for their last few years.
_	This gives the result that apart from when formula_72 and formula_73 which gives formula_74 all other parings of formula_28 and formula_27 must have formula_28 odd with only one of them divisible by formula_78.
_	The new owners were remote, and were more interested in the water supply for Taunton station and for the Bridgwater Dock, than running the canal as a going concern, with the result that the canal deteriorated further.
_	From 1969 to 1971, Nadezhda Agaltsova underwent postgraduate training in the Central Research Institute of Geodesy, Aerial Survey and Cartography, and in 1972 she defended her thesis, with the result that the academic degree of Candidate of Science was conferred upon her.
_	The actual negotiations on the contentious articles were handled by Gregory, with the result that the emperor Justinian II agreed that the Papacy could disregard whichever of the council’s decisions it wished to.
_	In 1987, as the British ambassador to Beirut, Gray unsuccessfully attempted to dissuade Terry Waite from re-entering Beirut without proper protection, with the result that Waite was kidnapped and held for nearly five years.
_	There was an exodus of major clients and other senior staff, with the result that many onlookers thought the UK firm was highly likely to close, while operations in the Middle and Far East could be sold to new owners.
_	It originated as a Z-plan tower house, but has had numerous additions, with the result that both within and without there is a jumble of styles.
_	After that, clandestine marriages or youthful elopements began to proliferate, with the result that ecclesiastical courts had to decide which of a series of marriages that a man was accused of celebrating was the first and therefore the valid one.
_	Originally planned by Schenker as a collection of covers featuring himself and a "revolving all-star cast of guest musicians," the album was labeled and marketed as an MSG album, with the result that Schenker received only a flat fee.
_	The Federal Police and the Army have moved into the city to conduct anti-drug operations; it seems that their activity may have a positive effect; the indices of property crime and murder have fallen since 2010, with the result that Chihuahua is safer now than in years past.
_	Brace received promotion to post captain on 2 April 1800, with the result that Commander George Charles Pulling replaced him.
_	He pioneered the use of cocksfoot and lucerne as grass and feed respectively, with the result that by 1793 he was claiming to have 2,400 sheep in Holkham, as opposed to the 700 kept when he inherited the estates.
_	Concepts of decorum, increasingly sensed as inhibitive and stultifying, were aggressively attacked and deconstructed by writers of the Modernist movement, with the result that readers' expectations were no longer based on decorum, and in consequence the violations of decorum that underlie the wit of mock-heroic, of literary burlesque, and even a sense of bathos, were dulled in the twentieth-century reader.
_	The wind was driving a heavy sea on the beach with the result that it soon dashed the lugger to pieces, and probably cost many of the lugger's crew their lives.
_	The alibis of local butchers and slaughterers were investigated, with the result that they were eliminated from the inquiry.
_	This caused a large hole in her hull with the result that she started taking on water.
_	The Dutch Reformed Church (DRC) of the time had no organised mission activity, with the result that the baptism of slaves were left to the wilfulness of their masters.
_	Tettenborn followed close at their heels, and drove them out of the village of Humbecourt, but found it impossible to penetrate further, as the adjoining villages were full of infantry, who offered the most obstinate resistance; a sure sign that the main body of the French army was close by, with the result that the Allied troops could not approach any nearer.
_	The line was originally built with a single track but no telegraph, with the result that there was a head-on collision between Wool and on 27 September 1847; casualties were light.
_	The northbound "Ponce de Leon" struck the "Royal Palm" with the result that 19 people were killed and 113 were injured, most on the "Ponce de Leon".
_	The strain was reflected in a 4th Army order of General Sixt von Armin on 11 October, acknowledging that although fresh ground holding divisions had defeated attacks, some British troops had advanced a considerable distance, with the result that ground was lost, despite the intervention of "Eingreifdivisionen".
_	Suleman Abdul Wahed was declared disqualified for serving as a member of the Corporation, with the result that Pherozeshah got in automatically; and all the elaborate plans of the caucus were upset.
_	At Malvern, he paid more attention to cricket than to his studies, with the result that, instead of taking the entrance exam for Sandhurst, he chose the alternative route of a Y-cadetship in the Coldstream Guards.
_	Unfortunately, the Allied intelligence picture was confusing and contradictory, with the result that the initial Japanese assault caught the defenders by surprise.
_	Unfortunately, the preservation movement could not stop much development around the site, with the result that the ruins are surrounded by tall buildings and is in no way "visually pure".
_	Faced with growing Khmer Rouge belligerence, the Vietnamese leadership decided in early 1978 to support internal resistance to the Pol Pot regime, with the result that the Eastern Zone became a focus of insurrection.
_	When Fritz Leiber sees a Zeppelin moored at the Empire State Building one afternoon in 1973, he realizes that he has shifted into another timeline — one where a more decisive defeat of Germany at the end of the First World War led to greater international prosperity and a deeper, more acceptable peace, with the result that America was willing to sell Germany helium for use in airships, thereby preventing the Hindenburg disaster.
_	Under these conditions, a return to a commodity money that would curb inflation quickly is politically suicidal, with the result that governments affected by chronic inflation have invariably had to resort to more subtle methods of reducing inflation, such as central bank reforms or indexing price and wage levels to the future value of money.
_	However, later extensions and modifications have used other varieties of stone in other architectural styles, with the result that the whole church has been described as ""an extraordinarily disjointed building.""
_	However, both Voulgaris and, later, French architect de Borroczun's plans were not well received by the locals, with the result that the former had to be revised by Zavos.
_	The Class GMAM was similar in size with a similar coal capacity to the Rhodesia Railways 20th class 4-8-2+2-8-4 Garratt, but it had a voracious appetite for coal and frequently ran low on fuel with the result that trains often had to be dumped.
_	Producer Josef Shaftel met Spiegel with the result that he had to give up his 15% share of the profits, Spiegel had the power to approve every page of the shooting script, and the film, retitled "The Biggest Bundle of Them All" would not be released until six months after "The Happening" (which had a delayed release).
_	During Human embryogenesis the mandibular arch and hyoid arch grow more rapidly than those behind them, with the result that the latter become, to a certain extent, telescoped within the former, and a deep depression, the cervical sinus, is formed on either side of the neck.
_	To a considerable part, marketing strategies in heterogeneous Germany depend on the Nielsengebiete, this even leading to the result that some trademarks or marketing campaigns have only been introduced in some of the Nielsengebiete.
_	He readily accepted their proposal, with the result that a third of the students are Muslim youths from Jenin and the surrounding countryside.
_	A vested interest refers to an inheritance right which has become unconditionally fixed and established in the beneficiary, with the result that it forms an asset in the beneficiary’s estate; it may be disposed of by him or her "inter vivos" or "mortis causa"; and it is normally transmissible to the beneficiary’s heirs on his death (unless the right is purely personal to the beneficiary, such as a usufruct).
_	In other jurisdictions, mutual consent is an incomplete defense, with the result that the misdemeanor is treated as a "petty misdemeanor".
_	He added that "bringing Bryan back for this match was a huge mistake, at least tonight", as "the fans wanted Bryan and they took him away", with the result that it "totally killed Roman in the eyes of those fans", resulting in a "really bad" ending.
_	As the village grew, newer homes began to fill in the lots between the original homes, with the result that many architectural styles are intermixed.
_	Although powerful fighters that will serve Snow loyally, the consequences of summoning them is that Snow must 'pay' the spirits with seven years of her life, with the result that she appears to be in her mid-thirties when she is really only in her early twenties.
_	The Doctor realises that Mondas is entering the Cherrybowl Nebula, a large tract of unstable Space, with the result that the destruction of Mondas is imminent.
_	However, this comes at a price: the jacks and keys for the left hand are inevitably placed in the middle of the instrument's soundboard, with the result that any mechanical noise from these is amplified.
_	This fictional substance gets into player characters, with the result that death is not the end, but merely the perhaps painful step to the next world and the next adventure.
_	This railroad was built about 1880, with the result that commercial activity and residences sprang up in the nearby Town of Traer, and correspondingly declined in the historical village of Buckingham.
_	A survey in the United States of more than 10,000 physicians came to the result that while 24% of physicians would prescribe a treatment that is a placebo simply because the patient wanted treatment, 58% would not, and for the remaining 18%, it would depend on the circumstances.
_	Giving the result that formula_31 is either −4 or 4, as expected.
_	He had lived in Israel for only 8 months when his coach, Paul Rosen, persuaded him to try out for a Canadian league with the result that he spent 2 years playing Tier 2 hockey in Ontario; where Rosen was his legal guardian.
_	However, Pedro Cabral entered into a conflict with the local Arab merchant guilds, with the result that the Portuguese factory was overrun in a riot and up to 70 Portuguese were killed.
_	Kotzev was so pleased with the result that he decided to keep using multiple singers for future albums.
_	With the departure of Michailides from the team's presidency in 1992, a long period of financial mismanagement of the club began, with the result that the club became indebted, and the team declined, especially in the Greek League.
_	At the time, the Disney Studio was in serious financial trouble due to the war in Europe, which caused "Pinocchio" and "Fantasia" to fail at the box office, with the result that "Dumbo" was intended to be a low-budget feature designed to bring revenue to the studio.
_	Fur farming is banned in Germany, Austria, Croatia, the United Kingdom, the Czech Republic (effective in 2019) and Norway In Switzerland, the regulations for fur farming are very strict, with the result that there are no fur farms.
_	By means of it the fore-brain is bent in a ventral direction around the anterior end of the notochord and fore-gut, with the result that the floor of the fore-brain comes to lie almost antiparallel with that of the hind-brain.
_	"Cerf" resisted before surrendering with the result that she sustained two men dangerously wounded, while "Phipps" had three men wounded.
_	After this point, organisms such as sponges extracted silica from the oceans in order to construct tests (skeletons), with the result that the surface oceans no longer became supersaturated with respect to silica when evaporation condensed the mineral.
_	The ISU defines a fall as a loss of control with the result that the majority of the skater's body weight is not on the blade but supported by hands, knees, or buttocks.
_	With phonetic evolution, the forms of each verb tended to be confused with one another, with the result that "estre" finally absorbed "ester"; around the same time, most words beginning with "est-" changed to "ét-" or "êt-".
_	The same alliance of political forces succeeded in suppressing uprisings of the left in other parts of Germany, with the result that the country was completely pacified by late 1919.
_	In the 1990s, these and other researchers, who had been working independently in a variety of different disciplines, discovered each other's work and found valuable parallels between their approaches, with the result that something of a self-aware research tradition began to coalesce.
_	was approved by winning beat then President Nilo Figueiredo, who announced the result that ended with 154 votes for Serginho, 151 Nile and 8 null votes.
_	In fact, the European university put many of these texts at the center of its curriculum, with the result that the "medieval university laid far greater emphasis on science than does its modern counterpart and descendent."
_	In 1993, David Davis lost his seat with the result that there were no unionist councillors from the West Bank, and in 2005 for the first time, no unionist stood for election in the West Bank.
_	He was so pleased with the result that he and the co-editor of Domesday, Abraham Farley, persuaded the Treasury that the typeface should be adopted for the main Domesday project.
_	In 1892, the direction of part of the Chicago River was reversed by the Army Corps of Engineers with the result that the river and much of Chicago's sewage flowed into the canal instead of into Lake Michigan.
_	The original recordings of Hartley's score no longer exist in the BBC archives with the result that there was no isolated score included on the recent DVD release of this story.
_	Thus annuities of class (1) fulfil most perfectly the object of the system as explained above; while those of class (2) have the advantage that in times of emergency their operation can be suspended without any inconvenience or breach of faith, with the result that the resources of government can on such occasions be materially increased, apart from any additional taxation.
_	She participated at the siege of Acre in 1799 with the result that her crew qualified for the Naval General Service Medal issued in 1847.
_	In September 1871 Holloway held the competition with the result that ten architects submitted eleven plans for the asylum.
_	In August 1979, an inquiry on the flag was sent out to the city councils across the region, with the result that 115 approved of the flag, 51 abstained, and 8 were against it.
_	Extensions were also made to the arsenal at Kragujevac in 1925, but the previous deficiencies in the army continued to plague the force, with the result that despite its size, the army could not be expected to contend with a smaller and more modern force for any significant time.
_	Long hours at night spent in prayer had the result that he often 'nodded off' during his lectures.
_	ID2015 was pioneering in its target-focused approach to making design matter, with the result that this is the first ever quantitative analysis of the impact of design activity mounted on this scale.
_	GSS surveys of more than 11,000 Democrats and Republicans conducted between 1996 and 2006 came to the result that the differences in fertility rates are not statistically significant between these parties, with the average Democrat having 1.94 children and the average Republican having 1.91 children.
_	This frame modification turned out to be a weak point in the more powerful rebuilt engine, with the result that she was never again favoured for road work and spent most of her later service life more or less permanently confined to the Culemborg carriage yard.
_	The Brandenburg troops rallied again, but received no effective support from the Danes, with the result that they were thrown back by superior numbers again.
_	Velletri was united with Ostia from 1150 until 1914, when Pope Pius X separated them again, but decreed that whichever cardinal bishop became Dean of the College of Cardinals would keep the suburbicarian see he already held, adding to it that of Ostia, with the result that there continued to be only six cardinal bishops.
_	The game finished and it was not particularly the result that saddened the fans but the results elsewhere and the league table.
_	Three-quarters of the flow through the Revelstoke Dam Powerhouse is regulated water release from Mica Dam, with the result that the reservoir regularly fluctuates by up to .
_	It is one of four bays on the South Australian coast considered by the Australian government to be a ‘historic bay’ under the "Seas and Submerged Lands Act 1973" and proclaimed as such in 1987 and again in 2006 with the result that the mouth of the bay is on the territorial seas baseline and the waters within the bay are internal waters as per the definition used in United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea.
_	An attempt to capture a Bigfoot for analysis subsequently proved fruitless, although it was revealed that the Quicksilver gland gives off pheromones that allow it to attract other Sasquatches (Although this is particularly dangerous since the gland is genetically female, with the result that Darien faced being sexually assaulted by a "male" Bigfoot before he escaped).
_	There, from 2002 to 2008, Eisinger performed introductions to "all" Wagner's operas at matinée recitals, with the result that he was invited to appear at a number of other opera houses both in Germany and abroad.
_	He continued to lobby Congress on the matter, however, with the result that improvements to all of the forts was slow.
_	The famine came about as the result of a large population growth in the previous centuries, with the result that, in the early 14th century the population began to exceed the number that could be sustained by productive capacity of the land and farmers.
_	By mid-1996, McKnight joined them to replace a previous drummer, with the result that all the original members of the Proletariat got reunited in Churn, albeit for a short time.
_	McKenzie and Lee had their differences, with the result that McKenzie did not have as free a role as would have suited him.
_	"Peacock" successfully decoyed them away from "Epervier" and also herself escaped, with the result that both vessels reached Savannah, Georgia, a few days later.
_	During the Civil War, Andrews represented the church in Washington, D.C., to explain why SDA’s believe that participation in combat is contrary to Christian principles, with the result that SDA draftees could apply for noncombatant service.
_	The IDF claimed that the video, lasting 146 seconds, had been "tendentiously edited", with the result that it failed to cover the violence of the clashes that day.
_	Rather, we log what has changed and assume the rest has stayed the same, with the result that we miss some details, as demonstrated in various experiments and illusions, some of which Dennett outlines.
_	A fire consumed all his library and his literary correspondence with other erudite Europeans, among whom was Leibnitz, with the result that, as a man of letters, he is remembered largely for the notes in the commercial enterprise of the "Raccolta di Statue".
_	Rather than attempting to understand "the natural process of demolition, eradication, rebuilding, evasion, and ideological reinterpretation that has permitted ancient rulers and modern groups to claim exclusive possession," archaeologists have instead become active participants in the battle over partisan memory, with the result that archaeology, a seemingly objective science, has exacerbated the ongoing nationalist dispute.
_	This was criticised in 1981 and made illegal in 1988, with the result that it is no longer a requirement that an entertainment professional be a member of Equity.
_	Due to these internal polarizers, LCD shutter-glasses darken the display image of any LCD, plasma, or projector image source, which has the result that images appear dimmer and contrast is lower than for normal non-3D viewing.
_	The end of steel making at East Moors removed the market for the iron ore, with the result that the Llanharry mine ceased production on 25 July 1975, and with it the branch closed.
_	During the discussions Octavian learned that Salvidienus had offered to betray him to Antony, with the result that Salvidienus was prosecuted and either executed or committed suicide.
_	On the way the convoy ran into severe weather with the result that the "Prince of Wales", which had also left St Helena with the rest, foundered with the loss of all on board; this had been her maiden voyage.
_	While still adolescent he received the dignities of the royal household and turned his studies towards Roman (i.e. canon) law, with the result that a Roman gravity of demeanor tempered the gallic richness and brilliance of his discourse.
_	From census to census the definition of literacy has been undergoing changes, with the result that the literacy figure has vacillated irregularly during the last 5 censuses.
_	It was able to be slung under the davits of a liner or on a cargo ship boom with the result that it was limited to a 16-ton tank.
_	There had been very little activity on the site since Roman times with the result that the Roman remains are still in very good condition.
_	Tom Russell, in a reflective article looking back on 35 years as teacher educator, concurs that teacher educators rarely model reflective practice, fail to link reflection clearly and directly to professional learning, and rarely explain what they mean by reflection, with the result that student teachers may complete their initial teacher education with "a muddled and negative view of what reflection is and how it might contribute to their professional learning".
_	As a junior in 1937, Kromer was injured in the first game of the season with the result that "his football effectiveness was over" for the 1939 season.
_	The loans had been repaid by 1831, and the work allowed barge sizes to be increased from 30 tons to 40 tons, with the result that business improved.
_	Berger too slowed suddenly as he tried to pass the Williams and so there was serious congestion behind with the result that Patrese hit Eddie Cheever (Arrows-Megatron).
_	During the 19th century, a number of coffee plantations were established in Coorg with the result that Coorg became one of the largest producers of coffee in the British Empire.
_	On Christmas Eve, 1909, a fire destroyed a large part of the Royal Palace (now used by Parliament), with the result that the Crown Prince's Palace was used temporarily as the residence of the royal family.
_	His punishment became a "cause célèbre" among the Whig and Tory partisans, with the result that he was released after a year.
_	Roland apparently underestimated the demand for the new module with the result that many did not receive the modules until months after its launch.
_	This appeared in a startling and dangerous manner, as the gas ignitied by the arcing of the magnetic switches, with the result that the cast iron covers for the inspection boxes were blown off, and on more than one occasion, hurled into the air.
_	At the moment the world, through the burning of fossil fuels and the clearing of forests is emitting 6.8 tonnes of carbon dioxide per person per year, with the result that over the last century the concentration of carbon dioxide has gone from 280 parts per million to 380 parts per million, a change equivalent to that seen since the depths of the last Ice Age.
_	Legend has it that in publications that did report the World Cup match, so unexpected was the result that it was presumed that the 1–0 scoreline was a typing error and so it was reported that England had won on a scoreline of 10–0 or 10–1.
_	Among other things, the German veteran Esperantist Konstantin Behnert, who knew Varankin in Tver, tells that after the Danzig UK Varankin visited Germany without permission and later incautiously mentioned that - with the result that he had to report monthly to register with the police.
_	"Soleil Royal" tried to escape to the safety of the batteries at Croisic, but pursued her with the result that both were wrecked on the Four Shoal beside "Heros".
_	"Spencer" sailed south-southeast and the other two British vessels sailed southwest by west, with the result that they lost sight of each other.
_	Upon appeal a mistrial was declared, based upon various legal technicalities, with the result that Smith was released from jail having served 32 months.
_	A study with 9vHPV, a 9-valent HPV vaccine that protects against HPV types 6, 11, 16, 18, 31, 33, 45, 52, and 58, came to the result that the rate of high-grade cervical, vulvar, or vaginal disease was the same as when using a quadrivalent HPV vaccine.
_	During the Victorian era, industrial air pollution tended to be worse in the east and south east of London because of the prevailing westerly wind, with the result that the East End was settled more by the working classes, while the western part of the city was home to higher social classes.
_	However, these rulers also encouraged the revival of the ancient Persian dualistic faith of Zoroastrianism and established it as the state religion, with the result that the Christians were increasingly subjected to repressive measures.
_	The river changed its course over time, with the result that the Baradari stands not on the bank but in the waters as an island while the gardens have deteriorated.
_	Additionally, the Danish Design Centre published an "Evaluation of the Importance of Design" in 2006, with the result that most companies considered design as a promoter for innovation (71%), as a growth potential for the company (79%), and to make products more user friendly (71%).
_	A meta-analysis came to the result that the optimal daily recombinant FSH stimulation dose is 150 IU/day in presumed normal responders younger than 39 years undergoing IVF.
_	Although the B4x class (as it was designated) now had larger and more modern superheated boilers the rebuilds retained the valve gear of the originals, with the result that the locomotives were throttled by small short-travel valves which could not pass the steam needed for an improved performance.
_	The practice grew extensively under the Qing, with the result that, by the end of the 19th century, the penal code had lost something of its internal coherence and become an unwieldy instrument.
_	In the 1870s and 1880s Civil War veterans and immigrants from Europe came by the thousands to take up land in Nebraska, with the result that despite severe droughts, grasshopper plagues, economic distress, and other harsh conditions the frontier line of settlement pushed steadily westward.
_	Malaria is a significant problem in parts of the province with the result that the rate of infant mortality caused by malaria, in recent years, as been the highest across Indonesia.
_	In the early part of the year a deputation from Nottingham Corporation visited the cable-operated tramway system at Edinburgh and the overhead electric systems at Bristol and Dover, with the result that on 28 March the Tramways Committee recommended to the City Council that the proposed electric tramways should be operated on the overhead electric system.
_	Penry joined the consultation, with the result that plans were made to disseminate through the country further tracts.
_	By then it was too late and the disease spread widely in the colony with the result that several children died, including one of the sons of the governor, Lieutenant General Sir Ralph Darling.
_	The same mechanism is used in the 1980s toy Rubik's Magic, but with plastic filaments run diagonally across squares, with the result that the squares can hinge along either of two "adjacent" sides.
_	Again quoting Heisenberg: "One can never make an explosive with slow neutrons, not even with the heavy water machine, as then the neutrons only go with thermal speed, with the result that the reaction is so slow that the thing explodes sooner, before the reaction is complete."
_	Throughout the 19th, Jellicoe and Scheer received conflicting intelligence, with the result that having reached its rendezvous in the North Sea, the Grand Fleet steered north in the erroneous belief that it had entered a minefield before turning south again.
_	All the other jockeys took the same stance, with the result that all four runners stood still at the start.
_	Bingham passed on the intelligence with the result that the British at Poona were able to capture the Frenchmen.
_	The tendering system is open to transport operators from a global market, with the result that some London bus services are now operated by international groups such as RATP Group, the state-owned operator of the Paris public transport system.
_	At the soirées of the rich he sang boleros, with the result that the wealthy young became enthusiastic about the guitar.
_	While the songwriting was credited to Wilson, Porter and Levy, Aladdin also claimed the publishing rights, which Porter had only a few weeks earlier sold to the E.H. Morris Publishing Company for an advance of $5,000, with the result that Forrest and Levy received very little of the songwriting royalties due them.
_	Some differences in the chemistry between pyrethrins and synthetic pyrethroids have the result that synthetic pyrethroids have relatively longer environmental persistence than do pyrethrins.
_	Consequently, they lose their moisture before reaching Djibouti and Somalia, with the result that most of the Horn receives little rainfall during the monsoon season.
_	"There is one licence to every 126 inhabitants (in Farnham), with the result that during the eight months I have been in the district I have seen more drunk people than during the previous 12 years in Adelaide, with a population more than ten times as large.
_	The WHO took Sri Lanka's experience to the rest of the World, with the result that by 2000:
_	Wood then stated that a wave crashed over the port beam of the "Fenella" with such force that it swept away the seat, dispersing its occupants, with the result that Mc Combe and Miss Clucas were washed up opposite the saloon door.
_	The art historian Jean Clay said Ingres "proceeded always from certitude to certitude, with the result that even his freest sketches reveal the same kind of execution as that found in the final works."
_	Asimov was so pleased with the result that he decided that his ideas deserved a wider audience, and so as soon as he finished writing the article he expanded it into a Black Widowers mystery story, "The Ultimate Crime," for publication in "More Tales of the Black Widowers".
_	In March Johnson decided to restrict future bombing with the result that 90 percent of North Vietnam's population and 75 percent of its territory was off-limits to bombing.
_	It may also expel breeders who do not conform to accepted standards of behaviour and ethics, with the result that their cats may be disqualified from its shows.
_	came on the scene shortly before the denouement of the action, with the result that the French commander drove his vessel on shore at Ocoa Bay (now in the Dominican Republic), enabling him and his surviving crew to flee before the British retrieved their quarry.
_	At the time of the merger with PNB, Nedungadi Bank's shares had zero value, with the result that its shareholders received no payment for their shares.
_	The main reason was King Gustav Vasa's wish to control and censor all publications, with the result that only the Bible and a few other religious works were published.
_	By February 1761 Argyll had made it clear he would oppose reselection of Pryse for Inverness-shire, with the result that the latter, with the support of the Earl of Bute, stood for and won the Nairnshire seat.
_	She had a crew of 90 men, but her captain, Don Joaquin de la Cheva and most of his officers were ashore, with the result that there were only 75 on aboard.
_	The operation was thwarted by the presence of the Italian Fleet at sea, which prompted a premature take-off of the fighters, and bad weather, with the result that only five aircraft reached Malta.
_	Penning sluices were fitted to the bridges at Bawdrip and Greylake, to allow the water to be used for irrigation, but in many cases, the bridge openings were too small, with the result that water stacked up behind them in flood conditions.
_	Inquiries at Chicago Wine Company and Farr Vintners came up with the result that all four of Koch's bottles originated with Rodenstock.
_	In this success was achieved, with the result that we have been able to place the information so obtained at the disposal of your readers on five days in succession.
_	The owner said, "Every piece of wood which was used in this structure was thrown into fire first with the result that we never had to paint it and it got more beautiful as the years went by."
_	The Hospital for Women at 30 Soho Square (at the junction of Frith Street) gradually acquired the first four houses in Frith Street in 1852, 1882 and two in 1909, with the result that No. 5 is the first 'proper' address in Frith Street.
_	The group has always perceived their Kling Klang Studio as a complex music instrument, as well as a sound laboratory; Florian Schneider in particular developed a fascination with music technology, with the result that the technical aspects of sound generation and recording gradually became his main fields of activity within the band.
_	Points are earned when a player plays a domino with the result that the count (the sum of all open ends) is a multiple of five.
_	Recent photographs of the mill show that the brick tower has been clad in weatherboarding with the result that the mill now resembles a many-sided smock mill.
_	His opinion, which differed from that of Kunichika's contemporaries, influenced American collectors for many years, with the result that Japanese prints produced in the second half of the 19th century, especially figure prints, fell out of favor.
_	president Larry Livermore was so displeased with the result that he took his name off of the album, and several involved parties, including singer and guitarist Joe Queer, later regarded it as sub-par.
_	The 6th Louisiana was the most thoroughly Irish of all the Tiger regiments, with the result that the battle in a raging thunderstorm devolved into Celt-on-Celt, hand-to-hand combat, and eventually sputtered to an indecisive end in rain and darkness.
_	The projectile carried two external flanges; as it proceeded toward the muzzle, the flanges were squeezed down, decreasing the diameter with the result that pressure did not drop off as quickly and the projectile was propelled to a higher velocity.
_	Unaware of the incident, the driver continued through the station with the result that two derailed wagons eventually toppled over south of the platforms and obstructed the down fast through line.
_	Under the Treaty of Lausanne of 1923, a new border between Greece and Turkey was established at the Evros river, just east of Pythio, which had the result that the railway from Istanbul to Bulgaria entered Greece at Pythio, then re-entered Turkey at Edirne (Karaağaç railway station), re-entered Greece at Marasia, and finally entered Bulgaria between Ormenio and Svilengrad.
_	Haughey won an open vote by 58 votes to 22, with the result that those TDs who voted against Haughey, including O'Malley, became known as the Gang of 22.
_	On June 11, 2017, another referendum was held, this time with the result that 97% of voters in Puerto Rico voted for statehood, but it had a turnout of only 23%.
_	He believes the U.S. needs a "coordinated existential strategy" to combat the ideology, and that this has been dangerously lacking, with the result that the number of home-grown terrorists is increasing.
_	Consolidation was again earlier adopted when large amendments were found necessary, with the result that by far the greater part of the law is to be found in the act of 1887, which repealed and re-enacted, with amendments, the Coal Mines Acts of 1872 and 1886, and the Stratified Ironstone Mines (Gunpowder) Act 1881.
_	Possibly because on a per-course basis sessionals earn much less than their tenure-stream counterparts, in the last three decades many universities and colleges have developed a heavy reliance on contract faculty, with the result that the Canadian post-secondary educational system has developed a structural reliance on sessional faculty.
_	In 1726 he fixed the standard of the currency and secured French credit by initiating regular payment of interest on the national debt, with the result that in 1738/39 there was a surplus of 15,000,000 "livres" instead of the usual deficit.
_	In one such contest, the Cardiff East by-election in 1942, this was with the result that Fenner Brockway, the ILP candidate, found himself opposed by a Conservative candidate for whom the local Communist Party actively campaigned.
_	Falk was said to have invented the name Mandrake the Magician coincidentally; though there is no written contract, both parties verbally agreed to cross-promote each other, with the result that Mandrake the Magician became recognized throughout North America.
_	The woodland’s density increases with altitude with the result that individual sheoaks will reach a height of and support an understorey of species such as dryland tea tree, ruby saltbush and rock fern.
_	An increasingly frustrated Cross began to withdraw musically and personally, with the result that he was voted out of the group following the band's 1974 tour of Europe and America.
_	At the same time, the Eriksonian approach to identity remained in force, with the result that identity has continued until recently to be used in a largely socio-historical way to refer to qualities of sameness in relation to a person's connection to others and to a particular group of people.
_	This meeting, chaired by Ken Sugawara, drew up draft statutes and nominated temporary officers, with the result that in November 1965, Earl Ingerson called a meeting in Paris to name the association, complete the statutes, elect temporary officers and apply to IUGS for immediate affiliation.
_	The actors representing 'Mr. G.,' 'Mr. L.,' and 'Mr. A.' were dressed so as to resemble the ministers satirised, and the representation elicited a question in the House of Commons and an official visit of the Lord Chamberlain to the theatre, with the result that the actors had to change their 'make-up.
_	Intended for internal security and garrison duties, the 13th's strength contained many men categorised as old or of a medically downgraded condition with the result that few men were well trained.
_	Three of the free kicks were converted to consecutive 50 metre penalties, with the result that Fremantle fullback Michael Johnson walked the length of the ground to kick a goal that gave Fremantle a 33-point lead.
_	His chief play contains political overtones that were interpreted as disloyal to the Manchu regime, with the result that he was expelled from the Imperial Academy and a large number of his associates were dismissed from their government posts.
_	Horace Walpole credited Hall-Stevenson with "a vast deal of original humour and wit", but Smollett and "The Critical Review" were contemptuous, with the result that in 1760 Hall-Stevenson abused Smollett and his associates in "A Nosegay and a Simile for the Reviewers" and "Two Lyrical Epistles, or Margery the Cook Maid, to the Critical Reviewers".
_	At the request of the pope he drew up a report of two hundred pages on the Inquisition in Portugal, with the result that after a judicial inquiry Pope Innocent XI suspended it in Portugal for seven years (1674–81).
_	"Gramophone", Berliner's trademark name, was abandoned in the US in 1900 because of legal complications, with the result that in American English Gramophones and Gramophone records, along with disc records and players made by other manufacturers, were long ago brought under the umbrella term "phonograph", a word which Edison's competitors avoided using but which was never his trademark, simply a generic term he introduced and applied to cylinders, discs, tapes and any other formats capable of carrying a sound-modulated groove.
_	In the UK, proprietary use of the name Gramophone continued for another decade until, in a court case, it was adjudged to have become genericized and so could be used freely by competing disc record makers, with the result that in British English a disc record is called a "gramophone record" and "phonograph record" is traditionally assumed to mean a cylinder.
_	When he was appointed England captain, many in the cricketing establishment held his professionalism against him with the result that Hutton never felt comfortable dealing with the amateurs who ran English cricket at the time.
_	If they do not, then the path in the forest from ancestor to descendant, together with the miscolored edge, form an odd cycle, which is returned from the algorithm together with the result that the graph is not bipartite.
_	However, if the algorithm terminates without detecting an odd cycle of this type, then every edge must be properly colored, and the algorithm returns the coloring together with the result that the graph is bipartite.
_	Greater experimentation in art forms were again permissible, with the result that more sophisticated and subtly critical work began to be produced.
_	However, Martin pushed for a university college in Swansea, urging its necessity upon the Haldane Commission on Welsh university education (1916-18), with the result that it was founded in 1920, developping in later years into Swansea University.
_	Of the solvents with dielectric constant of 10 or less, tetrahydrofuran (THF) is particularly relevant in this context, as it solvates cations strongly with the result that simple electrolytes have sufficient solubility to make the study of ion association possible.
_	Private equity funds, however, typically invest on a longer horizon, with the result that
_	During his final years there, John R. Mott, noted American evangelist and founder of the Student Volunteer Movement (SVM) for Foreign Missions, discovered Henry with the result that he left his teaching position to move to Chicago to join the staff of the SVM.
_	They were poorly equipped and their attack was uncoordinated, with the result that the British batteries at Fort Yorke (the British base) and Massareenes stopped the assault.
_	While the boiler was not pitched very high, Hendrie had still managed to extend the firebox sideways over the trailing driving wheels, with the result that the grate was almost on a level with the bottom of the boiler shell.
_	A persistent myth about the album's origins is that the band were approached by Linn Products and commissioned to make a record that the company could use to demonstrate the quality of their high-specification hi-fi equipment—the company were so pleased with the result that they decided to form a record label specifically to release the resulting album.
_	The development of the first touch rule itself was, in turn, driven by the increasing tendency of duels to be fought to first blood rather than the death, with the result that training for a first touch could result in victory in a duel as well as a sporting encounter, even without killing or disabling the opponent.
_	In the early 1990s the plant has converted from military to civil production, with the result that its space- and defense-related business had reportedly declined to around 15 percent by early 1992.
_	In an excerpt from Erculiani's letter to Garnero, she speculated that the Biblical flood occurred because of an imbalance between earth and man: "[the deluge] occurred because men's presence on earth had increased so much in number, size, and lifespan, that around the time of the sin, the earth element, which dominates men, was much diminished; nor had it been replenished for centuries, with the result that [the earth] was so greatly diminished that it was necessarily swallowed up by water, which had contributed little of itself to [the composition of] men."Erculiani later followed up the statement within her fourth letter, addressed to Queen Anna's "chancellor for Transylvania", Martin Berzevicy (1538-1596), who visited Padua in 1568.
_	Modern scholarship, however, sees the early Irish church as different to but still a part of Roman Christianity, with the result that the Church of Ireland and the Irish Roman Catholic church can both claim descent from St Patrick.
_	"It is more burdensome for a small bank to keep pace with the development of our country than for a large bank, with the result that the effective growth and comparative influence of smaller banks will probably in the future decline in comparison with that of the larger banks."
_	In particular the treaty was amended in 1921 with the result that many other international organisations have a forum within the CIPM to ensure harmonisation of measurement standards across many disciplines.
_	In addition, having the orchestra playing in E-flat appears comparatively to mute the sound of the orchestra compared to the solo violin, because the orchestral string section plays less frequently on open strings, with the result that the solo violin part emerges more clearly and brightly from the orchestral accompaniment.
_	Polish militiamen defended the station until 5:00 in the morning, with the result that the Ukrainians withdrew, but in revenge burned seven houses.
_	So the result that NELL2 blockage reduces the size of SDN-POA suggests that it probably has neuroprotective effect on SDN-POA.
_	Greece following its declaration of independence in 1822, and many of the islanders joined the Greek War of Independence, with the result that the northern portion of the Dodecanese (including Samos) became briefly the Greek provinces of the Eastern Sporades and Southern Sporades.
_	Tolls were reduced by 60 per cent in 1846, with free passage for empty boats from 1847, with the result that much of the coal traffic which had previously used the Barnsley Canal now used the Dearne and Dove.
_	However, US teammate Ryan Dolan had achieved the result that gave the US an Olympic canoeing quota slot for the U.S. at the 2011 Pan American Games in Guadalajara, Mexico on October 28.
_	According to Luchins, Pollard was pressured by "the Pollard people, the more intense members of the cult", with the result that what seemed like a firm deal to accomplish Pollard's release from prison fell apart.
_	Egbert however urged others to succeed where he had failed, with the result that Willibrord and Suidbert led twelve monks on a mission to the Frisians.
_	The routes in place prior to 2006 had not been substantially modified since the 1970s, and some since the 1950s, with the result that many neighbourhoods, particularly the newer suburbs, had poor service.
_	Thus two out of four of the chief divisions of the Mongol empire were suddenly deprived of their sovereigns, with the result that nearly the whole of the successors of Genghis Khan began disputing for the succession.
_	Not knowing the tune, he performed another in its place which displeased the miners ("To be unable to play the tune so named after their trade or calling was to be unworthy of their patronage") with the result that the miners chased him out of town.
_	It was used for CAS operations, though these became rare after late 1944 with the result that many command tanks with this equipment fitted were converted to other roles.
_	It should also be mentioned that real compressors and turbines are not isentropic, but instead have an isentropic efficiency of around 85%, with the result that round-trip storage efficiency for adiabatic systems is also considerably less than perfect.
_	Justice David Ferguson ruled in the plaintiff's favour, with the result that Ford would be removed form office.
_	A study in 2011 came to the result that categories most frequently absent in Wikipedia's drug articles are those of drug interactions and medication use in breastfeeding.
_	During preparation for the reunion scene where the two leads met after more than 8 years apart, the director told them to improvise and rehearse the reactions that they might use, but he secretly taped them, and was so pleased with the result that it was put into the film.
_	Kubota forces were hard-pressed to defend their territory, with the result that the alliance troops had made serious advances before the war's end; Yokote Castle was burned, and by October 7, Morioka troops took Ōdate, one of the Akita domain's castles.
_	The mine uses a number of different commercial explosives, with the result that the mine becomes unstable over time.
_	The boundaries were located in order “to ensure the whole of the Gawler Ranges National Park is within the locality of the same name” with the result that the “existing locality of Paney” ceased to exist after being divided up between Gawler Ranges and the locality of Pygery located to the south.
_	All copper tubes for water service are treated, usually by grit blasting or acid pickling, to remove any films produced during manufacture with the result that Type 1 pitting initiated by carbon films is now very rare.
_	A legend as to how the Doom Bar came about describes how a local fisherman is reputed to have shot a mermaid with an arrow, with the result that she cursed Padstow by putting the sandbar between the harbour and the sea.
_	Like its symbol, the Nāga or coiled serpent, people of this nakshatra are said to have confused emotions and inherent insecurities with the result that no matter how close you are to them, they will attack you to protect themselves.
_	Half a century later it would have become important for the authorities that the family was identified as Jewish, with the result that his mother and sister, along with a number of relatives, would be murdered in Nazi concentration camps.
_	However, acoustically there is little difference between a central vowel and a back vowel, with the result that the two are frequently grouped together into an even broader category of "back vowels", or a category of "non-front vowels".
_	Most of the rest teach in government schools, with the result that very few are in the community-built schools.
_	Unfortunately, the make-up artist failed to order the special dye remover, with the result that many of the actors had to take chemical baths to get the green dye off, and many had a green tint for a long period after production was finished.
_	The Hiroshima Peace Festival Association was established in June (with Hamai as chair and Ishijima as vice-chair), and in July solicited submissions for a song, with the result that the Hiroshima Peace Song was selected on 22 July 1947.
_	On this last point, Grayling's view is that for historical reasons religions have an inflated place in the public domain out of all proportion to the numbers of their adherents or their intrinsic merits, so that their voice and influence is amplified disproportionately: with the result that they can distort such matters as public policy (e.g. on abortion) and science research and education (e.g. stem cells, teaching of evolution).
_	These issues, including the use of RDF, were hotly debated within the OGC community during 1999 and 2000, with the result that the final GML Recommendation Paper contained three GML profiles – two based on DTD, and one on RDF – with one of the DTD’s using a static schema approach.
_	The war effort was costly and the treasury so empty because of it that when the Castro mercenaries were paid for, the state could no longer afford to pay interest on government bonds, with the result that the interest rate was lowered by 0.75%.
_	HL7 Turkey has been focusing a good deal of effort in the past year on raising the country’s awareness of HL7, with the result that HL7 is (unofficially) the standard for Turkish healthcare informatics projects.
_	It lies on the popular path to Ben Lawers from the National Trust for Scotland car park, with the result that many walkers traverse the summit of Beinn Ghlas without realising it.
_	The main undercarriage was a pair of fabric covered mtorcycle type wire wheels mounted at the ends of a horizontal leaf spring fixed to the keel and braced to the fuselage with a pair of V-struts, with the result that the Hurricane sat very close to the ground.
_	Watson experienced considerable difficulty to keep the axle loads within the permissible limits specified by the Chief Civil Engineer, with the result that the ashpan, cab, side running boards and several other parts were made of thinner material than usual.
_	At low temperatures, the Debye model leads to the result that the atomic heat capacity "C" for solids should be proportional to "T", and that for perfect crystalline solids it should become zero at absolute zero.
_	Using formula_26 in this, and simplifying to obtain formula_27, gives the result that "TSS" = "ESS" + "RSS" if and only if formula_28.
_	This proves that the condition holds for the result that "TSS" = "ESS" + "RSS".
_	One new pair of pictures was added to Tom's book and three new pairs of pictures to Peter's book with the result that there were eight pairs of pictures in both books.
_	The Cavaliers had advanced from Aylesford towards Tonbridge, but the Parliamentarian soldiers had marched to block their movements, bombarded them and forced their surrender, with the result that 300 were captured and 300 escaped.
_	Culturally, the Jicarilla were heavily influenced by the Plains Indians to their east and the Pueblo Indians to their west, with the result that their own culture exhibited a combination of nomadic hunting and settled farming characteristics.
_	Hill song humorously describes a garden filled with punning references to the singer's lost love (who ran off with Gus, the gardener, with the result that ". . . the fungus there reminds me of the fun Gus is having with you . . . ").
_	Often, school toilets for girls (if they even exist) are missing bins for menstrual waste collection with the result that pads may be spread all around the school compound area.
_	In actively decomposing waste, the temperature rises and the pH falls rapidly with the result that many metal ions that are relatively insoluble at neutral pH become dissolved in the developing leachate.
_	In trisyllabic words with the grave accent, the second fall in pitch is distributed across the second and third syllables, with the result that the pitches are mid–low falling, high–mid falling, and low, respectively:
_	Whitlam was delayed in leaving Parliament House, while Fraser left slightly early, with the result that Fraser arrived at Yarralumla first.
_	However, demutualisation would give control away from individual members and to institutional investors, with the result that motorists' interests would have less representation in governance.
_	That is, he forbade any of the other officials to leave the building, with the result that some of his collaborators were killed, while he himself slunk away until after the explosion. …
_	Not far from the station, the common was ripe for development with the result that the Keymer and Clayton portion were enclosed in 1828 and 1855 respectively.
_	The value of the integral is formula_57, giving the result that, for a perfect blackbody surface:
_	Throughout 1917 Germany began to deploy increasing numbers of fixed-wing bombers, with the result that the number of airship raids decreased rapidly in favour of raids by such aircraft.
_	At first the SSPCK avoided using the Gaelic language with the result that pupils ended up learning by rote without understanding what they were reading.
_	In admiration for the feat, Pellew's squadron gave up their share of the prize money, with the result that it accrued in its entirety to the cutting-out party.
_	At the moment the assassins shoot, Hamlet falls to the ground with the result that they shoot one another instead of him.
_	Since the mid-1990s, the topics of market risk and credit risk have been the subject of much debate and research, with the result that financial institutions have made significant progress in the identification, measurement and management of both these forms of risk.
_	It appears that David excavated too deeply for the foundations of the Temple, with the result that earth's deepest floods broke forth, and nearly inundated the earth.
_	For the next three years it was consistently Australia's top-rating television program and, not surprisingly, its huge popularity attracted advertisers to Ten "en masse", with the result that its revenue increased significantly from A$1 million in 1971 to more than A$10 million in 1972.
_	Rogers, on 15 October 1888, renewed a correspondence with the Secretary of State for War, with the result that the Major General commanding forces in North Britain was authorised to deliver the weapon to his care for preservation in the Wallace Monument.
_	The western and southern flanks of Ben Nevis rise in about from the floor of Glen Nevis – the longest and steepest hill slope in Britain – with the result that the mountain presents an aspect of massive bulk on this side.
_	In contrast to rear projection, in front projection the background image is projected onto both the performer and a highly reflective background screen, with the result that the projected image is bounced off the screen and into the lens of a camera.
_	It was located in the estate of the Frise texts Musil ignored, with the result that additional chapters to the novel "The Man Without Qualities" were not published, and also the order of the published chapter was incorrect.
_	"Huzelle" was low on provision with the result that a five-year-old child died while she was in Plymouth Sound; as she anchored at Catwater, M.P. Symonds, the broker for the prize, delivered fresh provisions to "Huzelle".
_	The massive cylinders that were required on locomotives in the United States for high tractive effort had the result that no reasonably sized valves could admit and exhaust steam at a sufficient rate to permit fast running.
_	Signals are often sampled at the minimum rate required, for economy, with the result that the quantization noise introduced is white noise spread over the whole pass band of the converter.
_	The incident convinced Charles that it was time to leave Malaya with the result that the estate was sold, and Charles and Muriel moved to Cape Town.
_	Protection was granted on 4 April 2008, with the result that only pies made within a designated zone around Melton, and using the traditional recipe including uncured pork, are allowed to carry the Melton Mowbray name on their packaging.
_	A business meeting of the Society held at his home to consult on works of charity in 1670 was interrupted by informers, with the result that Penford and others were heavily fined.
_	This made him start to hinder its progress, with the result that, finally, from the original project only one of the bays was built, with a total area of 1344 square meters.
_	The UNCC adopted a policy of paying individuals first, with the result that the remaining sum is owed entirely to a government entity, specifically the state oil company of Kuwait.
_	In some birds, antioxidants are diverted from maintaining the body to reproduction for this reason with the result that they have accelerated senescence Related to this, birds can show their biological capacity to afford the cost of diverting antioxidants (such as carotenoids) in the form of pigments into plumage as a costly signal.
_	Sonográfica still exists, but it is far from being the business motivating national talent that it was when it started, with the result that it has been affected by the increase in piracy and by the absence of a link with the Empresas 1BC, which provided support in their early days.
_	He was so excited by the result that he insisted that the episodes be extended to fifty minutes.
_	The project was not supported by the Borough Council, which caused controversy in the area, and local newspaper the "Clitheroe Advertiser and Times"' held a poll which returned the result that 94% agreed that the Ribble Valley Borough Council were wrong not to fund the project and assist its long-term success.
_	Lam Son 54, Hickory, Belt Tight and Beau Charger also resulted in the removal of the entire civilian population from the area with the result that it was all now a free fire zone.
_	Although i-mutation was originally triggered by an or in the syllable following the affected vowel, by the time of the surviving Old English texts, the or had generally changed (usually to ) or been lost entirely, with the result that i-mutation generally appears as a morphological process that affects a certain (seemingly arbitrary) set of forms.
_	The Colt ACR was Colt's entry in the U.S. DoD Advanced Combat Rifle program, which concluded with the result that none of the entrants achieved enough of an improvement over the M16 to be worth the cost.
_	Because of the transition to computer animation, many additional support positions have become essential, with the result that the animator has become but one component of a very long and highly specialized production pipeline.
_	In the case of hill castles, the topographic features of the terrain had to be taken account of, with the result that the outer bailey was usually slightly lower than the inner ward, hence the alternative names of "lower bailey" or "lower ward".
_	Thirty-five years later, in 1508, the only two surviving males of the family, Magnus and Adolph, formally renounced their rights over the principality with the result that the Anhalt-Köthen line became extinct.
_	Welles avoided attending the rehearsals or finishing the play's final script and instead often went out drinking and socializing with co-star Meredith, with the result that only specific scenes or fragments of the play were ever rehearsed.
_	Duke Frederick Francis was the first member of the confederation to abandon Napoleon, to whose armies he had sent a contingent, and in the following War of the Sixth Coalition he fought against the troops of the First French Empire —with the result that his new allies, Prussia and Russia, now offered his duchy to the Kingdom of Denmark.
_	"The Daily Herald" took the Appeals Court decision to the Washington Supreme Court in "State v. Rinaldo 102 Wn.2d 749 (1984)", which was heard "en banc" with the result that the subpoena itself was quashed on the basis that Rinaldo had not met the threshold requirements to compel such an inspection, while upholding the Court of Appeals ruling in general.
_	He studied, later on, the Old and New Testament writings, with the result that he abandoned his Neo-Platonism for Christianity, and with his wife and his daughter (traditionally named Saint Abra), was baptized and received into the Church.
_	Juul, who at the time was 75 and had long been retired, totally disagreed explaining that the experimental turbine at Gedser was over-dimensioned and a compromise between various options with the result that it was only 40% efficient compared to the Bogø efficiency of 53%.
_	In the cold acid waters of peat bogs there is little decomposition of organic material with the result that the dead sphagnum moss gradually accumulates to form peat.
_	There was a great rush to collect his ashes, with the result that so much soil was removed from the place of his cremation that a pond was created.
_	"The Herald" took the Appeals Court decision to the Washington Supreme Court in "State v. Rinaldo 102 Wn.2d 749 (1984)", which was heard "en banc" with the result that the subpoena itself was quashed on the basis that Rinaldo had not met the threshold requirements to compel such an inspection, while upholding the Court of Appeals ruling in general.
_	In 1907, the economic crisis in the USA severely affected the export market of Gavioli in the German Black Forest town of Waldkirch, centre of the German fairground organ industry, with the result that Gavioli ceased trading there.
_	Following a heart bypass operation, he was forced into an extended period of recuperation, with the result that there was no series that year, with their only appearance being a low-key Christmas special that was largely an extended interview with David Frost.
_	He still has the troll mirror shards in his eye, with the result that he sees all the bad that people have ever done.
_	For example, although he says his duplicates have had active sex lives, he is not sure whether he himself ever has, to the point that he was once uncertain whether he or a dupe had conceived his son Sean with Siryn (with the result that his body absorbed his infant son the first time he held the boy, as his body regarded the baby as another dupe rather than an independent entity).
_	In recent years several key administrative positions have become paid, with the result that paid staff are very entrenched, the focus is more "professional", and programming has become more mainstream.
_	Ken Stone was penalized for roughing on a missed field goal in the first quarter, with the result that the Chiefs got a second chance to kick it.
_	Due to `Abdu'l-Bahá's political activities and alleged accusation against him by Muhammad `Ali, a Commission of Inquiry interviewed `Abdu'l-Bahá in 1905, with the result that he was almost exiled to Fezzan.
_	The GameCube and PlayStation 2 versions, released later, were developed by Ubisoft Shanghai, and are similar to each other, but have many small changes over the originals with the result that they are generally easier.
_	In this structure, the electrical field effect of each input on the output is identical and additive, with the result that whichever input state ("binary 0" or "binary 1") is in the majority becomes the state of the output cell — hence the gate's name.
_	Taxes were raised while British imports were allowed to enter without duty, with the result that the Parisian textile industry very quickly was largely shut down.
_	When such a situation occurs, the external force always acts in the same direction as the motion of the oscillating object, with the result that the amplitude of the oscillation increases indefinitely, as it's shown in the diagram on the right.
_	In the 1930s, the company created a formal vehicle parts division under the MoPar brand (a portmanteau of Motor Parts), with the result that "Mopar" remains a colloquial term for vehicles produced by Chrysler Corporation.
_	When the second Persian vakil was placed in command of a Safavid army in Transoxiana, the Qizilbash, considering it a dishonor to be obliged to serve under him, deserted him on the battlefield with the result that he was slain.
_	Whenever the Pokot descended into the valley, they were harassed and raided by the Samburu, "Until there arose a wizard among the [Pokot] who prepared a charm in the form of a stick, which he placed in the Samburu cattle kraals, with the result that all their cattle died".
_	A Cochrane review came to the result that endometrial injury performed in the month prior to ovarian induction appeared to increase both the live birth rate and clinical pregnancy rate in IVF compared with no endometrial injury.
_	In fact he is the son of a half-pay colonel who at some cost has put him through Eton and Oxford, with the result that Brandon has come to despise any way of life other than that of an aristocratic playboy.
_	The Special Branch of Calcutta Police had sent only one Urdu shorthand reporter to the meeting, with the result that no transcript of the Chief Minister's speech is available.
_	A century later, in the time of Josiah, the prophecy was revised to present Ahaz as the faithless king who rejected God's promise of protection for Jerusalem and the house of David, with the result that God brought Assyria to devastate the land until a new and faithful king (presumably Josiah) would arise.
_	But Comrie also notes that Malotki's "Claim that Hopi has a tense system based on the opposition of future and non-future ... strikes me as questionable: given the wide range of modal uses of the so-called future, it is at least plausible that this is a modal rather than temporal distinction, with the result that Hopi would have no tense distinction."
_	The findings of the Court and the observations of the officers whose duty it is to review and comment on those findings have been considered and it is apparent that the accident was due to the jamming of the elevator controls shortly after take-off with the result that the aircraft became uncontrollable.
_	The first was a censure of Count P de Ségur's work on the campaign of 1812, with the result that he fought a duel with that officer and wounded him.
_	They burnt down many of the houses and set fire to the church with the result that all its timberwork was destroyed leaving only the bare walls.
_	Other parties such as the Alliance, Progressive Unionist Party, Unionist Party of Northern Ireland, Conservatives and the Workers' Party have at times polled significantly, as have independent candidates, with the result that many elections have been won on comparatively low shares of the vote.
_	Howard's allies, the Radical Republicans, won control of Congress in the 1866 elections and imposed Radical Reconstruction, with the result that freedmen were given the vote.
_	At sea level the pulmonary arterial pressure is very low, with the result that the tops of the lungs receive far less blood than the bases, which are relatively over-perfused with blood.
_	With typical rules for Hearts (rules vary slightly) the queen of spades and the two of clubs (sometimes also the jack of diamonds) have special effects, with the result that all four suits have different strategic value.
_	This leads to a game theoretic problem: all members of a group might be better off if an action were taken, and the members of the group contributed to the cost of the action, but many members of the group may make the perfectly rational decision to let others pay for it, then reap the benefits for free, possibly with the result that no action is taken.
_	The result is improved combustion, thereby minimising black smoke, which is evidence of incomplete combustion with the result that unburnt coal particles are ejected through the exhaust.
_	Beginning in the mid-1950s, the formerly strict state liquor licensing laws were progressively relaxed and reformed, with the result that pub trading hours were extended.
_	EEC export restitutions (subsidies) undercut U.S. sales, with the result that farm-state Members of Congress, led by Senator Bob Dole of Kansas, pushed through new legislation authorizing broader subsidization of commercial export sales.
_	With in say, the movie has no relationship with the Secret Rivals trilogy but most of the filming locations took places in South Korea although the story is set in China, which makes the result that it makes a similar storyline as Secret Rivals.
_	However, a systematic review and meta-analysis of existing randomised controlled trials came to the result that there is no evidence of a beneficial effect of PGS with cleavage-stage biopsy as measured by live birth rate.
_	The final vote count, announced on December 23, produced the result that the makeshift electoral regulations had made all but inevitable — a president who garnered less than a majority of the total popular vote.
_	She had met Hans Lübeck in 1928 and married him shortly after that, with the result that sources covering the first part of her political career tend to identify her as Käthe Lübeck.
_	Government launches operating at the mouth of the Malaig river were frequently fired upon, with the result that a camp of men from the 15th Infantry was established at the river.
_	Returning to his former position, Lifar's presence was vehemently opposed by the Opera stagehands with the result that he was not allowed to appear on stage nor to consult with technical staff directly on any productions.
_	He took on the Ku Klux Klan in the October 16, 1945 issue, with the result that "[i]n 1946 the Ku Klux Klan chased him and his family out of the state, and they moved on to New York."
_	the time allowed, with the result that only one side of a controversy has been presented
_	It soon became known as the National School, with the result that the earlier school was demolished.
_	Rainfall decreases from the north to the south, with the result that the northern region of Israel has generally been more economically developed than the southern one of Judah.
_	Around 1920, it became apparent to designers that the wheel arrangement allowed a too limited bunker size for most purposes, with the result that most later designs of large suburban tank classes were of the Hudson or Adriatic wheel arrangement.
_	First Lieutenant Lewis B. Puller, United States Marine Corps, successfully led his forces into five successful engagements against superior numbers of armed bandit forces; namely, at LaVirgen on 16 February 1930, at Los Cedros on 6 June 1930, at Moncotal on 22 July 1930, at Guapinol on 25 July 1930, and at Malacate on 19 August 1930, with the result that the bandits were in each engagement completely routed with losses of nine killed and many wounded.
_	However, in the face of foreign aggression, Licinius' suggestions became unpopular, and both the consuls and the other tribunes argued against Licinius, with the result that enrolment for military service was not hampered.
_	A UK report came to the result that the effects of low-to-moderate alcohol consumption on mortality are age-dependent.
_	A low orbit will have an orbital period of roughly 100 minutes and the Earth will rotate around its polar axis with about 25 deg between successive orbits, with the result that the ground track is shifted towards west with these 25 deg in longitude.
_	The twin shaft-turbine engines used in the Mi-2 develop 40% more power than the Mi-1's piston engines, for barely half the engine weight, with the result that the payload was more than doubled.
_	The pitfall of this approach is that a connection to an anycast address may fail because the network can change the routing of packets in mid-connection due to congestion or changes in the network, with the result that the destination changes mid-connection, though the new destination is not aware of the connection and is not maintaining the connection state.
_	Singing Rooster then sells goods directly to end-consumers and retailers, with the result that farmers earn living wages and contribute to the economy of their villages.
_	The lateral wall of the cecum grows much more rapidly than the medial wall, with the result that the point of attachment of the appendix comes to lie on the medial side.
_	Adverse winds in the Channel and again off the coast of Australia delayed her voyage with the result that she arrived in Hobart on 11 May 1819 after a transit of 172 days.
_	"Huzelle" was low on provision with the result that a five-year-old child died while she was in Plymouth Sound; as she anchored at Catwater, M.P. Symonds, the broker for the prize, sent on board plenty of fresh provisions.
_	Meanwhile, instructions from the Pope arrived in August, written before the peace accord, with the result that papal commissioners excommunicated the rebel barons and suspended Langton from office in early September.
_	This had the result that a small number of congregations and even fewer ministers, mostly in the Highlands, severed their connection with the church and formed the Free Presbyterian Church of Scotland.
_	Board announced an alteration of the docks, with the result that some track alterations were carried out in Snargate Street.
_	According to Kasselmann's experience, obtained at numerous locations, these assertions and conclusions will often lead to maintenance not appropriate to biotope conditions, with the result that plants eventually die off.
_	Some simulations show that the eccentricity of the system's planets may have arisen from a close encounter between the outer planet and a fourth planet, with the result that the fourth planet was ejected from the system or destroyed.
_	A recent renaissance of interest in tourbillons has been met by the industry with increased availability of time pieces bearing the feature, with the result that prices for basic tourbillon models have receded somewhat in recent years (whereas previously they were very rare, in either antiques or new merchandise); however, any time piece that has a tourbillon will cost a great deal more than an equivalent piece without the feature.
_	A number of them were given to various cities that had made a contribution to the war effort, with the result that two of them found their way to Centennial Park.
_	As there are male and female plants, the flowers (cones) of the female plant are fertilized by the pollen of the male flowers with the result that the female flowers form seeds.
_	Though himself instinctively conservative, he determined that it was his duty to give effect to the desire of the majority, with the result that New College led the way in the general reform movement, and from being one of the smallest became the second largest college in Oxford.
_	The constitutions of Holstein and Schleswig were dominated by the Estates system, giving more power to the most affluent members of society, with the result that both Schleswig and Holstein were politically dominated by a predominantly German class of landowners.
_	Many of these people have been doers, not recorders of facts, with the result that our knowledge of the territory’s exploration has not kept pace with the exploration itself.
_	A study in France between 1999 and 2011 came to the result that embryo freezing before administration of gonadotoxic agents to females caused a delay of treatment in 34% of cases, and a live birth in 27% of surviving cases who wanted to become pregnant, with the follow-up time varying between 1 and 13 years.
_	Part of the approved route of the line was a short branch descending from the station to the north harbour to allow for the transfer of passengers and mails to packet steamers operating between Portpatrick and Donaghadee however the Admiralty who had responsibility for port works did not share the enthusiasm for development of mail services with the result that although the railway line was built there was no regular shipping service for trains to connect with.
_	When R. Isaac Nappacha was requested by one in his audience to preach a popular haggadah, and by another a halakic discourse, he answered, "I am like the man who had two wives, one young and one old, and each wishing her husband to resemble her in appearance; the younger pulled out his gray hair while the older pulled out his black hair, with the result that he became entirely bald."
_	As the nineteenth century progressed, the western suburbs became increasingly popular as a place for city dwellers to live with the result that the number of St. John's worshipers was in decline.
_	In the USA, during the 1950s, 60's, and 70's the mental health professions developed somewhat independently of each other with the result that children having difficulty at school would typically be seen by a school counselor or school psychologist.
_	The change is executed if the forecast comes to the result that it is beneficial for the work based on the defined customer expectations.
_	She accused de Sauve ("that Circe") of persuading Henry that she was jealous of de Sauve, with the result that Henry, whose affairs Marguerite had allowed, stopped confiding in her.
_	According to Highway, theatres frequently face or perceive difficulty in finding a suitable cast of First Nations actors, but are reluctant to take the risk of casting non-Indigenousperformers due to their sensitivity around accusations of cultural appropriation, with the result that the plays are often simply passed over instead.
_	The teen told investigators that after smoking a nargila, he threw a lit coal into an open area and was so shocked by the result that he returned to school without telling anyone what he had done.
_	Mr. Joshi stuck to his guns and reported the incident to the higher quarters, with the result that the European Officer had to apologise for his over-bearing conduct.
_	In Lisbon, some signals have a "don't walk" indicator that dances; these "dancing man" signals, created by Daimler AG, were created to encourage pedestrians to wait for the "walk" indicator, with the result that 81% more pedestrians stopped and waited for the "walk" light compared to at crosswalks with conventional signals.
_	A small number of gold £5 pieces were struck in 1953 in order to provide continuity of the series, and again in 1957, but neither of these strikings were released to the public, with the result that they are now valued in the £250,000–£500,000 range.
_	Starting from these five original taxes, the number of taxes subjected to the agreement was extended in successive renewals, with the result that the sum to be paid to the State (the Quota) increased.
_	Tooke was then prosecuted; again, the jury found him not guilty, with the result that the other 800 trials were abandoned.
_	Steinitz's 1894 thesis was on the subject of projective configurations; it contained the result that any abstract description of an incidence structure of three lines per point and three points per line could be realized as a configuration of straight lines in the Euclidean plane with the possible exception of one of the lines.
_	The sinking of the negotiations with Palamiaki led to the new general assembly the members of Olympiacos (24/7/1962), where it was decided to merge the "redcurrants" with the Pamfthiotikos, named Lamiakos, who represented the prefecture in B National in the period 1963–64, but in the same year, the ticket for the category took and Palamiaiki as the champion of the National Team, with the result that Lamia was represented by two clubs in the category.
_	Aidan O'Brien was so delighted by the result that he was unaware until told by journalists that his other runners had finished third and fourth.
_	Animated cartoon films are typically made at reduced frame rates (accomplished by shooting several film frames of the individual drawings) so as to limit production costs, with the result that jerkiness tends to be apparent, especially on older limited animation features.
_	The castle's design had focused on defence, with the result that the guns could not easily be brought to bear on enemy vessels, which had been the original intent of building the fortification by the Camber; some of the angles of fire from the defences were blocked by the entrance and the high water table may have caused serious damp problems on the ground floor.
_	Consequently, having understood this, no one belonging to that tendency had any desire to embrace martyrdom, with the result that, up to now, the faith and true religion have remained unaffected within the bounds of his episcopal authority."
_	Also, it necessitated a quite wide spark gap, with a very high electrical resistance, with the result that most of the electrical energy was used simply to heat up the air in the spark gap.
_	In India despite constitutional protections of certain economic and social rights, including the right to food, and relatively stable democratic institutions, the underprivileged are excluded from actively participating in democratic politics, with the result that their aspirations and priorities are not reflected in public policy.
_	He claimed that Fable had been unofficially 'blackballed' by the major labels, with the result that his business was effectively strangled by the problem of getting its records distributed, since smaller local independent labels like Fable were heavily reliant on the pressing and distribution facilities of the majors.
_	Private equity funds, however, typically invest on a longer horizon, with the result that their income is long-term capital gain, taxable to individuals at a maximum 20% rate.
_	In the 1970s, Donegal-born fiddler Tommy Peoples came across "Kitty O'Neil's Champion" in "1000 Fiddle Tunes" and began playing it in stage performances, recording it in 1982 on his LP "The Iron Man" Peoples, however, mistakenly called the tune "Kitty O'Shea," with the result that other musicians who learned the tune from his playing also subsequently recorded it under that name.
_	Heavily influenced by the UK band, the pair—Bell in particular—wanted to model their songwriting on the Lennon–McCartney partnership, with the result that they credited as many songs as possible on Big Star's debut album to "Bell/Chilton".
_	Her crew put up a strong defense with the result that the British cutting out party suffered six men wounded, half severely or dangerously, one of whom died later; the Americans suffered 19 men wounded, including Southcomb, before they struck.
_	The fact that many young men worked in hospitals, where they had a lot of contact with more progressive Mennonites and the outside world, had the result that many of these men never joined the Amish church.
_	This leads to a simplification of the S-matrix and the result that the coupled port is always in quadrature phase (90°) with the output port.
_	[There is] ... great play between the cart of the dumb-waiter and the guides on which it runs, with the result that the running of the cart is accompanied by a loud noise.
_	There is also a high toll for doing so, with the result that most boaters that enter the river do so as part of a group, so that the cost can be shared.
_	Then Smale–Hirsch immersion theory is the result that this reduces to homotopy theory, and the homotopy principle gives general conditions and reasons for PDRs to reduce to homotopy theory.
_	In February of that year there was a general election, with the result that the Conservative Party came into power with a parliamentary majority of fifty.
_	The late Linda Gullette Hudson, a possible descendant had done considerable genealogical research into her thus this FitzGerald family relationship with the result that it seemed her 1st cousin FitzGerald may in fact be the current Heir male of the body but due to unclear circumstances as further detailed by Linda's cousin James Rogers "of Richard H. Fitz-Gerald, born 17 Oct 1855 in Tipperary, Ireland ... immigrated to the USA in 1885, possibly after schooling in England" (perhaps related to the infamous notoriety of the Baronetcy Creation), their ancestor Richard H Fitz-Gerald did not prove Claim to the Title hence it became dormant or extinct.
_	However, both the muzzle velocity of the standard M3 gun and the quality of the steel used in the M82 APC (armor-piercing capped) shot, while comparable to the 8.8 cm KwK 36 L/56 mounted on the Tiger I, were inferior to the Tiger II's KwK 43 L/71 8.8 cm main gun firing its standard APCBC (armor-piercing capped ballistic cap) shot used by German forces, with the result that the former's penetration fell far short of the standard projectile fired by the German tank.
_	In response, this limitation was abandoned for new codes, with the result that area codes and central office codes could no longer be immediately distinguished by the switching equipment.
_	Due to the closure of park facilities on the north rim of the Grand Canyon during winter, winter maintenance is not undertaken after December 1, with the result that SR 67 is usually closed to vehicular traffic from December 1 until spring.
_	The company seems to have run into financial problems quite early in its existence, with the result that its plays were sold off to printers —; something that theatre companies of the era generally avoided, since publication diminished the unique value of their basic assets, their plays.
_	Although these noblemen had no direct authority over the commune, they could pressure it to elect them to the position of "podestà", a title that Bonconte di Montefeltro managed to obtain in 1213, with the result that Urbino's population rebelled and formed an alliance with the independent commune of Rimini (1228), finally regaining control of the town in 1234.
_	One way of seeing that this is a biased estimator of the standard deviation of the population is to start from the result that "s" is an unbiased estimator for the variance σ of the underlying population if that variance exists and the sample values are drawn independently with replacement.
_	He greatly improved the standing and efficacy of Bellevue Hospital, by insisting that the best medical skill should be employed there, with the result that to-day a course in the Bellevue Hospital practical schooling in medicine and surgesis considered recommendation sufficient as to the capacity of any beginner in the professional practice of medical science.
_	In 1877, "McElwee's father was involved in litigation with Leitrim with the result that McElwee was rendered bankrupt, and his house and farm were sold at auction."
_	A review in 2013 came to the result that infants resulting from IVF (with or without ICSI) have a relative risk of birth defects of 1.32 (95% confidence interval 1.24–1.42) compared to naturally conceived infants.
_	There is no significant air circulation in the cave, with the result that the level of humidity in its atmosphere increases from around 65% at the entrance to up to 75% in the cave's interior.
_	The dispute ended in sabotage when disgruntled contractor employees ran one of Cape Town Railway and Dock's new tender locomotives, no. 4 "Wellington", into a culvert, with the result that it had to be sent to the newly established workshops at Salt River to have some serious damage repaired.
_	Chief among these is the result that the principal who interacts with the borrower, and drives the decision making of the "Servicer" who is newly introduced into the relationship, no longer has an obligation towards the responsibilities associated with the public trust and banking charter that traditionally controlled the loan relationships between banks and their customers.
_	Lustreware was a speciality of Islamic pottery, at least partly because the use of drinking and eating vessels in gold and silver, the ideal in ancient Rome and Persia as well as medieval Christian societies, is prohibited by the Hadiths, with the result that pottery and glass were used for tableware by Muslim elites, when Christian medieval elites still normally used metal for both dishes and cups.
_	In the heat of the dispute, the two factions traded insulting epithets; with the result that the Petitioners became known as the Whigs and their opponents as Tories.
_	The church was the crowning achievement of Basil's building program, and he spared no expense to decorate it as lavishly as possible: other churches and structures in the capital, including the mausoleum of Justinian, were stripped, and the Imperial fleet employed with transporting marble for its construction, with the result that Syracuse, the main Byzantine stronghold in Sicily, was left unsupported and fell to the Arabs.
_	Study of organs of all periods informs this design philosophy, with the result that the resulting sound is not "authentic", but rather serves the music effectively.
_	Caliphal authority in the provinces collapsed during the "Anarchy at Samarra", with the result that by the 870s the central government had lost effective control over most of the Caliphate outside the metropolitan region of Iraq.
_	The "Rolleimatic" was released onto the market without being subjected to the extensive testing that was usual, with the result that it suffered from unreliability, just like the "SL35E" had before it.
_	They were again forced to move as a result of the encastellation of Connacht by Richard Mor de Burgh, with the result that they were dispersed and faded utterly from power.
_	The case of "n" = 1 and field C follows since C is algebraically closed and can also be thought of as a special case of the result that for any analytic function "f" on C, injectivity of "f" implies surjectivity of "f".
_	studied the network congestion and get the result that congestions are more likely to take place at the nodes with high degrees in networks (See Fig. 8), and an efficient approach of selectively enhancing the message-process capability of a small fraction(e.g. 3%) of nodes is shown to perform just as well as enhancing the capability of all nodes.
_	Upon partition, India and Pakistan established national standards that they called "Hindi" and "Urdu," respectively, and attempted to make distinct, with the result that "Hindustani" commonly, but mistakenly, came to be seen as a "mixture" of Hindi and Urdu.
_	The Government of Peru's economic stabilization and liberalization program lowered trade barriers, eliminated restrictions on capital flows, and opened the economy to foreign investment, with the result that Peru now has one of the most open investment regimes in the world.
_	Since the construction of the Berdan Dam, the water of the Tarsus River has been distributed in canals for irrigation, with the result that the waterfall can now be seen only in seasons of very heavy rainfall.
_	Much of the early history of the Grand National was told many years after the events and often from memory with the result that the winner, "Mathew" appears on the winners board at Aintree carrying the modern spelling of Matthew.
_	In January 2009 the London Mayor Boris Johnson said he would not fund the bridge, citing budget cuts due to the credit crunch, with the result that the project was effectively put on ice.
_	There is no direct evidence against Druitt, and since the 1970s, the number of Jack the Ripper suspects has continued to grow, with the result that there are now over 100 different theories about the Ripper's identity.
_	Alta predicted that the planets and the moon would collide, with the result that the earth would be pushed out of its orbit and burned by the sun.
_	(Before standardization, the many different postal rates in different jurisdictions had made fees too unpredictable to prepay all letters with stamps as a matter of course, with the result that recipients of letters—rather than senders—generally paid the postage on them.)
_	The various functions within the Admiralty were not coordinated effectively and lacked inter-dependency with each other, with the result that in 1832, Sir James Graham abolished the Navy Board and merged its functions within those of the Board of Admiralty.
_	As sea level rose in the depositional environment, increasing amounts of carbonate minerals were deposited in the sediment, with the result that the unit grades upward into dolomitic sandstone in the upper Potsdam and then to sandy dolostone at the base of the overlying Theresa Formation.
_	When the vote on the budget was called at 12:45 AM, the chamber was invaded with the result that the meeting was adjourned to the following day.
_	Also, different risk factors can act in synergy, with the result that, for example, two factors that both individually have a relative risk of 2 have a total relative risk of 6 when both are present, or can inhibit each other, somewhat similarly to the interference described for using likelihood ratios.
_	Of the French defeat at the Battle of Agincourt, he wrote that it was caused by the arrogance of the French knights, who charged the English, with the result that "The nobility of France was captured and ransomed like a vile herd of slaves, or else it was slaughtered by an obscure soldiery".
_	However, due to the advent of the motor car and motorised funerals, funerals by train eventually fell out of favour, with the result that the line closed on 23 May 1947, with no funeral having taken place for some years beforehand.
_	Each of these communications disciplines was treated as a "silo"; with little thought to the synergies between them,with the result that many different stakeholders involved in presenting the company's external image throughout the breadth and length of a campaign.
_	He was very impressed with Presley's attitude: "Elvis wanted everything to be right; almost to the point of having tears in his eyes because he—Elvis—felt himself to be struggling to get the result that he envisaged in his head."
_	A review including 29 studies from 9 countries came to the result that the amount of money actual donors received for their donation varied from $10 to €70 per donation or sample.
_	All these alterations had the result that the boiler pitch was raised from to and the weight of the engine was increased from to .
_	Besides Sardinia, the new kingdom with its capital in Turin included Savoy, Piedmont, and Nice with the result that Belvedere from now on was part of the Kingdom of Sardinia which included Savoy, Piedmont, the Comte de Nice and Sardinia and thus it remained until 1860.
_	As of 2013, the City of Onkaparinga had not decided on an official name with the result that the following names are in use - "Jubilee Park" and "A E Young Reserve" names by the South Australian government and "Adventure Playground" in use by the local community.
_	Support for abstraction requires that it should be possible to characterize the result that a function should compute without having to say how it should be computed.
_	Achilles ended on May 30, with the result that NATO forces managed to establish a foothold in enemy territory in Helmand.
_	They agreed on a Cold War consensus to the effect that all Americans were ideologically united, with the result that potentially divisive civil rights issues were not emphasized.
_	Necessary legal clearance for the use of these samples was not obtained, with the result that the mixtape could not be sold in record shops and could only be distributed by word of mouth.
_	The same decision by the Confederate War Department that led to the abandonment of most of the Atlantic coast except for the major ports applied to the Gulf as well, with the result that only Mobile, New Orleans, and Galveston were defended.
_	Queen Isabella and Mortimer opted for peace, with the result that families such the Beaumonts lost considerable property.
_	The D-19's wing area was only slightly higher, with the result that the aspect ratio was increased from 15.4 to 19.4.
_	A review came to the result that one in three actual donors would like counselling to address certain implications of their donation, expecting that counselling could help them to give their decision some thought and to look at all the involved parties in the donation.
_	He suffered from undiagnosed dyslexia, which held him back academically with the result that he had to repeat a year.
_	Caliphal authority in the provinces collapsed during the "Anarchy at Samarra", with the result that by the 870s the central government had lost effective control over most of the Caliphate outside the metropolitan region of Iraq.
_	Cotes wrote a report on the engagement, which he sent to the Admiralty from captivity in Gisors, which the French authorities intercepted and delayed, with the result that the first news of "Thames"<nowiki>'</nowiki> fate did not arrive in Britain until 7 May 1794.
_	One study comparing various home-prepared samples came to the result that regular instant coffee (not decaffeinated) has a median caffeine content of 66 mg per cup (range 29–117 mg per cup), with a median cup size of 225 ml (range 170-285 ml) and a caffeine concentration of 328 µg/ml (range 102-559 µg/ml).
_	This was the result that killed Everway because the Internet department was the backbone of the company.
_	Contact was steady, if irregular, between the SWP and the British Trotskyists, with the result that the Americans exerted what influence they had to encourage the Workers' International League into the International through a fusion with the Revolutionary Socialist League, a union that had been requested by the Emergency Conference.
_	The chalk formation of the hills provides exceptionally good drainage, with the result that most of these valleys are dry.
_	This leads to the result that, for a given pattern of government spending, the method of financing that spending does not affect agents' consumption decisions, and thus, it does not change aggregate demand.
_	with the result that, if we have formula_9, then
_	Historically, no VAT was levied in Jersey, with the result that luxury goods have often been cheaper than in the UK or in France.
_	Water is lost to evaporation, to seepage, and in the many ephemeral wetland systems, with the result that downstream flows are typically smaller than upstream flows.
_	Hill sought to publish his heliochromy formula, Davie obtained a court order banning the sale of Hill's book on the grounds that it libeled him and his committee, with the result that most of the edition was pulped.
_	The petioles are short, and the leaves which cluster close to the ends of the shoots are pale green and downy with the result that the entire tree has a misty, frosty look.
_	But Oceano did not believe the visitor, with the result that the plane crashed and he woke up in the hospital.
_	Throughout the next day, Jellicoe and Scheer received conflicting intelligence, with the result that having reached its rendezvous in the North Sea, the Grand Fleet steered north in the erroneous belief that it had entered a minefield before turning south again.
_	The owner said, "Every piece of wood which was used in this structure was thrown into fire first with the result that we never had to paint it and it got more beautiful as the years went by."
_	A century later, in the time of Josiah, the prophecy was revised to present Ahaz as the faithless king who rejected God's promise of protection for Jerusalem and the house of David, with the result that God brought Assyria to devastate the land until a new and faithful king (presumably Josiah) would arise to restore peace.
_	A study in France between 1999 and 2011 came to the result that embryo freezing before administration of gonadotoxic chemotherapy agents to females caused a delay of treatment in 34% of cases, and a live birth in 27% of surviving cases who wanted to become pregnant, with the follow-up time varying between 1 and 13 years.
_	Following the disaster to the rival, Government sponsored R101, the British airship programme was cancelled with the result that, in 1931, Norway and Tiltman founded Airspeed Ltd.
_	Meyendorff's landmark study of Palamas however, "set Palamas firmly within the context of Greek patristic thought and spirituality" with the result that Palamism is now generally understood to be "a faithful witness to the long-standing Eastern Christian emphasis on deification (theosis) as the purpose of the divine economy in Christ."
_	On completing their renovation work, the restorers returned the icons to the Feasts tier but did not respect the Biblical chronology, with the result that they were sequenced in the wrong order.
_	In the three-way contest, Mourdock and fellow conservative Mike Delph split the conservative vote, with the result that the more moderate Todd Rokita won the nomination In 2004, Mourdock unsuccessfully sought a seat on the Vanderburgh County Council.
_	His sister Lugoapup identified her brother as the culprit, with the result that the gods decided to recall Olifat to Heaven, given that he was causing too much trouble on Earth.
_	"Revolutionnaire" had no casualties because the French had fired high, aiming for her rigging; the British fired into their quarry with the result that "Unité" suffered nine men killed and 11 wounded.
_	Farmer's and Brady's Everton careers overlapped only three games, hence the solitary appearance of the first eleven, although the other nine, along with Farmer during the first half of the season and Brady during the latter half were almost a constant, with the result that five played all twenty-two games while Holt and Latta each missed just one.
_	She shared with her husband a deep sense of art and religion with the result that even her flower paintings often reflected religious and mystical themes inspired by German Romanticism.
_	That paper also contained the result that the VAX-11/780's performance was actually 0.5 MIPS instead of 1 MIPS as was previously claimed by DEC.
_	When we make these substitutions in equations () to () and equations () to (), the factor "cμ" cancels out, with the result that the admittances are simply proportional to the corresponding refractive indices.
_	Fernandes had attempted to take a few Wolof canoes captive, with the result that the Wolof tribesmen of the mainland were already alert and in arms against the arriving ships.
_	However, the close proximity of multiple languages has created many opportunities for mutual interaction, with the result that the Pacific Northwest forms a linguistic area, with many areal features that are shared across language families.
_	The LNWR reused names and numbers from withdrawn locomotives, with the result that the numbering system was completely haphazard.
_	This threshold is currently set at £325,000 (tax year 2012/13) and has recently failed to keep up with house price inflation with the result that some 6 million households currently fall within the scope of inheritance tax.
_	At the time of the merger with PNB, Nedungadi Bank's shares had zero value, with the result that its shareholders received no payment for their shares.
_	They regarded his conversion as "a psychiatric crisis, a depression, a mistake," with the result that, as Messori says, "they abandoned me and finally disowned me."
_	The farm jobs are rotated so that each group does each job at least twice, with the result that the second time around the children feel "more like experienced farmers".
_	In response to this, many governments have issued real return bonds, also known as inflation-indexed bonds, in which the principal value and coupon rises each year with the rate of inflation, with the result that the interest rate on the bond approximates a real interest rate.
_	In the Norse Thidreks Saga, Ermanaric is ill-advised by his treacherous counsellor Bicke, Bikka, Sifka, or Seveke (who wants revenge for the rape of his wife by Ermanaric), with the result that the king puts his own wife to death for supposed adultery with his son: he is thereafter crippled by his brothers-in-law in revenge.
_	This led directly to the result that observers in motion relative to one another measure different elapsed times for the same event.
_	On 22 May 2018 FIFA confirmed that the investigations concerning all Russian players named for the provisional squad of the FIFA World Cup in Russia had been completed, with the result that insufficient evidence was found to assert an anti-doping rule violation.
_	This vast cost nearly ruined the heirs of the 1st Earl, but had the result that they were financially unable to alter the house to suit the whims of taste.
_	An interview with Peter Morris of Staffordshire County Council (SCC) in February 2003 was arranged, with the result that SCC agreed to work with MRT to develop a mile-long railway which passed over Apedale Road and into the adjacent Apedale Country Park.
_	First, the variable assignment μ can be extended to all terms of the language, with the result that each term maps to a single element of the domain of discourse.
_	She was so satisfied with the result that she gave more land and financial support to four other professors, two of whom Gropius designed homes for.
_	In his review of "Love on the Run", Howard Barnes of the "New York Herald Tribune" wrote, "A lot of gay nonsense has been strung together ... a fantastic and insubstantial narrative, with the result that it is almost continuously amusing and frequently hilarious ... Miss Crawford, of the big eyes and flowing hair, turns in a surprisingly volatile and amusing performance as the heiress."
_	Most of the remains had been pillaged for building material over the centuries and there was only time for a partial excavation in 1955, with the result that the excavator could only reach provisional conclusions about the nature of the building and the uses of the rooms.
_	However, Pagenstecher initially made his pulp out of aspen or "popple"; however, he soon exhausted his supply of this tree and was forced to substitute with less friable softwoods, with the result that the "New York World" cancelled its contract for newsprint.
_	The main facade is built a story higher than the rest of the house to contain a long gallery running the full length of the second floor, with the result that the minor side facades are asymmetric.
_	After World War II, Sack toured extensively and was particularly successful in Latin America, especially Argentina, Uruguay, Chile, and Brazil (with the result that she and her husband took Brazilian citizenship).
_	It meant that in Russia, the Jews were practically excluded from technical professions with the result that they were pushed into commercial occupations.
_	Following the enactment of the Special Law in 2004, there was a crackdown on red-light districts; while many of the brothels in those areas were forced to close, the crackdown went as quickly as it came, with the result that prostitution was driven more underground but also became a more competitive business with lower prices and more services.
_	Issues with the traditional Adventist interpretation of Daniel 8:14 were acknowledged by a number of North American theologians in the 1950s, with the result that a special committee was formed to discuss "problems in the book of Daniel".
_	None of Leonardo's Notebooks were published during his lifetime, many being lost after his death, with the result that his anatomical discoveries remained unknown until they were later found and published centuries after his death.
_	It was violently repressed, with the result that when the French ships arrived, not all of Saint-Domingue was automatically on Toussaint's side.
_	However, the use of offsets such as Emission Reduction Units from JI and Certified Emission Reductions from CDM projects was allowed, with the result that the EU would be able to meet the Phase II cap by importing units instead of reducing emissions (CCC, 2008, pp. 145, 149).
_	His 'parents' are meeting with Nathan just as he is breaking out of his room, with the result that he fails to escape, but succeeds in discovering that his parents are actually Slitheen using improved compression technology, and Nathan is the same Slitheen child Luke encountered previously, now in a new disguise, and he will have his revenge.
_	In test matches, bowlers tend to 'work the cracks' using cutters, meaning that they try pitching the ball on cracks repeatedly with the result that few of the balls that do pitch on cracks unsettles even a well-set batsman.
_	Negotiations with the railway company were long and bitter, and the Navigation company only managed to raise £625,000 of the £1.14 million purchase price, with the result that although ownership of the waterways was transferred to them, the railway company still nominated five of the ten directors, and thus retained significant control.
_	Even though the boiler was not pitched very high, Hendrie had still managed to extend the Belpaire firebox sideways over the trailing coupled wheels, with the result that the grate was almost on a level with the bottom of the boiler shell.
_	When the allies approached Valkenburg in September 1944 there were several days of shooting, with the result that when the allies entered the town on 14 September it was deserted; everyone had fled into the caves.
_	When they finally found a whale on November 16, it surfaced directly beneath Chase's boat, with the result that the boat was "dashed...literally in pieces".
_	A few years ago, Bernie did the same thing with the 1990 Belgian motorcycle Grand Prix with the result that ticket sales plummeted and that eventually signed the beginning of the end for the Belgian round, as it was scrapped from the 1991 calendar onwards.
_	When filled with ultra-heat treated (UHT) foodstuffs (liquids like milk and juice or processed food like vegetables and preserved fruits), the aseptic packages can be preserved without being chilled for up to one year, with the result that distribution and storage costs, as well as environmental impact, is greatly reduced and product shelf life expanded.
_	In his most recent series, he takes B&W photographs with an oatmeal box pinhole camera, then digitally colorizes them, with the result that the images are "rooted in sixteenth-century optics juxtaposed with twenty-first century digital technology."
_	The name may also refer to Miquel's six circles theorem, the result that if five circles have four triple points of intersection then the remaining four points of intersection lie on a sixth circle.
_	Having only one Miscellaneous Forum had the effect of forcing the entire VT community into one area, with the result that the VT member base tended to interact a great deal.
_	The telemetric measurement of the movement patterns of the raccoons living in the Lower Saxony low mountain range Solling yielded the result that the social behavior of raccoons is gender-specific and that they often live together in small, loose groups instead of being loners like previously thought.
_	Nor did Parker’s opposition to Roosevelt’s policy of imperialism in the Pacific, with the result that Roosevelt’s performance remains the best ever by any Presidential candidate since Washington’s statehood in 1889.
_	Although, as shown above, Philo repeatedly endeavored to find the Divine Being active and acting in the world, in agreement with Stoicism, yet his Platonic repugnance to matter predominated, and consequently whenever he posited that the divine could not have any contact with evil, he defined evil as matter, with the result that he placed God outside of the world.
_	Beginning in the 1960s, many tribal members abandoned the traditional plant-based diet and began to consume foods high in fat and calories, with the result that type 2 diabetes became widespread among the tribe.
_	The layout of the buildings was still along the lines of the original encampment, with the result that early Marrakesh was an unusual-looking city, a sprawling medieval urban center evocative of desert life, with occasional tents, planted palm trees and an oasis-like feel.
_	The system is completely abandoned in mammals, with the result that all the blood from the tail (if present), groin, pelvic area, and hind legs is forced to pass directly into the posterior vena cava, and the only blood passing out of the kidney through the renal vein is that that entered it through the renal artery.
_	By this time it had come out that his wife was still alive; and as Sir Henry Newton, brother-in-law of Anne Murray, happened to cross over to Holland in the same ship with him, the two, as soon as they landed, fought a duel, with the result that Newton was severely wounded in the head.
_	Groves, the defeated Labour candidate claimed after the result that “we have delivered the death-blow to Liberalism in this division.
_	Substantial stabilisation and restoration works were undertaken to buildings, railway track and locomotives in 2001 with the result that built assets are generally in good condition.
_	The relationship that Monosini develops between Greek and vulgar Italian, has all the limitations of the empirical and the author’s own enthusiasm for his method, with the result that the associations presented to the modern reader appear cumbersome and at times bizarre.
_	Their agreement this benefit, with the result that they have entered into any store or any legal proceedings have taken as if they were Roman citizens, or among themselves, or with Tridentini or other, I order that is ratified; and the names of Roman citizens who had taken earlier, they give them to keep them."
_	This had the result that in some disciplines, for example in malacology, most taxonomic names had to change their authorship because they had been attributed to other persons who never published a scientific work.
_	In the recount the 50th exclusion point went the other way with a margin of 12 votes, with the result that the 5th seat went to Wayne Dropulich and the 6th to Scott Ludlam.
_	During the war, some children blocked the tramway that the winding wheels driven by the fantail run on, with the result that the steps lifted up and the mill tilted forward, leaving the steps in the air.
_	The car was launched at the Detroit Automobile Show in January 1912, but production and sales were minimal, with the result that the factory was closed in September 1913.
_	The Soviets also left the hiding place open, with the result that works of art were within the reach of everyone.
_	The engineer of the song had accidentally mixed the drum beats backwards, which produced an unusual juddering sound across the recording, but Waterman was so impressed with the result that it stayed on the song.
_	After his death, his second son held the land until his death in the Mowbray conspiracy of 1098, after which it passed to his eldest son, Robert de Bellesme, who also rebelled against the Crown in 1102 with the result that the lands were confiscated.
_	The extension of the Reading Borough boundaries in 1888 (referred to above) has the result that the section of Earley lying to the north of the railway line (sometimes referred to as Old Earley or North Earley) is connected to the larger part to the south by only a narrow corridor of land.
_	Wheatley was dragged offstage by the audience and had his pants and coat literally torn to shreds, with the result that one of the police on hand threatened to arrest him for indecent exposure if they did not finish playing immediately.
_	The attempt was abandoned in the 1990s with the result that the political leadership within the state are also the leaders of the party, thereby creating a single centralized locus of power.
_	"Many of the men, footsore and weary from their march of the preceding day, found the pace up this hill too hard, and either dropped their bundles or fell out of line, with the result that we went into action with less than five hundred men."
_	The PNP won most of its seats by narrow margins over the PDM, while the PDM won its seats by wide margins over the PNP, with the result that despite winning fewer seats and thereby losing the election, the PDM garnered more overall votes nationwide.
_	Iveco, despite four stage wins courtesy of Hans Stacey, suffered from reliability issues, with the result that Stacey could do no better than sixth – just behind Kamaz's fourth driver Dmitry Sotnikov – and Gerard de Rooy ninth.
_	Placenames are explained by reference to legends which are linked to them by means of pseudo-etymological techniques, where sometimes fictitious stories are adduced to explain the existing names, with the result that some of these legends are only to be found in the Dinnshenchas, where they serve their explanatory purpose.
_	This was done prior to construction with the result that the eruv did not extend into Montvale.
_	Some of the training deficiencies were due to the RAAF's practice of stationing operational training units in southern Australia, with the result that aircrew were unfamiliar with flying in tropical conditions.
_	According to Highway, theatres frequently face or perceive difficulty in finding a suitable cast of First Nations actors, but are reluctant to take the risk of casting non-aboriginal performers due to their sensitivity around accusations of cultural appropriation, with the result that the play is often simply passed over instead.
_	An expedition was sent in the same year, with the result that the tribes paid the fines imposed upon them, and agreed to the removal of Hashim Ali from Tor Ghar and the appointment in his place of his near relative and enemy Ibrahim Khan (Hasanzai Tribe Elder).
_	Bertram, who was at that time with the king in Caen, was sent, together with Richard de Humet, to investigate with the result that Bertram was in 1169 given the dual shrievalty of Warwickshire and Leicestershire in Basset's place.
_	As the town of Richmond developed from its founding in the early 16th century, after Henry VII had established Richmond Palace, the attributes of the hill naturally attracted desirable residential and commercial development – with the result that many substantial properties came and went on the hill over the centuries, some of them with famous or notable persons as owners or occupiers.
_	The points at the junction were rigged to the fence, with the result that, when the dynamite-laden truck breached the fence, it derailed at the points and spilled its load of dynamite on the ground, where it burned out harmlessly without exploding.
_	Investigations on a wider scale followed with the result that in 1974 the Commonwealth Government announced its intention of establishing a single tertiary institution for the Defence Force.
_	Joseph Day suffered from his involvement with both of the aforementioned, with the result that his firm was driven into bankruptcy.
_	However, the railway never paid out the dividends accruing to those shares with the result that by 1895 the shares and accrued dividends were worth about £7000.
_	In 1907 he embarked instead on an affair with a geisha named Yone Iida (1889-?); this experience was unhappy, and punctuated by the deaths of friends and family members, with the result that his later works take on an obscure, pessimistic and religious tone.
_	These are more restrictive constraints than the analogous ones on red-black trees, with the result that re-balancing an AA tree is procedurally much simpler than re-balancing a red-black tree.
_	At this time English coins were much envied in Europe for their weight and good metal content, with the result that English halfpennies were copied on the continent; they are similar in style to those of Edward III, but the obverse legend often reads .
_	A surviving note from Major Henry Smith, Acting Commissioner of the City Police, indicates that the alibis were investigated of local butchers and slaughterers, with the result that they were eliminated from the inquiry.
_	Although the standard practice of many national patent offices seems to be to calculate SPC term based upon date (1), an October 2011 article in Scrip Regulatory Affairs by Mike Snodin argues that this standard practice is incorrect and that date (2) should be used instead (with the result that some products may be entitled to a slightly longer SPC term than previously thought).
_	The exact mass of many isotopes was measured leading to the result that hydrogen has a 1% higher mass than expected by the average mass of the other elements.
_	The throwing knives were extensively collected by Europeans with the result that many European and American museums have extensive collections.
_	They control the administrative activity of enterprises, institutions, and organizations with the result that these groups function better, the people's government becomes stronger, and bureaucratic excesses may be avoided."
_	As a fluxional molecule, bullvalene is subject to degenerate Cope rearrangements, with the result that all carbon atoms and hydrogen atoms appear equivalent on the NMR timescale.
_	The Greek victories at Plataea and contemporaneous naval battle at Mycale had the result that never again would the Persian Empire launch an attack on mainland Greece.
_	Thanks to this success and satisfactory test results, it was decided to put the Fizir F1V into serial production, but as an intermediate trainer rather than as a reconnaissance aircraft with the result that some changes were made, such as adding dual controls.
_	Komendant worked closely with the manufacturer to ensure that outcome, with the result that the largest offset between any two elements in the finished structure was only .
_	While some legislative changes were passed in December 2012, the Opposition and health sector lobbyists said the evidence-based advice from the Commission was disregarded by Collins and her predecessor Simon Power with the result that the final legislation "was a pale imitation of the landmark Law Commission report it was based on."
_	From it is derived the English idiom "to cry wolf", defined as "to give a false alarm" in "Brewer's Dictionary of Phrase and Fable" and glossed by the "Oxford English Dictionary" as meaning to make false claims, with the result that subsequent true claims are disbelieved.
_	This heat loss through the glass keeps the internal bulb temperature steady with the result that the two sides of the vanes develop a temperature difference.
_	A small freighter was outfitted with this system to evaluate its actual fuel gains with the result that it was estimated to save between 15–25% of the vessel's fuel.
_	However, for reasons never made entirely clear, Porfirio Díaz ultimately did not support Carranza in this race, with the result that Carranza lost the election.
_	The positive impact of foreign investment in these locations led to a more general opening up of the economy to foreign investment, with the result that China became the largest recipient of direct investment flows in the 1990s.
_	When war between France and Germany broke out again in 1805, this time he fought for Napoleon, with the result that by the Peace of Pressburg signed in that year, he obtained the Breisgau and other territories at the expense of the Habsburgs.
_	Willet droppings have been placed in dishes of salt water with the result that some snails hatched out.
_	It soon became known as the National School, with the result that the earlier school was demolished.
_	This ideal may be difficult to honor in practice, with the result that opportunistic mistakes are made.
_	That negligence and, as from April 1, 1992, breach of statutory duty on the part of CBC permitted and led to the extensive dispersal of contaminated mud and dust over public areas of Corby and into and over private homes, with the result that the contaminants could realistically have caused the types of birth defects of which complaint has been made by the claimants (save in limited respects)...
_	In 1961 Helen K. Sharsmith produced a definitive study of "Hesperolinon", with the result that this taxon clearly merited genus standing; moreover, she also returned Marin Dwarf Flax, "H. congestum" to species status.
_	"Junon", unusually for a French vessel, fired at "Fox"s hull rather than her rigging, with the result that "Junon"s heavier guns were able to inflict heavy casualties on "Fox", and shoot away her three masts.
_	He served as a missionary at the United Free Church at Ardvasar on Skye, but dissented from that church's union with the Church of Scotland with the result that he had to give up his post.
_	Nor did his opposition to Roosevelt’s policy of imperialism in the Pacific, with the result that Parker’s showing was the worst-ever by any major-party nominee in Oregon except for his mentor Cleveland twelve years previously.
_	This investment was swiftly recouped, with the result that in 1965 the League was able to issue a fourth denomination, a silver 25 steloj coin, which also sold very well.
_	This enabled water from the Brue, which had nowhere to go because its outlet was blocked by high tides, to be diverted southwards to the Huntspill river, with the result that flooding in the Brue valley was significantly reduced.
_	Emphasis spreading does "not" affect the affrication of non-emphatic in Moroccan Arabic, with the result that these two phonemes are always distinguishable regardless of the nearby presence of other emphatic phonemes.
_	An independent testing laboratory reported back the result that he was indeed clean.
_	The M1A1 included an improved mount and spring-rammer on the breech, with the result that firing rates went up to 20 rounds per minute.
_	A study of the United States and multiple countries in Europe came to the result that women who continue to cohabit rather than get married after birth have significantly lower probability of having a second child than married women in all countries except those in Eastern Europe.
_	Another study, on the contrary, came to the result that cohabiting couples in France have equal fertility as married ones.
_	Once he treats patients who mean something to him, he is tempted to trick Death to get the result that he wants.
_	It was claimed that Clouson and the 20-year-old Pook, the son of her employer (Clouson was the family maid), had been having an affair lasting several months with the result that she had become pregnant; Edmund would not marry Jane because his brother had already angered his father by marrying beneath his station and Edmund had no intention of doing the same, so Jane was fired from the household.
_	The line, which was opened to passengers in 1863, passed right through the village of Pill, with the result that a large number of buildings had to be demolished to allow its necessary straight and level passage.
_	The reviewer also noted that, "this repetition of excessive cruelty, in its sheer extent and verisimilitude, transfers the film from a realistic plane to the grotesque, with the result that here and there it is possible to find, among the emotions, a certain healthy amount of humour".
_	It was suggested that, for the first time in history, fashion designers were following the lead of milliners who had: "made women wear the hats in defiance of the styles in frocks, with the result that the couturiers have had to fall quickly in line and rush through styles to go with the hats".
_	Historically the Abbey was one of the last ecclesiastical sanctuaries to surrender its ancient rights, with the result that the precincts were largely occupied by most undesirable and dangerous inhabitants.
_	The vast majority occurs between December and April, with the result that the "creek" is often a large river during the winter and spring, while dwindling to a relative trickle in the summer and fall.
_	During the video, Georg, Tom and Bill constantly run back and forth on the roof while playing, with the result that their positions change constantly.
_	A small number of gold £2 pieces were struck in 1953 in order to provide continuity of the series, but the striking was not released to the public, with the result that they are now valued at around £75,000.
_	Accordingly, the weapon was often fired while being held away from the face with the result that marksmanship was inferior.
_	Moreover, the characteristics of the special case assumed by the classical theory happen not to be those of the economic society in which we actually live, with the result that its teaching is misleading and disastrous if we attempt to apply it to the facts of experience.
_	Opposition parties were tolerated to an extent, but they were also controlled, limited, and manipulated, with the result that they split into factions and never formed a united opposition.
_	A crowd estimated at up to 300,000 gained entrance and the terraces overflowed, with the result that spectators found their way into the area around the pitch and even onto the playing area itself.
_	During the episcopate of Manfredo Lucciaga (1133), Arnold of Brescia disseminated his teachings, with the result that the governors of the city all but confiscated the property of the churches of Brescia.
_	In March, 1889 a delegation of nine northern members requested the Premier implement the 1887 resolution, with the result that in September, 1889 the Supreme Court Bill was introduced which provided for the appointment of a second northern judge and for the removal of the court to Townsville.
_	With the result that there was currently in Parma a craze for all things French, and in particular a fixation with the splendour of Versailles.
_	The route still exists, and since the 1990s increased interest in long-distance hiking and cycling have made the German and Austrian stretches of the Via Claudia Augusta popular among tourists, with the result that modern signage ("illustration") identifies the revitalised track.
_	In the United States House of Representatives, California is apportioned 53 representatives, each representing approximately 704,566 people, while in the State Senate, each of the 40 Senators represents approximately 931,349 people, with the result that California state senators each actually represent more voters than California's representatives to the United States Congress do.
_	For example, a tradition developed in Hebron to go to study and work in Cairo, with the result that a permanent community of Hebronites had been living in Cairo since the fifteenth century.
_	Some slave states refused to send troops against the neighboring Deep South slave states of South Carolina, Mississippi, Florida, Alabama, Georgia, Louisiana, and Texas with the result that most such states in the Upper South of Virginia, Arkansas, North Carolina, and Tennessee also declared secession from the United States and joined the Confederate States, Missouri and Kentucky did not fully secede themselves from Union control but they were admitted by the Confederacy as the 12th and 13th states respectively while Maryland and Delaware stayed in the Union throughout the duration of the war.
_	If this had happened the peninsula would have been occupied and then North Africa, with the result that the whole course of the war would have been altered to the advantage of the Axis.
_	The "SOHO" spacecraft is in a halo orbit around the Sun–Earth L1 point, the point between the Earth and the Sun where the balance of the (larger) Sun's gravity and the (smaller) Earth's gravity is equal to the centripetal force needed for an object to have the same orbital period in its orbit around the Sun as the Earth, with the result that the object will stay in that relative position.
_	Counsel for the accused successfully challenged the legal sufficiency of the document, with the result that Justice de Wet quashed it.
_	Ludvig Grandjean founded the "stamhus" Vennerslund in accordance with his uncle's will from 1840 with the result that it could no longer be sold or divided between heirs.
_	In reality, however, markets do not live up to the ideal conditions that are assumed in Coase's model, with the result that there may be trade-offs between efficiency and equity (Halsnæs "et al.", 2007).
_	His constant studies, however, seemed to turn his steps naturally toward a higher institution of learning, with the result that in 1866 he went to the Andover Theological Seminary.
_	The design "Speshnyi" class proved highly successful with the result that the Russian Navy built 34 over several decades.
_	The chapter at Wells appealed the decision, with the result that the Pope declared, on 3 January 1245, that whilst Roger should remain, he would be bishop of a see thenceforth styled the Diocese of Bath and Wells.
_	Healy set to work purging the group of real and imagined opponents with the result that within months the organisation was a fraction of its former size, but Healy's leadership was unchallenged.
_	However, 1948 also saw more publishers enter the genre, with the result that, by one estimate "thirty different crime comics were on the stands by the end of 1948 and by 1949 roughly one in seven comics was a crime comics."
_	When engaged on bombing work he attacked and shot down an enemy machine, with the result that it crashed to earth.
_	The film's copyright expired in 1967 and it is now in the public domain, with the result that, prior to its recent restoration, it tended to circulate in seriously degraded prints.
_	Before his death, the family ran into huge financial difficulties, and sold much of the stock and equipment, with the result that, at the time of his death, the farm was very deficient in cattle and implements.
_	In addition, Lean also edited the film with the result that his three roles in the production (writer, editor, director) were given equal status in the credits.
_	The binary version produces either the result that the object exists, or that it doesn't, in the experiential field to which it is applied.
_	The lower courts held, taking as their authority "Chandler v Webster" (1904) that where a contract has been frustrated by a supervening event, "the loss lies where it falls", with the result that sums paid or rights accrued before that event are not to be surrendered, but that all obligations falling due for performance after that event are discharged.
_	Science fiction historian Mike Ashley regards the stories Hamilton selected as demonstrating a "wide range of material by excellent writers" that was "seldom predictable", but adds that the stories have become dated, with the result that few are now well-known.
_	One of the drawbacks of step-by-step and other early systems is that the preference for choosing trunks or selector links is fixed, and the most preferred links are used more often, with the result that the same faulty hardware blocks repeated call attempts until it is removed from service.
_	A further advantage of the MMC is that PWM is not necessary, with the result that the power losses are much lower than those of the 2-level converter, at around 1% per end.
_	Subsequently, in 1902, the original was moved half a mile northwards to its current location, with the result that the official length of the Oldmeldrum branch became 4 miles, 1617 yards.
_	Material for "The Most Special Agent" was re-edited to remove the framing sequences set at Culver Bay Cottage and WIN Headquarters London, with the result that Joe's fictitious mission to steal the Russian prototype fighter appears to be a real assignment for the nine-year-old WIN agent.
_	Federal Greens leader Bob Brown said of the result that it was positive but that: "The Liberals' preferencing to Labor means that instead of there being three Greens in the new parliament there won't be".
_	At the edge of the loop, the planes above and beneath the "dislocation disk" are pulled apart, creating a negative pressure, which raises the energy of the conduction band substantially, with the result that the electrons cannot pass this edge.
_	District electoral division boundaries also tend to bear little relation to the boundaries of natural communities in rural Ireland such as parishes, with the result that most people will have little or no idea as to which electoral division they live in.
_	I brought this trend to an end and the royal families that survived found it harder to justify the cost with the result that there are only three royal yachts left in use in Europe.
_	In the past few years, procedures for digitizing books at high speed and comparatively low cost have improved considerably with the result that it is now possible to digitize millions of books per year.
_	In the course of this campaign, women who chose not to wear the hijab were verbally and physically harassed, with the result that the hijab was being worn 'just to avoid problems on the streets'.
_	He pleaded with the government for their lives, with the result that they were given either pardons or protection and the right to remain living in the former abbey precinct.
_	In addition, stamps may have been laid out in an irregular fashion on the plate with the result that differences in spacing and orientation of the stamps may be used to determine their plate positions.
_	In the course of this campaign women who chose not to wear the hijab were verbally and physically harassed, with the result that the hijab was being worn "just to avoid problems on the streets".
_	It was during this time that I lost my eyesight, my hand became paralyzed, with the result that I am now deprived of reading and writing.
_	The remaining part of the old almost historical fast circuit, modified to a lesser degree were Sunset Bend, Clubhouse Bend and the Esses still incorporated into the current configuration, with the result that the circuit became a narrow, twisty ribbon rather than one of the fastest circuits on the calendar.
_	The Cardiff system had long suffered from extreme congestion of the railways serving the docks there, and of the berthing accommodation itself, with the result that there were constant complaints from shippers of the delay.
_	During the course of this campaign women who chose not to wear the "hijab" were verbally and physically harassed, with the result that the "hijab" was being worn "just to avoid problems on the streets".
_	A hood to hide or control the wearer often covers the whole head, with the result that the wearer can see little or nothing, like a blindfold, or it can be to prevent identification of the wearer.
_	Furthermore, cats are superfecund; that is, a female may mate with more than one male when she is in heat, with the result that different kittens in a litter may have different fathers.
_	She later commented that the saloon had previously attracted a quiet and respectable clientele, but that the Ross brothers were willing to serve anyone, with the result that it was soon frequented by alcoholics and criminals.
_	Some of the faint-hearted and disaffected were now inclined to open the gates to the enemy, but were held in check by Maclean, who guarded the gate with his Highlanders, forbade all communication with the besiegers, and fired upon their flag, an ensign of rebellion, with the result that, after Richard Montgomery was killed, Benedict Arnold abandoned the siege and left the country.
_	The UIMM provided logistic support to the Confédération générale de la production française (CGPF), with the result that the CGPF was accused of being simply a puppet of the steel industry.
_	Kurtzworth, who chose the paintings and wrote the catalog preface stated that: "By tone or tonal painting is meant the feeling of harmony, either in high or low key, brought about by carefully adjusting values and colors, with the result that instead of a brilliant, powerful impression of the atmosphere of subdued light out of doors in the early morning, late afternoon, or a quietly lighted interior is conveyed by the artist's skill."
_	He also fought against the loot of forests by mafias and businessmen like Star Paper Mill, Lalkuan through his paper, with the result that a case was filed against him in the press council.
_	He displayed a firm attitude towards the Javanese rulers, with the result that the rulers were willing to work with the British against the Dutch.
_	Wilkie's approach for this latter result is somewhat different from his proof of Wilkie's theorem, and the result that allowed him to show that the Pfaffian structure is model complete is sometimes known as Wilkie's theorem of the complement.
_	Mérillon proceeded to publish an entirely different schedule of events, with the result that many of those that had made plans to compete in concordance with the original program withdrew, and refused to deal with the new committee.
_	...that they were denying Christ and the church; that they cut up living animals and scattered the pieces at cross roads as offerings to a demain called the son of Art in return for his help; that they stole the keys of the church and held meetings there at night; that in the skull of a robber they placed the intestines and internal organs of cocks, worms, nails cut from dead bodies, hairs from the buttocks and clothes of boys who died before being bapitzed; that, from this brew they made potions to incite people to love, hate, kill and afflict Christians; that Alice herself had a certain demon as incubus by whom she permitted herself to be known carnally and that he appeared to her either as a cat, a shaggy black dog or as a black man "aethiopos", from whom she received her wealth; and that Alice had used her sorcery to murder some of her husbands and to infatuate others, with the result that they gave all of their possessions to her and her son.
_	Most of Canada's territory was inhabited and developed later than other European colonies in the Americas, with the result that themes and symbols of pioneers, trappers, and traders were important in the early development of the Canadian identity.
_	Meantone temperaments are often described by the fraction of the syntonic comma by which the fifths are tempered: quarter-comma meantone, the most common type, tempers the fifths by of a syntonic comma, with the result that four fifths produce a just major third, a syntonic comma lower than a Pythagorean major third; third-comma meantone tempers by of a syntonic comma, three fifths producing a just major sixth, a syntonic comma lower than a Pythagorean one.
_	On 27 August 1944 the squadron and No. 263 Squadron RAF Typhoons with Spitfire escort was mistakenly ordered to attack the Royal Navy 1st Minesweeping Flotilla off Cap d'Antifer, Le Havre, with the result that and were sunk and was irreparably damaged, killing 117 sailors and wounding 153 more.
_	A Cochrane review came to the result that in women starting HRT less than 10 years after menopause have a lower mortality and lower rate of coronary heart disease compared to placebo or no treatment, without any strong evidence of an effect on the risk of stroke.
_	"Crafty" carried too much sail and "Confounder" too little, with the result that they separated.
_	Early returns showed a massive swing to Pitt with the result that many Opposition Members who still had not faced election either defected, stood down, or made deals with their opponents to avoid expensive defeats.
_	In fact, the European university put many of these texts at the center of its curriculum, with the result that the "medieval university laid far greater emphasis on science than does its modern counterpart and descendent."
_	According to figures from 1988, less than 5 percent of the total government budget was targeted for health, with the result that the Ministry of Public Health was unable to establish a management and planning system to facilitate the changes envisioned.
_	The Karstic springs arising from the skirts of the Ali Dag mountain in the village of Sizir have been diverted by the construction of a dam into a canal leading to the hydroelectric plant, with the result that, like most of our waterfalls, the Göksu fall is worth visiting only in very rainy seasons.
_	Later on, the schools merged again with the result that he move moved up a grade.
_	The reliance by the court on "Wilkens NO v Voges", which deals with tacit terms and the near similarity in the meaning of the words "implied" and "tacit," had the result that Malan J failed to deal with the alternative pleading regarding the residual term, which the law adds in the absence of agreement by the parties.
_	Later, in October, one of "Insolent"s boats hit a rock, with the result that her captain and three seamen drowned.
_	It is an attractive plant that is easy to grow and propagate, with the result that it has been passed around by gardeners for many years.
_	However, the level of detail is more basic than the 'real' models produced by the company, with the result that the trains can be handled safely by inexperienced hands without fear of damaging delicate parts.
_	Hawker production lines focused on the Hurricane, with the result that completion of the second prototype ("P5224") was significantly delayed.
_	The Roman and German elements of the existing law were, without criticism or differentiation, welded into an ostensible whole for practical needs, with the result that it was difficult to say whether historical truth or practical ends were most prejudiced.
_	Females often oviposit in punctures made by other fruit flies such as those of the Mediterranean fruit fly, Ceratitis capitata (Wiedemann), with the result that many eggs often occur in a single cavity.
_	Lam Son 54, Hickory, Belt Tight and Beau Charger also resulted in the removal of the entire civilian population from the area with the result that it was all now a free fire zone.
_	On 27 August 1944 the squadron and No. 266 Squadron RAF Typhoons with Spitfire escort was mistakenly ordered to attack the Royal Navy 1st Minesweeping Flotilla off Cap d'Antifer, Le Havre, with the result that and were sunk and was irreparably damaged, killing 117 sailors and wounding 153 more.
_	Jay Gould, Drew and James Fisk engaged in stock manipulations known as the Erie War, with the result that in the summer of 1868 Drew, Fisk, and Vanderbilt lost control of the Erie, while Gould became its president.
_	In practice, the Prime Minister of Australia advises the Governor-General whether to do so or not, with the result that it is very difficult for a group or party that is not the Government to successfully put a proposed change to a referendum.
_	The tender was stripped of its condensing equipment, but retained its original fresh water and condensate tanks and feed pumps, with the result that the boiler would now be fed with cold water, apparently with none of the ill effects which had been predicted earlier.
_	Therefore, the minimum value of "x" (the number of dollars in the immediate choice) that suffices to be greater than that amount will be much smaller than the hyperbolic discounter thinks, with the result that they will perceive "x"-values in the range from "y" / [(1 + "r" %)^"n"] to "y"/"n" (inclusive at the low end) as being too small and, as a result, irrationally turn those alternatives down when they are in fact the better investment.
_	Agricultural production was again a major casualty, with the result that there was a severe food crisis in 1979.
_	Treated with disdain by two of the professors there, he began to read French literature, especially Rousseau, with the result that he became an agnostic.
_	In the port, the German ship "Ehrenfels" had been providing information to three German U-boats, on the movement of Allied shipping with the result that some 250,000 tons of British shipping had been sunk over a period of 45 days.
_	These difficulties were exacerbated by struggles with other administrators over centralization of planning, with the result that Daniels was pushed to resign after only a year and a half.
_	He thus failed to see or follow the humanitarian mission historically associated with the Republican party, with the result that Negroes both North and South began to drift toward the Democratic party."
_	Kelman argues that much in the law involves providing rational interpretative constructs that surround a non-rational core – what he terms 'rational rhetoricism' with the result that, in his words, "It is illuminating and disquieting to see that we are nonrationally constructing the legal world over and over again...".
_	Moreover, a supporting piece of evidence—the result that all proteins contain an integer multiple of 288 amino-acid residues—was likewise shown to be incorrect in 1939.
_	The Gregorian calendar was introduced in 1582, but was adopted by various countries over several centuries, with the result that some countries still used the older Julian calendar while others used the Gregorian calendar.
_	Upon request from the German ambassador in Washington D.C., a review conducted by George R. Canty on behalf of the Department of Commerce yielded the result that, "the film serves no good purpose."
_	They mend their relationship and he returns to the farm, implementing what he's learned - with the result that the farm becomes the most productive in the state.
_	Outside of Ulster, the treatment of civilians was less harsh, although the "no-mans-land" in between Confederate and British held territory in Leinster and Munster was repeatedly raided and burned, with the result that it too became de-populated.
_	But the messenger was intercepted, and soon afterward a supply train was captured, with the result that the disposition of all of Johnson's forces became known to Dieskau.
_	On 18 July, the British regained Azamgarh but they soon found their position untenable and were compelled to retire with the result that the entire district of Azamgarh was abandoned except for tahsil Nagra (now included in Ballia district).
_	In Europe, as John Ruskin said, and Sir Kenneth Clark confirmed, landscape painting was the "chief artistic creation of the nineteenth century", and "the dominant art", with the result that in the following period people were "apt to assume that the appreciation of natural beauty and the painting of landscape is a normal and enduring part of our spiritual activity"
_	These are the only soils in all of Australia with reasonable levels of soluble phosphorus, with the result that upstream from Singleton very rich pasture land with many thoroughbred horse studs occurs.
_	Residential installation starts in early 2007 fell off sharply in SCE territory because of the disincentives inherent in SB1, requiring time-of-use (TOU) tariffs, with the result that homeowners who install panels may find their electric bill increasing rather than decreasing.
_	This is accomplished by attaching two long steel rods to the lock on the inside of the door, which extend vertically upwards and downwards: when the lock is turned, the rotary movement of the latch on the inside of the door translates to vertical movement in these rods, with the result that the upper rod moves upwards by an inch or so, and the lower rod moves downwards similarly.
_	He has dealt with his trauma by deliberately shutting down his emotions, with the result that he sees everyone around him, especially the desperate people who come into his shop, as "scum."
_	According to Procopius, the responsibility fell on John the Cappadocian, who had cut costs by baking it only once, with the result that the bread went bad.
_	The political satire, however, was even more pointed in "Polly" than in "The Beggar's Opera", with the result that Prime Minister Robert Walpole leaned on the Lord Chamberlain to have it banned, and it was not performed until fifty years later.
_	For instance, by day sensible heat rising from the ground due to the absorption of sunlight (see "surface energy budget") is mixed upward less efficiently in the lee of a windbreak, with the result that air temperature near ground is somewhat higher in the lee than on the windward side.
_	So important was the result that General Washington hastened to communicate it to Congress in a manner highly complimentary.
_	Porter accepted the challenge with the result that the song eventually topped the hit parade.
_	However, neo-Gaullists have since rallied economic liberalism, with the result that modern French conservatives – such as the UMP, or before that the RPR, the UDF or the Independent Republicans – all supported economic liberalism.
_	Overall English strategy concentrated on attacking the north of France, with the result that Ingham in the south-west received neither troops nor funds from England and had to rely entirely on local resources.
_	USS "Seawolf" was plagued by superheater problems, with the result that USS "Nautilus" delivered far superior performance.
_	The word "cul-de-sac" and its synonyms or near synonyms "dead end" and "no exit" have inspired metaphorical uses in literature and in culture, often with the result that a word or phrase seeming to have a negative connotation is replaced in street signs with a new coinage.
_	But Blyton's readers were not so easily deceived and many complained about the subterfuge to her and her publisher, with the result that all six books published under the name of Mary Pollock – two in 1940 and four in 1943 – were reissued under Blyton's name.
_	In particular, the choice of a rescaling-invariant prior for σ has the result that the probability for the ratio of σ / "s" has the same form (independent of the conditioning variable) when conditioned on "s" as when conditioned on σ:
_	In the spring of 1944, the USAAF intensified the bombing of targets in Bulgaria and Romania, with the result that American aviators were being forced to bail out of damaged aircraft over Yugoslavia in increasing numbers.
_	There is a consequent gradual increase in height with the result that, over time, the shoreline advances seawards.
_	During the past 20 million years, Southern Africa has experienced further massive uplifting, especially in the east, with the result that most of the plateau, despite the extensive erosion, lies above , tilted so that it is at its highest in the east, sloping gently downwards towards the west and south.
_	The Germans demanded that the Bolsheviks disarm the Czechs, with the result that the Czech forces joined with the White Army, fighting against the Bolsheviks.
_	Some time later he let the two Bataks enter the palace compound and perform black magic, with the result that the sultan fell ill.
_	Although expensive and either loved or hated, and with some of its early technology either working in use or not—the enclosure created excess heat buildup, while the long wheelbase created a turning circle—the short production run created the result that the motorcycling press and public never had the same view of BMW motorcycles again.
_	Portfolio investment abroad is also very limited, with the result that portfolio flows are largely unrecorded by authorities.
_	This rule, however, has been abrogated, with the result that now, on the testator’s death, Luke (assuming that he is alive) acquires the full dominium, for he succeeds directly to the testator, the fiduciary interest having fallen away.
_	A notable exception was at Flemington in 1888 when he momentarily lost control of Kangaroo, with the result that Ruby, ridden by fellow Ballarat jockey (and later a distinguished trainer) James Scobie was "squeezed", and after a protest Corrigan was disqualified.
_	The aircraft on which 2d Lt. Truemper was serving as navigator was attacked by a squadron of enemy fighters with the result that the co-pilot was killed outright, the pilot wounded and rendered unconscious, the radio operator wounded and the plane severely damaged.
_	This was due to the fact that it was the leading centre for the Populist Party during the 1890s under local hero Marion Butler – more so indeed than Nash and Chatham Counties which had given James B. Weaver a plurality in the 1892 election – and the fact that to compete with the dominant Democratic Party the two would fuse, with the result that after the Populists' demise its adherents turned to the Republicans.
_	Leidy also grew tired of the constant squabbling between the two men, with the result that his withdrawal from the field marginalized his own legacy; after his death, Osborn found not a single mention of the man in either of the rivals' works.
_	A review of randomized studies came to the result that IVF in couples with a high chance of natural conception, as compared to IUI/ICI with or without ovarian stimulation, was "more" effective in three studies and "less" effective in two studies.
_	In American Spanish, the gap created by the loss of familiar plural "vos" was filled by originally polite "ustedes", with the result that there is no familiar/polite distinction in the plural, just as in the original "tu/vos" system.
_	Since the letter was originally sent on 18 October 2007, there have been a number of new signatories with the result that there are now over 300 Muslim signatories.
_	"The Affective Fallacy is a confusion between the poem and its results (what it is and what it does), a special case of epistemological skepticism [ ... which ...] begins by trying to derive the standard of criticism from the psychological effects of the poem and ends in impressionism and relativism [with the result that] the poem itself, as an object of specifically critical judgment, tends to disappear."
_	The LNWR used a numbering system based on the lowest available number, with the result that the numbers were scattered through the stock book.
_	With the result that the self gets weighted down by its own creation.
_	Mercer's theorem itself is a generalization of the result that any positive-semidefinite matrix is the Gramian matrix of a set of vectors.
_	The boat's log had been disabled earlier and Bradshaw, unfamiliar with the larger "G" class boats, underestimated her speed in the inclement weather, with the result that the boat had travelled substantially further than he had reckoned.
_	In 1923, the dictator Primo de Rivera seized power, with the result that Puig i Cadafalch was removed from the project.
_	He was succeeded by his son, Henry Brydges, 2nd Duke of Chandos, who found the estate so encumbered by debt that a demolition sale of Cannons was held in 1747, which dispersed furnishings and structural elements, with the result that elements of Cannons survive in several English country houses, notably Lord Foley's house, Witley Court at Great Witley, and its chapel (ceiling paintings by Bellucci and stained glass by Joshua Price of York after designs by Francesco Sleter).
_	They are combined with new footage of Martin and other actors similarly shot in black-and-white, with the result that the original dialogue and acting of the classic films become part of a completely different story.
_	The organization used strict data provision thresholds, with the result that some highly regarded schools were omitted from the list of 100 ranked schools.
_	"It's like the result that you get with the metal, iron filings and you put a magnet under it and they stand straight up."
_	Because the islet was made up of shellfish and mud, the work was extremely difficult with the result that by 20 October only the stone foundations were in place despite the fact that the project had already expended more than half the funds budgeted for construction.
_	The Tigre and Hedareb populations which introduced pastoral farming and grazing in the area has come into conflict with the Kunama peoples with the result that economic production in the area is now concentrated on arable farming .
_	She had a preference for indirect taxation over taxes on income: in 1979 exchange controls were abolished and the top rate of income tax on "unearned" income cut from 98% to 60%, but value added tax (VAT) was increased sharply to 15% with the result that inflation also rose.
_	Rear Admiral George Martin, with eight vessels, chased the French squadron under Rear Admiral Francois Andre Baudin with the result that two French ships of the line, "Lion" and "Robuste" grounded near Frontignan, where their crews burnt them.
_	The Council accused prosperity theology of taking passages out of context to fulfill its own needs, with the result that doctrine of positive confession is contradictory to the holistic message of the Bible.
_	General Botha's wife was supposed to conduct the official christening, but she was feeling poorly, with the result that Mrs Isie Smuts had to officiate on 1 April 1922.
_	Early in 1685 he was in correspondence with the Independent congregation at Watertown, Connecticut, with the result that on 6 October 1686 he succeeded the Rev. John Sherman at Watertown.
_	In the 2008 international financial crisis, the Icelandic Central Bank, since 2005 under the governorship of Davíð Oddsson, was refused credit lines from the US and Europe, with the result that the banks collapsed.
_	Liverpool businessman Andrew Livingston investigated the claim, with the result that a guano rush developed.
_	However, the organization had to face up to the reality of there not being enough suitable facilities in the old DDR –not limited to stadiums, but including hotels, restaurants and other visitor needs, and transportation infrastructure–, with the result that the east finds itself underrepresented.
_	This has the result that the member can receive his or her own share (allowing for severance in the case of joint tenants) irrespective of the other members.
_	The Citizens of Genopolis are humans who have been genetically engineered to withstand the great extremes of flood and fire, but with the result that they cannot feel pain or emotion.
_	In 1848, there was a revolution related to the Italian Risorgimento, with the result that Roccabruna and Menton became free cities under the protection of the Savoy Prince.
_	They were not enforced, however, with the result that the actual size and equipment of the force in 2002 exceeded what was permitted.
_	He ignored this advice, with the result that there were appalling fatalities from cholera in both the Thanh May and Bai Sai columns.
_	He points out that if the interest rate were negative then there would be no motive to lend, which introduces an initial lower bound, and adds that if the rate is very low, then there is more scope for it to increase than to decrease, with the result that people will hold onto money in the anticipation of rates increasing; and this phenomenon raises the effective lower limit.
_	A large volume of traffic is generated within the town, with the result that the A15 between Bourne and Peterborough is one of the busiest roads in the county.
_	Over the years it has suffered from mining subsidence, with the result that many of the embankments are now much taller than when they were constructed.
_	Télé-Lille's signal did not stop at the country's borders, with the result that the station had five times more viewers in the Belgian provinces of West Flanders, East Flanders, and Hainaut than it had in northern France.
_	In a charge delivered in August 1728 he commended the treatise on the authority of Scripture by Faustus Socinus; with the result that this work was translated into English by an Anglican clergyman, Edward Coombe, and published in 1731 with a dedication to Queen Caroline of Ansbach.
_	Most of the later aircraft were built by Società d'Aeronautica Italiana Ambrosini, with the result that the type is sometimes referred to as the Ambrosini CVV-6 Canguro.
_	In condensation polymerization, he challenged the assumption that the reactivity of the end group decreased as the macromolecule grew, and by arguing that the reactivity was independent of the size, he was able to derive the result that the number of chains present decreased with size exponentially.
_	Jardine threatened to stop him umpiring and sent a telegram to Lord's, with the result that Tarrant, having officiated the first two Tests, was not used in the third.
_	He criticised both sides in the run up to the United Kingdom European Union membership referendum, 2016, but stated after the result that he was disappointed..
_	However, the clitic always forms a phonological word with the preceding word rather than the nominal, with the result that the suffixing generalization is always true as far as the phonology is concerned.
_	At the beginning of overtime Zrinjski scored another goal and had the result that would send them to the next round, but the game ultimately ended with 3–2 Zrinjski victory and Vastra Frolunda went through because of away goals.
_	In 1968, 366 and 377 (original numbers) were scrapped with cars 353 and 354 renumbered to replace them (refer to renumbering table further below) with the result that the H type fleet had been reduced to 26 cars.
_	In one of his pamphlets Roebuck denounced newspapers and everybody connected with them, with the result that John Black, editor of "The Morning Chronicle", challenged him to a duel which was fought on 19 November 1835, but neither party was injured.
_	A difficulty with a thin, high aspect ratio wooden wing is that a very strong and therefore heavy spar is needed, with the result that the Spillo had the highest wing loading of any glider of its time.
_	However, there were minority factions who opposed the Confederacy, with the result that a small-scale Civil War raged inside the territory.
_	The conversion from oil to gas broke this safety concept, with the result that sensitive areas were brought together; for example, the gas compression next to the control room, which played a role in the accident.
_	The hole is not large enough to pull the bird through, but Rastus tries to do so, with the result that he pulls three of the planks of the fence out, and with his hand through these and still holding on to the turkey like grim death, he bolts for home.
_	However, the Prime Minister remained uncertain, with the result that Sirik Matak, accompanied by three army officers, compelled a weeping Lon Nol to sign the necessary documents at gunpoint.
_	While visiting a cave at Carl's Dad's Caverns, Homer meddles with a very fragile stalactite, with the result that the whole family ends up in a hidden cavern below the main tour—with Homer stuck in a narrow hole, half in and half out of the cavern.
_	While geographically small compared to the rest of Qinghai, this area has the largest population density, with the result that the Han Chinese outnumber other ethnicities in Qinghai generally.
_	As the number of non-deposit beverage containers (water, tea, sports beverages, etc.) has increased to represent over one-third of beverage containers sold, the Bottle Bill has no influence on these non-deposit containers, with the result that these containers are three times more likely to be found as litter in Massachusetts communities.
_	In most cases the family are neither consulted or had requested these services with the result that there is little change in the family circumstances and in some instances a greater dependency is created.
_	A constant marginal utility of consumption does not make this distinction, and leads to the result that richer countries should mitigate less.
_	As of 2007, less than 3,220 square kilometres of primary forest remain, with the result that the future sustainability of Cambodia's forest reserves is under severe threat.
_	In desperation, Barton orders repeat-attacks on the same targets with the result that the enemy prepare heavier AA defences, culminating in the loss of five pilots in a single day.
_	Finally, the main drawback of the theory turned out to be the result that particles are not self-interacting.
_	IKEA obtained permits for its proposed retail store; however, the permits were challenged in court by community members opposed to a "big box" use on the waterfront, with the result that redevelopment of the site was stalled for a number of years.
_	The economic turmoil of the Great Depression and World War II, however, forced several teams to fold, with the result that by 1942 the NHL consisted of only 6 teams.
_	Strange keep warm by passing him a bottle of scotch, with the result that Strange was so drunk that after getting out of costume and makeup, he had difficulty dressing himself in his street clothes.
_	This was in the names of Talbot's trustee an Grandison's son Edward Fitzgerald Villiers, but was evidently not successful, with the result that money had to be obtained by mortgaging Launde Abbey to repay Villiers.
_	I am convinced at least—that if any violent attempt were made to overthrow those rights and interfere with that independence, those who made the attempt would find in the result that it would not be Denmark alone with which they would have to contend".
_	The test for liability in negligence laid down in "Anns v Merton" (concerning the liability of both public and private defendants) was disapproved in the subsequent case of "Caparo Industries v Dickman", with the result that the extent of the duty of care of public authority defends would primarily result from asking whether it would be "fair, just and reasonable" to impose liability.
_	Macdonald finished second in both, and on both occasions he angrily denounced the manner in which each competition was held, with the result that "both" tournaments were declared unofficial.
_	According to some observers, "improvements in government policies and programs in income support payments, and services such as education, health, public housing and child care, and the progressive nature of the income tax system, have all contributed to the result that Australia appears to have become a more equal society over the period from 1981–82 to 1993–94".
_	Spiking the pool with these, they completely distract the creature from any thought of finishing the race, with the result that Iantha is once again victorious.
_	The long epistolary story, “Crossing the Border,” mixes Jewish subjects with Soviet reality, with the result that the actions of nearly all of the characters are completely illogical.
_	These he synthesized and ingested, with the result that his appearance was that of a person in his twenties.
_	In April 1955 a new agreement was made with the Iraq Government for the defence of Iraq and the use of bases by the RAF with the result that AHQ Iraq was disbanded by being renamed AHQ Levant on 1 May 1955.
_	Based on their extensive investigation of the disappearance of the golden jellyfish medusae, Dawson et al. determined that the most likely cause was an El Niño weather event that raised the water temperature, with the result that the symbiotic algae (Zooxanthellae) that live within the golden jellyfish medusae and the syphistomae (scyphozoan polyps) could not survive.
_	The Labour candidates were seen as lacking credibility having achieved little during the past term with the result that the party was trounced at the poll: no Labour Party members were elected.
_	The major holdings from these sections were that the Twenty-first Amendment did not "save" Rhode Island's total ban from unconstitutionality and the result that the ban was unconstitutional.
_	So strong is the result that partitions of this class only two or three inches (76 mm) thick were used for temporary cells for prisoners at Newgate Gaol during the rebuilding of the new sessions house in the Old Bailey in London.
_	Maatia Toafa was elected prime minister soon after the election, however on 24 December 2010, he lost office after a motion of no confidence, carried by eight votes to seven, which had the result that a new ministry was formed by Willy Telavi.
_	Although they had been drafted in for these old-age duties, the phenomenal growth in traffic during the 1960s had the result that the Class 12R were also frequently used for road jobs on the Kroonstad as well as the Bethlehem-Harrismith mainlines.
_	The length of the trial was exacerbated by the defence strategy of continually challenging Crown statements, with the result that the Crown was required to strictly prove each and every bit of evidence irrespective of whether it was in dispute or germane to the defence.
_	The automobile engineer Louis Renault purchased it and restored it between 1922 and 1924, with the result that it became known as Château Renault.
_	After the loss in 1970, the university was not willing to fund an unprofitable event, with the result that the 1971 festival was never held.
_	The act of hiding Yaltabaoth also has the result that Yaltabaoth himself remains ignorant of the upper world and the other Aeons.
_	The investigation concluded that they’d lit the small stove in the cabin for warmth, and during the night the wind had changed with the result that the smoke had been blown back into the cabin.
_	The door was closed tight and so there was no ventilation with the result that the three men died from asphyxiation.
_	In 2006, Andre Antibi conducted a survey of 1900 teachers in France, which led to the result that "95% of the teachers recognized that the macabre constant existed, by which they account for the systematic attribution of bad marks."
_	At the beginning of the 5th century, assaults by Germanic tribes rapidly increased, with the result that "Tricensimae" was finally given up.
_	In 2011, a survey by the Datafolha research firm, after asking, again, a sample of São Paulo locals about who would be the best mayor the city had ever had, obtained the result that Maluf stood first with 47% of the sample's preferences.
_	Comparable Linux solutions (e.g., from SUSE and Red Hat) did not offer an integrated, cross-system user and computer management system, with the result that corresponding solutions had to be configured and maintained individually.
_	Angleton believed this claim, with the result that anyone who approximated this description fell under his suspicion.
_	He could never stand out against the regular goalkeeper Mathias Hain with the result that he only came to four matches in all before 2006 including two matches in the 2005–06 season of the Bundesliga.
_	In 1928, Florida, especially the western Panhandle pineywoods, turned dramatically away from the Democratic Party due to the nomination of Catholic Al Smith, with the result that Herbert Hoover became the first Republican to win a statewide election since the end of Reconstruction.
_	Greatly improved reliability of the guns meant that one pair could be removed from the plane as part of lightening efforts, sometimes two, with the result that some planes sometimes had reduced firepower.
_	This gave rise to the so-called "Leander" affair with the result that on 14 June President Thomas Jefferson issued a proclamation ordering "Leander", "Driver", and "Cambrian" immediately to quit US waters and forbidding them ever to return.
_	In addition to the PDO status, there are two other labels that the cheese may carry, farm-made Arzúa-Ulloa ("Arzúa-Ulloa de Granxa"), a cheese having the particularity that the milk comes entirely from cows on the same farm (its characteristics being otherwise similar), and aged Arzúa-Ulloa ("Arzúa-Ulloa curado"), a cheese that has been aged for at least six months, with the result that it is firmer in texture throughout.
_	After securing these two vessels "Pigmy" continued the chase with the result that at 4pm she succeeded in capturing the French privateer cutter "Rancune".
_	One day the keeper of the floodgates, Seithenyn, was drunk and failed to close them, with the result that the sea rushed in and covered the land.
_	Unusually, the fossil species was identified and named prior to the discovery of the extant species, with the result that the type species of "Speothos" is "S. pacivorus".
_	Phonological rules can miss the point when it comes to loanwords, which are borrowings that move from a language with one set of well-formedness conditions to a language with a different set, with the result that adjustments have to be made to meet the new constraints (Yip 1993:262).
_	In such a case, the trust is sometimes deemed to have terminated (with the result that the beneficiary owns the trust property outright).
_	Following Menotti's death in 2007, changes occurred in the administration with the result that the Italian Minister of Cultural Affairs appointed a new Artistic Administrator who continues to run the Festival.
_	I came across everywhere parties of British officers arranging to erect memorials...Incidentally these suggested to me the idea of erecting a memorial cairn on the first battlefield of my own regiment; with the result that there stands on a rocky kopje in the north of Cape Colony...the first Australian War Memorial erected on a battlefield.
_	In the 1970s, city leaders undertook an effort to list downtown on the National Register of Historic Places with the result that now "every" building in downtown Wallace is on the National Register of Historic Places.
_	When videotape technology was first created, in the 1950s, tapes were extremely costly; but their reusability meant that the cost of a single tape could be spread across several productions, with each successive production erasing and then reusing the tape from a previous one, with the result that relatively few programmes produced on videotape in the 1950s and 1960s still exist in their original format.
_	Whereas the Cats have continued to be near the top of the league, Collingwood have steadily declined since this season as the powers of their formidable on-ball players have faded, with the result that the Magpies did not play finals between 2014 and 2017.
_	Typically Planet only manifests to deal with the bigger crisis and then departs, but a few storylines have explored him existing beyond these moments, such as when he was summoned while Kwame and Ma-Ti were in space, with the result that the energy from their rings that created Planet could not return to its source, resulting in Planet being forced to operate on a human level, such as requiring a crowbar and handcuff keys to rescue the rest of the team.
_	In 1990, Ad Bax and coworkers developed the triple resonance technology and experiments on proteins isotopically labelled with N and C, with the result that the spectra are dramatically simplified, greatly facilitating the process of resonance assignment, and increasing the size of the protein that may be determined by NMR.
_	Kai Hafez states, “Many governments in the Arab world have tried to hijack the issue of media ethics and have used it as yet another controlling device, with the result that many Arab journalists, while they love to speak about the challenges of their profession, hate performing under the label of media ethics.
_	In the early 1980s, Fedwire was taxed to its limit with the result that it was often subject to "throttle", which means that it took messages from the banks more slowly than its normal speed.
_	The companies remained independent of the Hollywood system which bought up many of the other publishing houses, with the result that the brothers retained a strong financial position.
_	Sometime before this, Augustus Thomas, the dramatic writer, was on one of the daily papers, and had written a column a day for forty days about the St. Louis Exposition, so upon being assigned to the Exposition a couple of years later, Roper thought she could do what anyone else could, and she, too, wrote a column a day for forty days, in addition to her regular writing, with the result that she suffered a breakdown in health.
_	Kabbalah, in its most literal and "realistic" sense, has in fact been extensively popularised, with the result that many otherwise pious Jewish groups are now permeated with superstition, so that the whole enterprise is now more trouble than it is worth.
_	Caliphal authority in the provinces collapsed during the "Anarchy at Samarra", with the result that by the 870s the central government had lost effective control over most of the Caliphate outside the metropolitan region of Iraq.
_	As occurred elsewhere, road transport took over much of the business with the result that only spasmodic grain transport remains.
_	However, for a variety of reasons, the regeneration saw the departure of many shops, most notably the virtual emptying of Ballymun Shopping Centre, with the result that, as happened when Ballymun was first built up, the more than 17,000 residents have to travel to other districts for major grocery, and virtually all non-grocery, shopping.
_	Mackenzie was again involved in a major dispute in the aftermath of the battle over credit for the victory, with the result that he never again served at sea.
_	In English law, for example, §2 Immigration Act 1988 prohibits certain polygamous wives from exercising their right of abode with the result that any application from such a wife has to be considered in accordance with paragraphs 278 to 280 of the Immigration Rules, which contain provisions to restrict settlement in most cases to one wife.
_	In 1993, the hugely popular romantic comedy film "Sleepless In Seattle" by Nora Ephron made such frequent references to "An Affair To Remember" that it gave the older film a whole new lease on life in revivals, cable TV, and video, with the result that it is probably McCarey's most popular and accessible film today.
_	A skirmish ensued with the result that Linois, somewhat inexplicably, withdrew.
_	Critics of the welfare state claim that, in addition to the vast expense, by relieving citizens of personal responsibility for their own welfare the government has inadvertently promoted irresponsible and immature attitudes, with the result that squalor, ignorance, and idleness are common.
_	To serve this cathedral he introduced his own Augustinian brethren, with the result that Carlisle was the only see in England with an Augustinian cathedral chapter, the other monastic cathedral chapters in England consisting of Benedictine monks.
_	This ridge separates several sets of watersheds in central Maryland, with the result that MD 27 bridges no significant streams.
_	The early surveying, particularly in Ohio, was performed with more speed than care, with the result that many of the oldest townships and sections vary considerably from their prescribed shape and area.
_	Mr. Stone wields a trenchant pen but his penchant for striking sentences, and perhaps his prejudices, lead him into exaggerations and inaccuracies, with the result that some of the sketches seem like campaign propaganda, post-mortem pro or con, rather than impartial biography.
_	As she was coming up to dock for repairs she struck the pier and her anchor drove through her bows with the result that she ended up with four feet of water in her hold.
_	In these, and other matches, Inter had a shortness of goals with the result that their wins were, often, due to the performances of individual players (mainly the captain Icardi and Perišić).
_	PowerPoint 3.0, which was shipped in 1992 for both Windows and Mac, added live video for projectors and monitors, with the result that PowerPoint was thereafter used for delivering presentations as well as for preparing them.
_	She described the trial as extremely painful, especially given the result that Williamson received amnesty.
_	Cresswell questioned the decision through official channels, with the result that he retained the position of wing leader, as well as the command of No. 77 Squadron.
_	It was the first state election to be fought following a 1971 electoral redistribution that added four seats to the parliament and created four electoral zones with a weightage towards rural seats, with the result that while Brisbane electorates averaged about 22,000 voters, some rural seats such as Gregory and Balonne had fewer than 7000.
_	Species from drier habitats tend to be smaller, or less robust, with sparser foliage and possessing a greater number of oil glands, with the result that they are more aromatic than species found in wetter habitats.
_	For example, this short-hand trick gives, for the case of formula_6 in the above sum, the result that
_	The fourth condition (teaching elsewhere without examination) was originally considered by scholars of the time to be the most important criterion, with the result that the appellation "Studium Generale" was customarily reserved to refer only to the oldest and most prestigious schools—specifically Salerno, Bologna, Paris, and sometimes Oxford—until this oligopoly was broken by papal and imperial charters in the course of the 13th century.
_	A skirmish ensued with the result that Linois, somewhat inexplicably, withdrew.
_	To deal with this increase, some saints were moved to alternate days in some traditions or completely removed, with the result that some saints have different feast days in different calendars.
_	On separate occasions in late May and early July, the sunset is aligned with the street grid lines, with the result that the sun is visible at or near the western horizon from street level.
_	This construction should be compared with the result that a ring is a preadditive category with just one object, shown here.
_	In hospital, it is revealed that the second bullet dislodged the first bullet with the result that Stan recovers completely and, much to the appall of Francine and Hayley, believes that "guns heal the sick", once again pro-guns.
_	The progress of these projects was initially slow, but after Germany had declared war on the United States, the "Reichsluftfahrtministerium" (RLM) started a more serious programme in the spring of 1942 for a very long range bomber, with the result that a larger, six-engine aircraft with a greater bomb load was called for.
_	It was thought likely that she would have survived had that been the end of the incident, but the ropes holding the chair to the body of the balloon may have burnt through, or the impact may have thrown her forwards, with the result that Blanchard, trapped in the netting of the balloon, pitched over the side of the roof into the street below.
_	In Campidanese, final /e o/ have been raised to /i u/, with the result that the metaphonic alternations have been phonemicized.
_	Officer Carl Beatty was a public spokesman for a shift to uniforms made by outside manufacturers, with the result that House Bill 2346 passed during the 2012 Washington State Regular Legislative Session.
_	She insisted upon regulating the affairs of her married daughter's life with the result that Frank Emerson (King), the young husband, soon became involved in an affair with Delia Marshall (West), a designer.
_	Opposing the motion, Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong noted that the Burkean model of representative democracy "puts the emphasis on choosing candidates to become MPs as the fundamental element of the whole scheme", with the result that "if an MP dies or resigns, ... he has to be replaced, so a by-election has to be held promptly without delay".
_	By the morning of 17 May, the German 14th Division was forced to retire to a new breastwork dug behind the original front position, connecting the (strong points) behind the front line, with the result that British bombardments and attacks met only small parties of rearguards.
_	In mathematics, Parseval's theorem usually refers to the result that the Fourier transform is unitary; loosely, that the sum (or integral) of the square of a function is equal to the sum (or integral) of the square of its transform.
_	However, the senators persuaded the other tribunes to oppose Pontificius, with the result that enrolment for military service was not hampered.
_	The wing is effectively flying in a downdraft of its own making, as if the freestream flow were tilted downward, with the result that the total aerodynamic force vector is tilted backward slightly compared to what it would be in two dimensions.
_	In the 2014 film, there is no reference to the Directives, but Murphy, like the drones, is programmed to protect 'red assets' in the form of individuals wearing coded bracelets identifying themselves as assets who must be protected, with the result that he is initially unable to shoot or arrest men who are genuinely threats to him without his cybernetic systems shutting down, although he is able to override this program at the end when the OmniCorp CEO threatens to shoot his wife and son.
_	The same day, a determined bombardment once more reduced the Malakoff and its dependencies to impotence, and it was with absolute confidence in the result that Marshal Pélissier planned the final assault.
_	The quarrel was submitted to the consideration of several English bishops of both provinces in September 1675, with the result that Ramsay retained the see of Dunblane.
_	Larger and larger ships were built for the cross-Channel service with the result that they could only use Folkestone Harbour at high tide in the 1860s whilst the pier was extended.
_	He also claims that banking guild memberships cannot be used as a proxy for general economic conditions, as the problem could be that "by this time, in fact, Florentine guilds had long lost much of an economic function in the areas of their formally defined activity, with the result that the quality of their internal administration deteriorated; but this institutional history cannot be taken as an indicator of the vitality of the respective sectors of the economy the guilds nominally represented."
_	The ISU defines a fall as a loss of control with the result that the majority of the skater's body weight is not on the blade but supported by hands, knees, or buttocks.
_	Unlike areas to the south and west, the area was not planed down by glaciation or covered in glacial drift, with the result that there are steep, high-walled canyons that little resembles what one normally sees in Iowa rivers in the western and southern regions of the state.
_	On 26 December 1958 Eisenhower asked the Special Group to institute weekly meetings, with the result that "criteria for submission of projects to the Group were, in practice, considerably broadened."
_	However, "Swiss aloofness or unilateralism was hard to overcome", with the result that the relationship between the ICRC and the League became, and was to remain, a problem for years to come.
_	The Roman Emperor Tiberius was said to have made preparations almost yearly for a visit to the provinces and the armies stationed there, which he always cancelled at the last minute, with the result that "he was jokingly referred to as Callippides, who was known in the Greek proverb to run and make not a cubit of progress".
_	About a month into the voyage Hogan had to put down a mutiny, with the result that seven convicts and a sergeant, one of the mutineers, died of their injuries, including flogging.
_	When the Red Army defeated the Japanese, on 15 September, Stalin had achieved exactly the result that he wanted.
_	Again with the result that B.C. Partizani Tirana was among the best twelve teams of the competition.
_	His warm and personable style, combined with his patriotism, were a boost to wartime morale, and he set himself a punishing schedule with the result that a decade later, in his words, 'there was not a town or city anywhere in Great Britain that I had not visited'.
_	However, the novel's Giller Prize win pushed sales demand for the novel well beyond the 1,000 copies per week that Gaspereau could produce on its own, with the result that the book was virtually unavailable in stores.
_	An alternative proof of the result that subgroup of index lowest prime "p" is normal, and other properties of subgroups of prime index are given in .
_	The offensive line suffered no major injuries for the first time all season, with the result that Jack Thompson had time to complete four touchdown passes.
_	Upon being dismissed, the disgruntled contractor employees ran one of the new locomotives, no. 4 "Wellington", into a culvert, with the result that it had to be sent to the newly established workshops at Salt River to have some serious damage repaired.
_	She ultimately decides to go back on her deal, with the result that she is killed in 1964 after all, with one difference to the original timeline; she now manages to say 'Remember me' before falling off the pier.
_	The king ordered a necropsy, with the result that Sir Everard Home, 1st Baronet and Sir David Dundas, 1st Baronet, reported that everything had been done for the best.
_	In a second version, the "50/50 Tanks", only half the tank is filled with distilled water, with the result that the balls float half in and half out of the water.
_	For any summation method "L", its Abelian theorem is the result that if "c" = ("c") is a convergent sequence, with limit "C", then "L"("c") = "C".
_	Kruse's dolls took on a sorrowful countenance following the death of her son in battle, with the result that Adolf Hitler closed the factory and forbid her from making more dolls.
_	The 17th century to the early 19th century witnessed the growth of large estates, and the opportunity for a farmer to hold land other than by tenancy was significantly reduced, with the result that by the 19th century about 90% of agricultural land area and holdings were tenanted, although these figures declined markedly after World War II, to around 60% in 1950, and only 35% of agricultural land area in 1994.
_	But, when iron binds to the IRE-BP, the IRE-BP changes shape with the result that the IRE-BPs can no longer bind the ferritin mRNA.
_	Given a chance for social reintegration, he received penitentiary leave of six days in 1992, and he took advantage of it to escape, with the result that he didn’t finish his sentence and he was from that point on arrest warrant.
_	Kallman had been the beneficiary of the entirety of Auden's estate, but himself died intestate, with the result that the estate was inherited by his next-of-kin, his father, Edward Kallman (1892–1986), a New York dentist in his eighties.
_	The Secretary's exact authority and functions, however, were not clearly defined, with the result that the ambitious Pereira would try to carve out a large share of the government of Portuguese India for his office and clash frequently with Almeida.
_	In 1931, there was a conflict between the bishops in the Polish National Catholic Church with the result that bishop Władysaw Faron founded his own Polish Old Catholic Church.
_	At the end of the 4th century, the last Roman troops left their camps in Wales, with the result that raiding and settling by the Irish significantly increased there.
_	The problem, he said, is that today's society is paedophile, with the result that people easily fall into it, and the fact that it is being denounced is a good sign.
_	When he was six years old, his parents, who are both of Afro-Surinamese descent, went through a divorce with the result that his mother moved to Amsterdam.
_	At the time of the investiture Williams had not recovered from his severe wounds, and during the presentation the wound in his arm opened up with the result that medical attention had to be given before he could leave the palace.
_	His father was unconcerned, but mother was not sympathetic, with the result that he went as a Non-subscribing Presbyterian ministry student to the newly founded Queen's University Belfast, where he read Theology under Dr. Henry Montgomery and the Rev. John Scott Porter and studied Hebrew.
_	It is customary that when a person dies that these Fanery are buried with them, with the result that over time these have for the most part vanished and today are exceedingly scarce.
_	Under Austrian rule, the significance of the various axes changed with the result that many of the city's sinuous streets were rebuilt and frequently straightened out.
_	In an era before modern computerized databases, errors were inevitable, with the result that volume 30 ran through Z, then started over again at A to include a few more cases (and other miscellaneous materials) omitted the first time around.
_	He initiated a policy of raising funds from sources other than rates, with the result that rates fell from 66% of council's income in 1980 to 38% in 1987.
_	He was said to be a weak child who was spoiled by his mother with the result that he was a slow starter.
_	Christians were found among the Hephthalite Huns from the 5th century, and the Mesopotamian patriarch assigned two bishops (John of Resh-aina and Thomas the Tanner) to both peoples, with the result that many were baptized.
_	According to the Mexican Summer label, DiMaggio's approach to songwriting changes on each new record, with the result that no two Home Blitz releases sound alike.
_	The French vessel struck her colours as soon as "Hippomenes" pulled alongside, with the result that the British suffered only one man wounded.
_	The election results were completely fabricated to give the Communists large majorities: the Soviet press service released them early, with the result that they had already appeared in print in a London newspaper a full 24 hours before the polls closed.
_	Additionally, the bottom of the scroll along its entire length has been severely damaged (apparently torn off), with the result that each column of Tangut text is missing a few characters at the bottom.
_	It is reported that Henry was so pleased with the result that he invited both houses to dine with him privately.
_	With medical advances in cancer screening and treatment, cancer has become a chronic rather than an acute disease with the result that patients survive longer with cancer.
_	Production duties are also shared with Grammy Award winner Raphael Saadiq (Mary J. Blige, The Isley Brothers) and Warryn Campbell (Jamie Foxx, Yolanda Adams), with the result that "Love the Woman" encompasses contemporary R&B, jazz, and pop, and also finds Moore personalizing songs by two influential past artists:
_	Mechs, those that are intended for combat or related operations, are the predominant variety, with the result that the term is frequently applied to all BattleTech mecha.
_	Management has always insisted on keeping the digital edition behind a paywall, with the result that the number of subscribers since 2005 has remained stalled at the 3,000 mark.
_	Mayer was so impressed he ordered every writer, director and producer on the lot to hear her with the result that the audition, which began at 9 am, finished at 7:30 pm. Frances (Judy) was signed, and that was the start of her career.
_	Landowners could and did build windmills to act as drainage engines, but there was no overall policy, with the result that there were legal disputes, with one landowner complaining that a neighbour's drainage mill resulted in flooding of surrounding properties.
_	His lifestyle, which involved frequent gifts to his girlfriends and lavish expenditure with his colleagues, resulted in substantial credit-card debts which he found difficult to manage on his salary, with the result that he also borrowed substantial sums from wealthy friends.
_	The Goose Lake International Music Festival drew attendees away from the blues festival, with the result that the festival lost $30,000.
_	The relationships that Monosini develops between Greek and his contemporary vernacular rather suffer from his unconditional enthusiasm, with the result that the associations proposed are often cumbersome and sometimes quite bizarre.
_	Thus, unrestricted economic competition has the result that the law of value regulates the trade in newly produced commodities: the ultimate limits of what products will trade for, i.e. their supply price, are set by comparative costs in labour-time.
_	By this time, the trunnion (a short axle protruding from either side of the gun barrel) had been developed, with the result that the barrel could be held in two recesses in the carriage and secured with an iron band, the "capsquare".
_	She fought before striking with the result that she had one man killed and some men wounded, and she wounded two men on "Melampus".
_	Thus, the crane 'grew' and 'wandered' with the building with the result that today all extant construction cranes in England are found in church towers above the vaulting and below the roof, where they remained after building construction for bringing material for repairs aloft.
_	In 1996, Scottish banks made the business decision to harmonise their own holidays with the rest of the United Kingdom, with the result that 'bank holidays' in Scotland are neither public holidays nor the days on which banks are closed.
_	The repressions did not have the desired effect, with the result that Forster became isolated within the Cabinet, and coercion became increasingly unpopular with the Liberal Party.
_	Immerman is the winner, jointly with Róbert Szelepcsényi, of the 1995 Gödel Prize in theoretical computer science for proof of what is known as the Immerman–Szelepcsényi theorem, the result that nondeterministic space complexity classes are closed under complementation.
_	However this action exacerbated the problem, with the result that the Government funded research into Aboriginal family histories.
_	On the other hand, Metal Storm review underlines how, despite "Floor's beautiful voice (...), the album lacks the punch" and "is nowhere near to what it could or should be", with the result that "even though it has its moments, it still feels like it's been stitched together of undeveloped and underdeveloped ideas".
_	In addition to their philanthropic and business contributions to the town, the Wadsworths planted many oak trees, with the result that the village now has a large number of mature trees approaching 200 years or more in age.
_	In Chapter 42, with Kimihito's help, she begins to work on getting over her self-esteem problems (with the result that she may become infatuated with Kimihito too).
_	A number of Northern states also restricted the migration of free blacks, with the result that emancipated blacks had difficulty finding places to legally settle.
_	Justice Jackson objected, with the result that Jackson filed a concurrence disassociating himself from the ruling and, by implication, criticizing Black for not addressing the conflict of interest.
_	Whenever he chooses to bring in events, as in ""Cupid aur Psyche"" ("Cupid and Psyche"), abstract ideas make their sneaky appearance and overcrowd the events, with the result that they are prevented from proceeding further.
_	In 1859 the B&CDR sold its Holywood branch to the BH&BR, with the result that Holywood station came under BH&BR management.
_	Nonetheless the operator will seek to make as many contacts as possible in the operating time available, with the result that contacts are often extremely brief, limited just to an exchange of signal reports.
_	Matambo warned the Spaniards about plans against them with the result that the indigenous forces were crushed and the remaining indigenous people were gradually exterminated by slavery, smallpox and other European diseases.
_	Both romances place al-Battal in the mid-9th century and associate him with the epic cycle of Malatya and its emir, Umar al-Aqta (died 863), with the result that he became particularly associated with the city of Malatya and its region.
_	John's son and successor, King Henry III was equally generous to Beaulieu, with the result that the abbey became very wealthy, though it was far from the richest English Cistercian house.
_	At the same time his younger son, Wolf, presented himself as a Sabbatean prophet, with the result that the "yeshivah" was closed.
_	Glasgow took the provision of open spaces extremely seriously, with the result that parks such as Queen's Park sprang up across the city.
_	They did not use the complicated cryptographic systems of their superior headquarters, but easily-broken field ciphers, with the result that their carelessness nullified the precautions taken by the higher echelons.
_	In 1960, Hurricane Donna damaged this lighthouse, with the result that a new lighthouse replaced it in 1962.
_	Large bodies of supporters of the visiting team would infiltrate the popular terracing of the home supporters with the result that violence often erupted.
_	Louis was so impressed by the result that he named Beaumarchais "Purveyor to the King", and the Caron family business became prosperous.
_	Cantor chose "Ueber eine Eigenschaft des Inbegriffes aller reellen algebraischen Zahlen" ("On a Property of the Collection of All Real Algebraic Numbers"), which refers to the countability of the set of real algebraic numbers, the result that Weierstrass found useful.
_	The Friedmans pointed out that Gallup, in attempting to use Bacon's biliteral cipher to decode Shakespeare's works, had been able to take advantage of the variable fonts to give her great freedom in arbitrarily selecting most of the letters of her message, with the result that she found "what it was she was determined to find."
_	Bonthron's continual rough treatment of Conlin enraged the home crowd with the result that after the game he was attacked by some of the home supporters and the United team was pelted with missiles as they left the stadium.
_	Negotiations were held with the result that in 1865 Bourget was given authority to divide the parish of Notre-Dame on the condition that the new parishes would be offered first to the Sulpicians, that the Sulpicians would name their own priests to the parishes but would require them to be invested by the Bishop, and that the new parish priests could be dismissed by either the Bishop or the Superior of the Sulpicians.
_	Epicurus' problem is this: if it has been necessary all along that we should act as we do, it cannot be up to us, with the result that we would not be morally responsible for our actions at all.
_	Her vendetta against Mildred begins in the selection day tests, when Ethel's attempt to prove herself by creating a potion that would turn her into a dragon is inadvertently sabotaged by Mildred; Mildred 'stole' part of a key ingredient from Ethel's potion because she needed it for her own levitation spell, with the result that Ethel's spell turned her instead into a worm.
_	The anticline is somewhat domed, with the result that Old Winchester Hill is capped by older chalk than Beacon Hill despite being rather higher, whilst Wether Down and Butser Hill to the east are higher still.
_	The layout of the town is unique in the sense that residential quarter cells were laid out which are bordered by main routes and green strips, with the result that only internal traffic is found within such cells.
_	These tests were the first of the kind conducted under circumstances of entire reliability, with the result that the report of the trials was republished all over the world and is still quoted in all the text books on steam engineering.
_	She had remained a virgin for Christ during her first marriage: she continued in this resolve as Ecgfrityh's bride, with the result that he could not expect to father an heir.
_	The probable cause of the accident was that "The aircraft was allowed to lose height and flying speed with the result that the pilot was no longer able to exercise asymmetric control."
_	Some academics believe that this intervention transformed the legal nature of the conflict as a whole, with the result that even the rebels should have been considered as one of the parties to an overarching international conflict spanning the whole Libyan territory.
_	Although a contract was signed between Álvares and Lisbon municipal authorities in November 1471 to begin the chapel, the death of both Paul II and Isabella around this time probably prevented the campaign from going forward, with the result that Ferdinand remained unbeatified and uncanonized.
_	The rationale for this test was that the real Lister is a terrible guitar player, but "believed" he was an excellent one (contrary to his admission that he's not a very good player in "Marooned"), with the result that the Psiren's illusion was based on Lister's belief in his skills rather than being a reflection of his genuine capabilities.
_	Magi speakers have for a long time had close contacts and (probably extensive) integration with Austronesian speakers, with the result that there has been a significant adoption of Austronesian vocabulary (around 30–40%, particularly Magori, Gadaisu, Suau, Ouma, Yoba and Bina, of which the last three are now extinct).
_	The CD was released in cooperation with Greenpeace with the result that the cover was printed on recycled paper.
_	A controversy arose and Sutcliffe declined the offer with the result that William Worsley, another amateur, was appointed instead.
_	Orientation seems to be to the East, in the direction of the rising sun, with the result that the terms "kedem", "saphon" and "negev" became generalized with "facing", "left" and "right" side of anything.
_	Some claim they were a Nyamwezi people who had moved northwestward to escape Mirambo's raids with the result that game and tsetse re-occupied the deserted area.
_	The optimization was finally disallowed in C++11, with the result that even passing a as an argument to a function, viz.
_	In that source, he is said to have painted a vessel with red, green and violet splotches (not unlike a Pointillist painting), with the result that, when viewed from a distance, the ship appeared “to melt into sea and sky,” making it less visible than if it had been painted with a flat “battleship gray,” as had been the earlier practice.
_	However, due to the external crisis with Italy, the plan had to be temporarily postponed with the result that it never fully materialized.
_	A 'paravirus' is mentioned as the method of converting "Homo sapiens" serfs to "Homo servus", the sex cells being transformed with the result that infected human parents give birth to servus children.
_	This is partly because it is more frequently used than any other, and partly because Proto-Indo-European offered more than one verb suitable for use in these functions, with the result that the daughter languages, in different ways, have tended to form suppletive verb paradigms.
_	The leaders encouraged their followers to boycott subsequent Ghana parliamentary and presidential elections, with the result that NDC officials won 189 of 200 seats in the parliament.
_	The Presbyterians and the Scots, after, Cornet George Joyce of Fairfax's horse seized upon the person of the King for the New Model Army on 3 June 1647, began at once to prepare for a fresh civil war, this time against Independency, as embodied in the New Model Army and after making use of its sword, its opponents attempted to disband it, to send it on foreign service, to cut off its arrears of pay, with the result that it was exasperated beyond control, and, remembering not merely its grievances but also the principle for which it had fought, soon became the most powerful political party in the realm.
_	Women campaigned for their rights with the women to drive movement and the anti male-guardianship campaign, with the result that some improvements to their status occurred during the second decade of the twenty-first century.
_	Leonoff and his colleague Julius Shore were invited to a site visit with the Cemetery Board and Mountain View staff, with the result that the headstones remained untouched.
_	The company distributing the film abruptly went out of business with the result that less than 2,000 copies of the tape were ever distributed.
_	Most of the coins were likely bought by coin dealers, leaving few for collectors, with the result that prices spiked from the $1 cost at the time of issue.
_	The process has been upset by a spate of international and local corporate failures, with the result that governments worldwide saw the need for regulation of auditors to be tightened up and became more involved in the process.
_	Another important Jewish scholar, and one still active, is David Weiss Halivni (b.1927): he has developed a theory of "Chate'u Yisrael", literally, "Israel has sinned", which states that the originally monotheistic Israelites adopted pagan practices from their neighbours and neglected the Torah of Moses, with the result that it became "blemished and maculated;" only on the return from Babylon did the people once again accept the Torah, which was then recompiled and edited by Ezra as evidenced in Ezra–Nehemiah and Talmudic and Midrashic sources which indicate that Ezra played a role in editing the Torah.
_	Nevertheless, Lancashire’s bowling had become so strong that he was able to play only four games for the first eleven, with the result that Nottinghamshire, wanting a bowler to support Wass and John Gunn, turned to Hallam (qualified for them by birth).
_	Although the Commons had passed a bill to grant Charles the duties he wanted for one year, the Duke of Buckingham and others succeeded in blocking this in the House of Lords, with the result that Parliament granted the new king no rights of tonnage and poundage at all.
_	As a result of her exceptional ability (she is thought to have invented the pirouette), she became a threat to Gaétan Vestris with the result that she was relegated to secondary roles.
_	Another of her faults was that the nut holding the steering wheel on often came loose, with the result that the wheel came off in the helmsman's hands.
_	Hans and Schwartz desire to take the challenge, duel each other with the result that Schwartz is thrown into jail for disturbing the peace.
_	In 1944, when the Soviet troops returned to Bukovina, many inhabitants fled to Romania, and Soviet persecutions resumed, with the result that the region was seriously depopulated.
_	Burston and Colonel Neil Hamilton Fairley met with the 9th Division's commander, Major General Leslie Morshead, as did Blamey, with the result that Blamey sought its relief.
_	Most of it is covered in forest that has been undisturbed for decades, and even centuries, with the result that its oak and beech woods are among the most untouched and impressive in Germany, and the island boasts a rich diversity of birds and small mammals.
_	After the war Kavishar renewed his calls for action, with the result that he was expelled from Delhi.
_	In 2011 there was a major restoration project under local architect Francois Coulomb, with the result that the interior today provides a stunning example of the ideals of the first builders.
_	SWP publications are now printed by commercial printers with the result that their appearance has undergone a great improvement.
_	The car was reported to be too soft on its Michelin tyres, with the result that it was not generating enough heat to post competitive qualifying times.
_	In the light of the 1994 Accord on Afrikaner self-determination and the mistake of the South African government to not publish the abolition of the Orania Transitional Representative Council it was very likely that Orania would win the case, with the result that the High Court would cancel the elections scheduled for the next day.
_	Harrison's establishment of the academy was over-leveraged, with the result that there was little leeway when tuition collections dropped.
_	At the Heidelberg meeting and the preliminary convention ("Vorparlament") of Frankfurt he deeply impressed the assemblies with the breadth and moderation of his views; with the result that when the German national parliament met (18 May), he was elected its first president.
_	The first Duke of Buckingham altered the course of Buckingham's history when he opposed the proposed route of the London and Birmingham Railway through the town, with the result that it failed to attract early development and was overtaken by Aylesbury.
_	Since April 2011, Washington has recognized same-sex marriages performed in other jurisdictions as equivalent to its domestic partnerships, with the result that community property rules now apply to these couples as well, when residing in Washington.
_	The VC had successfully established control over most of the province with the result that South Vietnamese Government control was limited to the major towns and outposts along Route 4.
_	Originally, the Abomination is twice as strong as the Hulk, but unlike the Hulk his strength does not increase/decrease in proportion to level of anger, with the result that the Hulk is able to gain an advantage over Blonsky if the fight takes a sufficient amount of time for his anger to increase.
_	In the confusion, Whitlam and his advisers did not immediately tell any Senate members of the dismissal, with the result that when the Senate convened at 2.00 pm, the appropriation bills were rapidly passed, with the ALP senators assuming the Opposition had given in.
_	To the younger generation of native Hebrew speakers, these distinctions seem arbitrary and meaningless; on the other hand, Hebrew language purists have rejected out of hand the idea of changing the basics of niqqud and fitting them to the current pronunciation – with the result that in practice niqqud is increasingly going out of use.
_	Chege foretold that the Kikuyus and other tribes would be colonised by the Caucasians but that the colonisation would end after many years (68 years) with the result that the Caucasians would leave Kenya.
_	That law, passed on March 3, 1845, standardized nationwide mail rates, with the result that the use of stamps became a practical and reliable method of postal prepayment.
_	Before standardization, the many different postal rates in different jurisdictions had made fees too unpredictable to prepay all letters with stamps as a matter of course, with the result that recipients of letters—rather than senders—generally paid the postage on them.
_	In the early days, the strip had a large following among students at colleges and high schools, with the result that Martin sometimes made personal appearances at proms.
_	One of these I observed about midday at Coimbra in Lusitania (Portugal) in the year 1559 [sic], in which the Moon was placed between my sight and the Sun with the result that it covered the whole Sun for a considerable length of time.
_	As an extreme example, RFC-822 email messages produced today (2017) use the same basic header names and syntax as ARPANet mail messages from the late 1970s, with the result that messages written using software that is 40 years old can be read using modern software, and vice versa.
_	During the IRA campaign, a car bomb was placed outside the front entrance to the office block in High Holborn, with the result that all 10 floor windows back and front were blown out, Security staff were injured but fortunately there were no fatalities.
_	By the 1960s air-travel became feasible and long distance holiday destinations opened up with the result that by 1965, Britain's first birding tour company, "Ornitholidays" was started by Lawrence Holloway.
_	Romantic encounters moved from the home to the sphere of consumer leisure with the result that the search for romantic love was made into a vector for the consumption of leisure goods produced by expanding industries of leisure.
_	Those letters apparently inflamed the Emerson family, with the result that Ralph Waldo drafted a chilly letter to Sanborn, informing Sanborn of Emerson's wife's displeasure at having been accused.
_	This change in Swedish occupation policy followed swiftly, with the result that repression of the state and the civilian population increased sharply.
_	In April 1789, however, twelve months after the departure from Botany Bay by the French expedition led by Jean-François de Galaup, comte de Lapérouse, a catastrophic epidemic of smallpox (or possibly chicken pox) spread through the Eora people and surrounding groups, with the result that local Aborigines died in their hundreds.
_	It was in the 1880s that they were first rediscovered in the church at Elmelunde with the result that the artist became known as the Elmelunde Master.
_	Inaugurated in 2003 with the rest of the line, the station is located in hilly terrain, with the result that it has two accesses, one above and one below the station.
_	"Top-down" approaches, based on macroeconomics, assume that the economy is efficient in the baseline case, with the result that mitigation policies always have a positive cost.
_	In 1315 the Norman Barons pressed a new charter, the "Charte aux Normands" on Louis X of France with the result that the decisions of the Exchequer of Normandy was declared final, meaning that Paris could not overturn decisions made in Rouen and that the King could not raise a new tax on the Normans without their approval.
_	Pac-Man and ghost characters were implemented using the 2600's two Player objects, with one being used for Pac-Man and the other being used for all four ghosts, with the result that each ghost only appears once out of every four frames, which creates a flickering effect.
_	MC Governor is not aware, however, that the time travel method used alters its molecular structure, with the result that his components explode via nuclear blasts when they reach the moment in which they were originally altered.
_	Quadratic irrationals have useful properties, especially in relation to continued fractions, where we have the result that "all" real quadratic irrationals, and "only" real quadratic irrationals, have periodic continued fraction forms.
_	In recent decades the large number of people moving into Okazaki and the surrounding cities (particularly to work in the motor vehicle industry) and mass media have influenced the local dialect, with the result that in day-to-day life more people are using only standard Japanese.
_	Reeve and Croil Hunter (President of Northwest) flew to Washington to plead their case without success, but on their way back to the hotel, Reeve met Major General Sam Anderson, who had served with Reeve's brother Richard, and explained their predicament with the result that the military were persuaded to pronounce the field "militarily desirable" and thus Shemya was saved.
_	A crash dive was carried out with the result that the boat hit the seabed, causing some damage which was able to be repaired.
_	A grand stairway was built, but removed during street widening in the 1930s- the low arched doorways were extended downwards to street level, with the result that the visitor is not greeted by the grand entrance hall Richardson planned, but by the low corridors which were once the basement.
_	He was so pleased with the result that he began to explore the idea of using keyboards without guitars in rock music.
_	However, the Prime Minister remained uncertain, with the result that Sirik Matak, accompanied by three army officers, finally compelled a weeping Lon Nol to sign the necessary documents at gunpoint.
_	The website asserts that the virtual environment reveals some re-constructions to be architecturally impossible, with the result that the virtual model excludes certain interpretations.
_	Conjoining hedonism—as a view as to what is good for people—to utilitarianism has the result that all action should be directed toward achieving the greatest total amount of happiness (see Hedonic calculus).
_	On 8 August 1944 whilst in the floating dock at Trincomalee, Ceylon, she was severely damaged when the dock collapsed with the result that repairs were stopped.
_	"There is hardly another author who owes as little to other authors as Wieser, fundamentally to none except Menger and to him only a suggestion – with the result that for a long time many fellow economists did not know what to do with Wieser's work.
_	The gunpowder never came near the firing mechanism, with the result that the bullet never left the gun.
_	A few months after he arrived in Poland he was brutally robbed, which had the result that he became interested in violent people.
_	It is believed to have been written in Hebrew and then translated into Greek and the Greek translated again into Latin, with the result that a large number of proper names not found in Biblical texts are garbled beyond restoration.
_	The western slope of Mount Brandon presents a huge contrast from its eastern side, as it largely escaped the gouging effect of the glaciers, with the result that it presents an almost unbroken grassy slope.
_	As Hampton said, herself: "This arrangement at the same time will relieve the nurses of much of the domestic side of their work and thus enable them to devote more time to actual nursing, with the result that the patients will receive better care."
_	Earth was placed around the hull with the result that she became an oak-lined dry dock of by .
_	But Lançarote's raid had driven much of the local population to evacuate the islands and coasts, with the result that Sintra found the fishing settlements deserted.
_	The railway companies were nationalised from 1 January 1948 with the result that their major stake in the Tilling and BET bus companies passed into public ownership from that date.
_	Their "Last Hurrah" concert in the Pavilion in Cork on 28 December 2013 sold out in 14 minutes, with the result that a second concert entitled "The Second Last hurrah" was announced for 27 December 2013.
_	These two stallions, which Williams named Axtel and Allerton, went on the set world trotting records, with the result that Williams' earnings enabled him to publish a racing newspaper titled "The American Trotter", to build a large three-story hotel and opera house called The Gedney, and to construct a figure-eight shaped race track on the west edge of town, on a large section of land called Rush Park, where he also built a magnificent horse barn, his family mansion, and peripheral structures.
_	This proved optimistic, with the result that the half-squadron 5th division maintained its allotted position, but "Marlborough" and the other three ships of the 6th division fell progressively behind.
_	As the sect became more popular, it set up monasteries in what is now Bhutan, with the result that the area became known as Dug Yul, or Land of Thunder, among both Tibetans and Bhutanese.
_	The Football Association secretary, Charles Alcock, wanted to field Morten as goalkeeper in the international match against Scotland in 1872, but injury prevented this, with the result that England played the first international with Robert Barker in goal for the first half, being replaced by William Maynard at some point in the second half.
_	A Cochrane review in 2015 came to the result that there is no evidence identified regarding the effect of pre-conception lifestyle advice on the chance of a live birth outcome.
_	The vessels exchanged fire over a four hours, including more than two hours of intense combat, with the result that both vessels sustained extensive damage to masts, sails, and rigging.
_	BMH and Leyland Motors had expanded and acquired companies throughout the 1950s and 1960s in order to compete with one other, with the result that when the two conglomerates were brought together into BL there was even more internal competition.
_	Brundage and the IOC had considered the potential of television revenue as early as the Melbourne Games of 1956, but had been slow to address the issue, with the result that television rights for the 1960 Games were in the hands of the Rome organizing committee; the IOC received only 5% of the $60,000 rights fee.
_	The Lorentz force then bends the electron trajectories with the result that upward-moving-ev x B electrons congregate at B and downward-moving ones at A.
_	This effect is accentuated as most guitars are tuned based on equal temperament, with the result that minor thirds are narrower, and major thirds wider, than they would be in just intonation.
_	But the method of allocating a value to it is a consequence of the result that Maxwell's equations predict that, in free space, electromagnetic waves move with the speed of light.
_	And the rest of the Jews (also) acted hypocritically along with him, with the result that even Barnabas was carried away by their hypocrisy."
_	However, the sampling of allele frequencies has "still occurred", with the result that σ ≠ 0.
_	Pavithra Srinivasan of Rediff gave it 3 out of 5 stating "Vijay Antony plays it safe mostly, with the result that there's nothing new."
_	As built, the locomotives were not successful, with the result that they were staged for some time while the Mechanical Engineer of the Durban workshops, G. Ramsay, carried out experiments with the blast pipe arrangement.
_	With the result that the migration to Hollywood has been like one of those great race movement of the Middle Ages {3}.
_	But this team trained additional pilots, and these additional pilots brought in other B-17s, with the result that an Instructors School was organized, and after one month’s operations was able to make full use of the 10 B-17’s later assigned to the field.
_	In November the Allies sent their troops into winter quarters with the result that the conquest of the last remaining Swedish strongholds had to wait until the following year.
_	Among the many consequences of this final demarcation of the boundaries of the Alaskan Panhandle was the result that Wales Island now belonged to British Columbia.
_	However, Tadhg mac Diarmaid O Brian rose against O Brian in rebellion, with the result that ""Toirdhealbhach son of Ruaidhrí O Conchobhair came with him to defend the kingship of Munster for him.""!
_	In Europe, as John Ruskin said, and Sir Kenneth Clark confirmed, landscape painting was the "chief artistic creation of the nineteenth century", and "the dominant art", with the result that in the following period people were "apt to assume that the appreciation of natural beauty and the painting of landscape is a normal and enduring part of our spiritual activity"
_	At the Nevada Democratic State Convention in May, Sanders delegates were outraged by changes to and interpretations of rules that resulted in denial of the credentials of almost 60 Sanders backers, with the result that Sanders, instead of edging Clinton out in delegates to the national convention, came in second.
_	The latter prohibits certain terms or conditions outright, with the result that they are void to the extent of non-compliance.
_	This led to the result that non-EU Schengen member states have few formally binding options to influence the shaping and evolution of Schengen rules; their options are effectively reduced to agreeing, or withdrawing from the agreement.
_	A survey conducted by the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics in 2014 came to the result that approximately 43 percent of men did food preparation or cleanup on any given day, compared with approximately 70 percent of women.
_	Sultan Abu Bakar recognised the Ngee Heng Kongsi as a legitimate organisation and made it responsible for law and order among the Chinese in Johor, with the result that it dominated Chinese society as well as the pepper and gambier cultivation in the state.
_	The filaments are tactile, i.e. they suddenly jerk upright when touched, with the result that visiting insects will be showered with pollen.
_	In doing so, the vertices of the two enantiomorphs coincide, with the result that the full compound has two pentagrammic prisms incident on each of its vertices.
_	He follows Thompson's Oz books, thus using her spelling of "Gnome" and her final fate of the character, but he postulates an incident that has removed the Ozites' immortality, with the result that both Ozma and Dorothy have aged and married by the time his story takes place.
_	Attribute set formula_120 is a reduct because eliminating any of these attributes causes a collapse of the equivalence-class structure, with the result that formula_123.
_	The high price of the "SL 2000F / 3003" range meant that it only ever appealed to serious amateurs, with the result that only 15,000 units were sold.
_	On his way he stayed in Leipzig where he performed at the kürfürstliches Hoftheater (prince-elector's court theatre) as Fallbring and as Stepanoff with the result that he was immediately engaged.
_	Many withdrew across the Drina into the German occupied territory of Serbia to avoid being engaged, which severely weakened the Partisan defences with the result that they suffered significant casualties and lost a great deal of territory.
_	While on a visit to London in 1656 Oliver Cromwell prevailed upon him to preach at Whitehall, with the result that Howe, much against his preferences, became one of Cromwell's chaplains.
_	About 1850, Bunsen advised her to try her hand at translating from the Greek, with the result that in 1865 she published a blank-verse translation of the "Trilogy" of Aeschylus, and in 1873 of the whole of his dramas.
_	In the Senate the protectionists again dominated the commission appointed to examine the bill, with the result that their bill resembled the protectionist one drafted by the Chamber's commission.
_	Throughout his career he has cultivated a clean image as an Incorruptible Secular Politician and as a Dedicated Social Worker who is responsible for Major Development works in his constituency, with the result that presently he enjoys a statewide reputation as one of the few first ranking second generation Congress Leaders of Karnataka.
_	The audio players did not always stay concealed, and in many cases came loose and fell on top of the stack of newspapers in plain view, with the result that they were widely mistaken for bombs.
_	In 1973, "Vradyni" published an open letter by former Prime Minister Konstantinos Karamanlis calling for the military regime to restore power to King Constantine, with the result that the Greek judiciary issued warrants for the paper's publisher and editor.
_	The designers in turn granted a license to Mongoose Publishing to produce a new version of the game, with the result that Paranoia XP (), written by Allen Varney, Aaron Allston, Paul Baldowski, Beth Fischi, Dan Curtis Johnson and Greg Costikyan, was published in 2004.
_	Vinache complained of this to Laussat, with the result that Laussat informed Casa Calvo that he was issuing a warrant demanding Burthe’s arrest and return to France.
_	The film achieved considerable success in the English-speaking world, with the result that Schnitzler's play is better known there under its French title.
_	The range is clearly visible from the better-known Aconcagua, the highest mountain in the Americas at , which is 100 km south of Mercedario, with the result that some of the many climbers who frequent Aconcagua move on to this range, although the area is less easy to access.
_	On both sides of this position the Boers' sangars were facing away from the tip, with the result that those occupying them could not assist those on the tip in the case of a frontal attack.
_	However the slow, exploratory nature of traditional analytic therapy meant that these were not always addressed early and assertively, with the result that therapy, while effective, took a long time to produce results.
_	It was therefore shorter and quicker, with the result that much of the trade which had formerly travelled the from Aldersley to Great Haywood Junction now travelled the short distance between Aldersley and Autherley.
_	Due to the synclinal-anticlinal structure of the hills on the left bank of the Rhine which runs from southwest to northeast, these bulges in the northern and central parts of the Wasgau, i.e. in the region of the South Palatine Saddle ("Südpfälzer Sattel") are particularly prominent, with the result that their surface layers were more heavily eroded.
_	At the German guards' obvious disinclination to carry out the command, Hauptmann Springer pushed one of the guards toward an American, with the result that soon all POWs were to line up as ordered.
_	In 264, a coffin which contained the body of Bartholomew washed up on the beach of Lipari, with the result that Bartholomew was immediately elected the patron saint of the Aeolian Islands.
_	However, issues arose with both directional stability and centre of gravity, with the result that the type was delayed entering service.
_	Beginning after World War II, the commercial breeding industry became significantly more important in North America, Europe and Australasia, with the result that a substantial portion of Thoroughbreds are now sold by their breeders, either at public auction or through private sales.
_	We thus obtain the result that the measurement process applied to a statistical ensemble in state "S" yields another ensemble in statistical state:
_	A longitudinal swivel system allowed these two pieces to rotate with respect to each other, with the result that almost without regard to the terrain all four wheels would always be on the ground.
_	So too would rhythm—with the result that Reti's method focuses on relatively abstract 'pitch cells' rather than rhythmically defined 'motifs'.
_	Jews of European background were often treated more favorably than Jews from Middle Eastern and North African countries—housing units reserved for the latter were often re-designated for the former, with the result that Jews newly arrived from Arab lands generally ended up staying in transit camps for longer.
_	However, most of the French crew then fled ashore with the result that "Argo" only captured 19 of them.
_	Frucht is known for Frucht's theorem, the result that every group can be realized as the group of symmetries of an undirected graph, and for the Frucht graph, one of the two smallest cubic graphs without any nontrivial symmetries.
_	Several injuries to the defensive backfield required that the team play more young players than they desired to, with the result that their pass defense fell among the league's worst after having led the NFC the previous season.
_	However IU declined to support the PSOE and abstained in the Presidential vote with the result that Monago became the first PP President of the Regional Government of Extremadura.
_	This was critiqued by K. Aleklett and M. Höök, but their critique has itself been accused of bias towards non-representative depletion rates, with the result that their figures are ill-founded.
_	Biblical inspiration is the doctrine in Christian theology that the authors and editors of the Bible were led or influenced by God with the result that their writings may be designated in some sense the word of God.
_	The scaling by "T", which arises naturally by time-scaling the delta function, has the result that the mean value of "x"("t") is equal to the mean value of the samples, so that the lowpass filter needed will have a DC gain of 1.
_	His round face was dominated by his luxuriant eyebrows, with the result that he was known among the Whigs as 'the Eyebrow.'
_	There is no industry-wide standard form factor for laptops; each major laptop manufacturer pursues its own proprietary design and construction, with the result that laptops are difficult to upgrade and have high repair costs.
_	Censorship was strict because the Japanese suspected that many of foreign journalists were spies", with the result that "Many chafed under the censorship and departed for home."
_	The largest waterjet manufacturer, Flow International (a spinoff of Flow Industries), recognized the benefits of that system and licensed the OMAX software, with the result that the vast majority of waterjet cutting machines worldwide are simple to use, fast, and accurate.
_	Vertical movements of this block have affected both deposition and structure, with the result that many of the Mesozoic rocks underlying the neighbouring Weald are not present, or are very much thinner.
_	A review in 2013 came to the result that oligospermia and azoospermia are significantly associated with being overweight (odds ratio 1.1), obese (odds ratio 1.3) and morbidly obese (odds ratio 2.0), but the cause of this is unknown.
_	She was so close to "Iphigénie" that the explosion knocked down "Iphigénie"s main and mizzen masts and ruptured her sides, with the result that she soon started to founder.
_	The horse went to Aintree in 1996 in very good form, having won the Racing Post Chase and finishing second in the recent Cheltenham Gold Cup with the result that the public made him race favourite at the off.
_	Survey data from 2003 in Romania came to the result that marriage equalized the total fertility rate among both highly educated and low educated people to approximately 1.4.
_	On the other hand, another study came to the result that Romanian women with little education have about equal fertility in marital and cohabiting partnerships.
_	However, the tiring work and hot climate resulted in few of the workers surviving their three years, with the result that constant immigration was necessary for maintaining the workforce.
_	The report states that Shah "brought to bear pressure" on the enquiry process, with the result that Ms. Johri was directed to suspend the enquiry and the enquiry papers were taken away from her "under the guise of scrutiny."
_	His mixture of strong social reforms and steady government proved a powerful election combination, with the result that the Conservatives governed Britain either by themselves or as the leading component of the National Government.
_	His decision had important consequences beyond the college, as other institutions followed suit, with the result that continuity of training was possible and standards were maintained.
_	In this case, we have the result that if two series converge absolutely then their Cauchy product converges absolutely to the inner product of the limits.
_	During the course of development, the theory holds, any one particularly efficient process will benefit other processes, with the result that the processes will end up being correlated with one another.
_	Although she claimed to have been born with an unusual condition that resulted in the swelling of her genitals with the result that she was mistakenly identified as a boy, Charleston author Edward Ball's book "Peninsula of Lies" (2004) states that she was born male.
_	Sensitive to the opinions of local communities, and hoping to avoid powerful censorship boards in the northeast and midwest, "The Hand That Rocks the Cradle" was distributed primarily in the southern and western regions of the United States, with the result that it did not attain the record-breaking attendance set by "Where Are My Children?" the previous year.
_	The venture was an initial success with the result that a Canadian mining company, Amanda Mines Ltd, proposed a merger with Metalliferous Holdings Ltd.
_	The invitations were, however, late in being sent, with the result that only four countries participated, and the competition was called the Little Olympiad.
_	In all, the Admiralty authorised 231 clasps, though in ten cases all potential claimants had died prior to the authorisation of the medal, with the result that those clasps were never issued.
_	Adam disliked having his portrait taken but Tassie was a member of his social circle he did not refuse, with the result that, as with the Naysmyth portrait of Burns, almost all images of Smith derive from the exemplar in the museum.
_	The locomotives were underpowered and proved to be failures in rack service, with the result that their rack mechanisms were removed in 1906 to convert them to ordinary two-cylinder tank locomotives.
_	This meant that they could now chemically process "Bunker oil D"; with the result that it was not longer available for locomotive firing.
_	Elections in the UK could be, and were, influenced by nabob money, with the result that a group of about a dozen Members of Parliament formed a discernible "Arcot interest", as it was called.
_	Only the Bey of Tunis refused to comply, with the result that Blake's fifteen ships attacked the Bey's arsenal at Porto Farina (Ghar el Melh), destroying nine Algerian ships and two shore batteries, the first time in naval warfare that shore batteries had been eliminated without landing men ashore.
_	Due to these internal polarizers, LCD shutter-glasses darken the display image of any LCD, plasma, or projector image source, which has the result that images appear dimmer and contrast is lower than for normal non-3D viewing.
_	The tender of the first locomotive to be converted to Class 25NC at Beaconsfield, no. 3452, was stripped of its condensing equipment, but retained its original fresh water and condensate tanks and feed pumps with the result that the boiler would now be fed with cold water, apparently with none of the ill effects which had been predicted earlier.
_	He thus failed to see or follow the humanitarian mission historically associated with the Republican party, with the result that Negroes both North and South began to drift toward the Democratic party."
_	The third programme eliminated the role of middle men, and it was rumoured that the producer as well as consumers of cotton, rice and wheat had been at the mercy of middle men trading in the milling of these commodities, with the result that producers were deprived of due share and consumer got poor quality and adulterated commodities at much higher prices.
_	Originally, UCI and the organisers of the Grand Tours had been unable to come to terms on the 2006 UCI ProTour, with the result that the status of both the Grand Tours and some of the other races organised by those organisations behind the Grand Tours was unclear until well into the season, but they were eventually included.
_	In the experiment of the title, Doctor Ox introduces a gas into a sedate and conservative Flemish village with the result that everyone and everything becomes speeded up and chaotic.
_	In order to film the battle scenes, Gance asked to return to the front and was re-enlisted into the Section Cinématographique, with the result that he found himself in September 1918 filming in the battle of Saint-Mihiel alongside the United States Army.
_	Some 600 aircraft flown by highly skilled instructors were taken from training facilities and sent east, with the result that some specialized training schools were closed.
_	"With much shouting, these barbarians rapidly surrounded our squadrons, against which they launched thousands of arrows which did very little damage because the Baskirs, being entirely irregulars, do not know how to form up in ranks and they go about in a mob like a flock of sheep, with the result that the riders cannot shoot horizontally without wounding or killing their comrades who are in front of them, but shoot their arrows into the air to describe an arc which will allow them to descend on the enemy.
_	Maureen Shaw, a boat woman who was well known to passing boaters as well as the local and canal community, lived in the Lock Cottage at Wardle lock for many years, with the result that it was often referred to as ‘Maureen’s Lock’.
_	This drastically limited the movement of French troops and military materials across the Mediterranean, with the result that Malta and Corfu were captured and the army in Egypt was steadily reduced in size and effectiveness.
_	A systematic review and meta-analysis of existing randomized controlled trials came to the result that there is no evidence of a beneficial effect of PGP as measured by live birth rate.
_	The suspects arrested by order of the Mainz Commission he was accustomed to examine himself, with the result that in many cases the whole proceedings were quashed, and in not a few the accused dismissed with a present of money.
_	In fact, Wells ultimately had no control over the finished product, with the result that many scenes, although shot, were either truncated or not included in the finished film.
_	An application was made in 1949 by the Southampton and District Motorcycle Club (SDMCC) to the Auto Cycle Union for approval of the circuit for motorcycle racing, with the result that an official Track Inspection took place on New Year's Day 1950.
_	However, the degree of size selectivity is restricted by the hiding effect described by Parker and Klingeman (1982), wherein larger particles protrude from the bed whereas small particles are shielded and hidden by larger particles, with the result that nearly all grain sizes become entrained at nearly the same shear stress.
_	But with the Soviet Union's decline, the Conservatory faced terminal budgetary constraints, with the result that St. John’s instructors soon defected and the students then at the conservatory were dismissed.
_	The experiences of other festival promoters having to fight local government ordinances and prohibitions was not shared by promoter Steve Kapelow and his sponsoring company, Kesi, Inc, with the result that concert preparations were complete upon commencement of the festival.
_	The LNWR reused numbers and names from withdrawn locomotives, with the result that the numbering was completely haphazard.
_	He mentioned to a customer (Charles H. Gibbons, editor of the Victoria "Daily Colonist") that he wrote verses, with the result that six poems by "R.S." on the Boer Wars had appeared in the "Colonist" by July 1900 – including "" that would later appear in his first book.
_	Only very few specimens of skulls of the Jewish race, however, are available with the result that it is impossible to arrive at precise conclusions from examining them.
_	In the period between 1940 and 1988, however, the county – like Colorado generally – took a turn towards supporting the Republican Party, with the result that between 1940 and 2000 the only Democrat to obtain a majority in the county was Lyndon Johnson in 1964.
_	That is, if it is assumed that the aether is at rest within matter in one reference frame, the Galilean transformation gives the result that matter and (entrained) aether travel with the same speed in another frame of reference.
_	Subsequent research reveals that Tony's tampering had actually refined the bomb's explosive potential so that it would not disintegrate everyone within the blast radius, with the result that Tony's actions had actually saved Bruce's life.
_	The pope named him Bishop of Padua, but the Republic of Venice opposed this appointment and sequestered his revenues, with the result that Michiel resigned the see in March 1487.
_	In 1707, the shaykh al-balad, Qasim Iywaz, was the head of one of two Mameluke factions, the Qasimites and the Fiqarites, between whom the seeds of enmity were sown by the pasha of the time, with the result that a fight took place between the factions outside Cairo, lasting eighty days.
_	Nevertheless, antiquated procedures and the escalation of crime continued to generate huge delays in the administration of justice, with the result that as much as half of the prison population in 1986 consisted of accused persons still awaiting trial.
_	Cicero's attacks on Antony were neither forgiven nor forgotten, with the result that he was proscribed and killed in 43 BC.
_	A skirmish ensued with the result that Linois, somewhat inexplicably, withdrew.
_	Several editions, notably the 50th Anniversary Edition, combine all three books into one volume, with the result that pagination varies widely over the various editions.
_	The growth of the Elgin Schools is a direct compliment to the dedicated early pioneers who wanted an educated for their children and pursued that dream with the result that many of their children, grandchildren and great-grandchildren still attend the school system begun by their ancestors.
_	The system was in effect a vertical sliding block such as later used by Krupp in both horizontal and vertical form, with the crucial difference that Armstrong failed to make the progression to loading the powder charge in a metal cartridge, with the result that complete obturation was impossible.
_	In a search of income it ended up booking riskier business, with the result that it was plagued with bad debts.
_	For this we are traveling through space to aid by different modes the planetary beings, but not to impress with the result that you believe in our existence and ‘extraordinary powers’”
_	These infinitesimal generators form the Lie algebra so(3) of the rotation group SO(3), and we obtain the result that the Lie algebra R with cross product is isomorphic to the Lie algebra so(3).
_	An existing bridge to the west connected the store to its massive parking garage, with the result that Pogue's second floor became a crossroads for downtown workers and tourists with a cross-current of shoppers that, especially at lunchtime, revitalized the aging store.
_	From this came the result that James Strong, for example, listed "angels" and "judges" as possible meanings for "elohim" with a plural verb in his "Strong's Concordance," and the same is true of many other 17th-20th century reference works.
_	The whole narrative is an attenuated short story, with the result that parts of it are not especially interesting."
_	"Linstead Market" is a Jamaican folk song of the mento type that tells of a mother who goes to the market with her ackee fruit but does not sell any, with the result that her children will go hungry.
_	For Zola, the interactions of these types of personalities could only have the result that plays out in his plot.
_	He insisted on exclusive contracts for many of his writers and orchestrators working on Broadway shows, with the result that "through the thirties and forties, Dreyfus had a virtual stranglehold on the Broadway musical, with almost all of the most successful songwriters (except Berlin) under contract.
_	In 1413, Erik of Pommern granted Skagen the status of market town with the result that for a time it became Vendsyssel's largest community with up to 2,000 inhabitants.
_	The dispute was resolved at an assembly, the Thing, with the result that Erik was outlawed for three years.
_	Unless and until the issue is addressed, however, it is virtually certain that the annual algae bloom warnings from Alberta Health will continue unabated with the result that it will remain highly inadvisable for humans and animals to enter and use affected areas of the lake.
_	The Series 7 units were delivered with a plain plate type cowcatcher, but the bogies were sometimes interchanged during overhauls with the result that units from different orders often carried cowcatchers not as originally fitted.
_	During the late seventies and 80’s there were concerns that the water levels within the Forest and within neighbouring Warren were falling, with the result that winter flooding was not to the same depth and that dune slack pools were drying out sooner.
_	We use the result that
_	When Ertegun took Spector to meet Bobby Darin, he openly criticized Darin's songwriting, with the result that Darin had him thrown out of the house.
_	Under the Cardinal's insistence, Ammanati incorporated into the design Roman bas-reliefs and statues that were coming to sight with almost every spadeful of earth, with the result that the facades of the Villa Medici, as it now was, became a virtual open-air museum.
_	It is not certain which of the manuscripts was the original, although A. J. Prescott has argued that the Ramsey Benedictional was written by Godeman, using instructions given to him by Æthelwold, to be sent elsewhere; and that Æthelwold was so pleased with the result that he had another copy made for himself.
_	From the early 2000s, the new designations Grosses Gewächs and Erstes Gewächs have become more common, with the result that remaining Spätlese trocken wines rather represents the second-best dry wines.
_	Some critics believe that Shakespeare never intended to write a sequel, and that he was hampered by a lack of remaining historical material with the result that the comic scenes come across as mere "filler".
_	Even during the Great Depression he charged 30 to 60 times what comparable artists were charging, with the result that sales were infrequent.
_	The site conditions soon proved to be very unfavorable to the completed viaduct, with the result that the high main pillars slipped each year by about downstream towards the Plessur River.
_	They not only divided the language of religion from language of modern science, culture and philosophy, but also developed a big difference between the two with the result that conciliation between these two languages becomes difficult.
_	"Unfortunately, Yudkin's views appeal to some commercial interests with the result that this discredited propaganda is periodically rebroadcast to the general public of many countries."
_	This deployment lasted just two days, with the result that Class 218 locomotives were used on the double decker trains and the Class 217s returned to Regensburg.
_	In 1891 he took over from William Henry Charsley as Master of Charsley's Hall, Oxford, with the result that it was renamed Marcon's Hall.
_	The new material, because of its less thick quarry-sizes and tractability, reacted on the workmanship, with the result that the masonry-courses became reduced in size and the carvings more delicate and highly finished.
_	In the worst case, all of the keys will be identical or nearly identical to each other, with the result that there will be little to no advantage to using parallel computing to sort the keys.
_	They rented the houses they left behind or sold them, with the result that many were subdivided into multiple units, making the Ten Broeck Triangle less exclusive than it had been for the previous 50 years.
_	In 2001-2002, Greece moved to a closed ten-digit numbering scheme in two stages, with the result that subscribers' numbers changed twice.
_	Most people, on account of service and convenience, prefer to buy at the neighborhood corner grocery, with the result that in this country there is one grocery store for every 400 people.
_	According to Hunnisett, "during the thirteenth century, no other coroner was allowed to act within the verge, with the result that many felonies were not presented to the justices in eyre after the king's court had moved on...", and Richard Clarke Sewell tells us that "Anciently the Coroner of the Verge had power to do all things within the Verge belonging to the office of the Coroner, to the exclusion of the Coroner of the County, but this clearly caused problems, which two acts were intended to solve."
_	NBC eventually exercised options for six of these stations, with the result that "Three Ring Time" was being carried simultaneously on NBC Blue and Mutual.
_	Whilst Mason's paper anticipated a spending freeze, politicians of the day ignored this recommendation during implementation, with the result that many councils used the transition to the Poll Tax to cover massive spending increases.
_	A small number of underpowered randomized trials came to the result that use of clomifene in addition to gonadotropins results in similar live birth rate but with a reduction in the incidence of ovarian hyperstimulation syndrome.
_	During its initial period of operation, conflicts between the management and the employees frequently rose to very high levels with the result that productivity was initially impaired.
_	These feature a moderately complex system of individual polepiece height adjustment, with the result that the steel components account for part of the pickup's unique tonal characteristics.
_	In April 1948, Mao singled out Kang for praise in his handling of land reform, with the result that
_	Before then, Apple's US distributor, Capitol Records, had manufactured one-sided promo discs, featuring just "Bangla Desh", with the result that the lead side had already received considerable airplay in the build-up to the concerts.
_	Baron argued that in 1990, when the parties entered the Development Agreement, "it would have been plain to Hungry Jack's that if certain events occurred, Burger King could, at its option, terminate the agreement", and that the contract sufficiently identified the circumstances warranting termination of the contract, with the result that "[t]he appendage of a requirement of reasonableness and good faith by the court to the agreement was inconsistent with the bargain freely entered into by the parties."
_	England has never possessed a formal written constitution, with the result that modern administration (and the judicial system) is based on precedent, and is derived from administrative powers granted (usually by the Crown) to older systems, such as that of the shires.
_	The action was settled before trial, with the result that band members were able to recover from EMI Music Canada all of the band members' music publishing rights.
_	However the park's architects, Olmsted and Vaux, had already clashed with Hunt over matters of aesthetics with the result that Hunt's grand scheme of a series of showy Beaux-Arts entrances to the park was reduced to the Seventh Regiment Memorial.
_	This had the result that the only member of the Transitional Government who had been sworn in was President Habyarimana.
_	The Norfolk System, as it is now known, rotates crops so that different crops are planted with the result that different kinds and quantities of nutrients are taken from the soil as the plants grow.
_	The sickly state of her crew meant that she often spent weeks sitting with the result that the voyage took 10 months.
_	It was printed by Richard Hakluyt in the first edition of his "Voyages" in 1589, but was not included in the second edition, with the result that it was 'long overlooked in studies of the period'.
_	The situation became so critical that the Army paid young men to mine saltpeter rather than enlist, with the result that DeSoto Caverns became a saltpeter-mining center.
_	Barrington disclosed the plot to the captain, and the latter, on reaching New South Wales, reported him favourably to the authorities, with the result that in 1792 Barrington obtained a warrant of emancipation (the first issued), becoming subsequently superintendent of convicts and later high constable of Parramatta.
_	"Helmuth" was unable to warn "Pegasus" of "Königsberg"′s approach, with the result that when "Konigsberg" opened fire she took "Pegasus" entirely by surprise.
_	Gordon agreed to the suggestion, and was so pleased with the result that at the end of the session he offered to hire the young man, who became his Master of Ceremonies at the Big Show concerts.
_	Tolfa achieved sudden importance following the discovery there in 1461 of large deposits of alunite, the source of alum, with the result that direct control was assumed, after some confrontations with the Frangipani, by the Camera Apostolica.
_	Psycho was enlisted by Circe to create disturbing dreams for Wonder Woman's close friend, Vanessa Kapatelis, with the result that Wonder Woman would be forced to separate herself from her closest allies.
_	After the defeat of the Engagers the opposing Kirk Party seized control of the government in Scotland, with the result that from this point on more power was held by Presbyterian ministers than by Presbyterian nobles such as the Earl of Argyll.
_	The penalised drivers dropped back through the field as a result of losing time, with the result that after 16 laps completed, the race order was: Hill, Schumacher, Coulthard, Alesi, Berger, Herbert, Irvine, Blundell, Badoer, Katayama, Brundle, Martini, Barrichello, Panis, Frentzen, Boullion, Salo, Montermini (yet to serve his penalty), Gachot, Inoue, Diniz and Morbidelli.
_	Over time these deposits can completely block the oil ways, reducing the cooling with the result that the turbo charger experiences total failure, typically with seized bearings.
_	The Breda fired 12.7x81 mm "Vickers" ammunition — while its cartridges were longer than the 13 x 64 mm rounds of its German rough equivalent, the MG 131, the 81 mm Italian rounds were still shorter than the standard 12.7x99 mm rounds of the American "Ma Deuce"; with the result that the energy at the muzzle was 10,000 joules vs. 16,000.
_	The Romans had for a long time used service in Sicily as a punishment, with the result that the garrison in Sicily contained survivors from many of the greatest Roman military fiascos in the war, such as the Battle of Cannae.
_	The heavily indented, reed fringed shoreline forms a picturesque landscape with the result that the villages near the shore are popular tourist destinations.
_	He "argued that high taxes were often a factor in causing empires to collapse, with the result that lower revenue was collected from high rates."
_	During the Christian era Leon was merged with the Latin cognate Leo, with the result that the two forms are used interchangeably.
_	He also issued numerous appeals, with the result that in 1841, when he resigned his office as convener of the church extension committee, he was able to announce that in seven years upwards of £300,000 had been contributed, and 220 new churches had been built.
_	The Prince of Wales put it about that the king was dying, with the result that George insisted on getting up and attending a social event to disprove the gossip-mongers.
_	Her father was a barrister who spent a considerable amount of time in Africa and the Far East, with the result that Goodbody and her brother were largely brought up by their mother and nanny.
_	In comparison, a German study came to the result that 11% of donors actually asked about the outcome in the clinic where they donated.
_	On 10 April 2013, the Cour de Cassation, the highest civil court in France, refused to quash the decision of the Court of Appeal, with the result that the building itself and the parcel of land on which it stands were confirmed as the property of the Russian Federation.
_	The matter was also discussed in correspondence, with the result that a call was finally made to all writers whose addresses could be obtained, and it appeared in the "Chicago Current" of April 3, 1886:
_	Among the Jinghpaw there are five main clans: the Maran, the Marip, the Nhkum, the Lahpai and the Lahtaw and in other ethnic groups, there are corresponding clans to the Jinghpaw ones, with the result that members of the two clans are seen as Kahpu-Kanau.
_	From the 1970s onwards he taught extensively in many parts of the world and published many books which became best sellers, with the result that his name and teachings became known worldwide.
_	Despite their formal concessions, preparations were stalled by the opposition of the Iberian monarchs, with the result that no expedition was mounted before Cerda's death in 1348.
_	When databases are exported from one of these programs to GEDCOM, these database structures cannot be represented in GEDCOM due to this limitation, with the result that the event or source information including all of the relevant citation reference information must be duplicated each place that it is used.
_	Average age of reading newspaper increase because of this cohort and created the result that newspaper readership is aging.
_	The tools available to designers of log-space reductions have been greatly expanded by the result that L = SL; see SL for a list of some SL-complete problems that can now be used as subroutines in log-space reductions.
_	And he stirred up but too successfully the dying embers of sectarian hate, with the result that the Ulster factions, the Protestant "Peep-of-Day Boys" and the Catholic "Defenders", became embittered with a change of names.
_	The island has undergone extensive erosion with the result that a large crevasse bisects the island in the east-west direction, forming a pair of peaks.
_	On the way "Olympia" encountered 42 continuous days of gales, with the result that the crew was at the pumps for the whole time and the prize crew's water ration was reduced to a half-pint per man per day.
_	A key member in the chain of command had been lying to both management and myself with the result that we all thought we were making a different movie."
_	Many later sources ascribe the fault to the besiegers, with the result that "this siege and bombardment too figure prominently in the lists of Umayyad crimes" (G.R. Hawting), but more reliable accounts attribute the event to a torch borne by one of Ibn al-Zubayr's followers, which the wind wafted onto the building.
_	This enabled electronics manufacturers to build and market more advanced valve (tube) designs at affordable prices, with the result that the 1960s saw the increasing spread of electronic gramophone players, and ultimately the beginnings of "high fidelity".
_	Lake Okeechobee has been artificially maintained at a lower level than prevailed before the 20th century, with the result that much of Cowbone Marsh has been drained and converted to agricultural land.
_	Rivoli Bay is one of four bays on the South Australian coast considered by the Australian government to be a ‘historic bay’ under the "Seas and Submerged Lands Act 1973" and was proclaimed as such in 1987 and again in 2006 with the result that the mouth of the bay is on the territorial seas baseline and the waters within the bay are internal waters as per the definition used in United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea.
_	Large waves of Chinese migration throughout succeeding Chinese dynasties assimilated huge numbers of Yue aborigines, with the result that today's Southern Han Chinese Yue-speaking population is descended from both groups.
_	Syed Firoz Khan, the imperial governor of Guwahati and his army were not prepared for such an eventuality, with the result that the Ahoms gained a series of victories over the enemy.
_	SHOT's data has also focused attention on human errors, with the result that staff training and procedures have been improved.
_	However, during the build-up to the outbreak of the Spanish Civil War, the family fortunes went into a sharp decline, with the result that Álvaro de Laiglesia's upbringing involved several house moves to ever smaller apartments and changes of school.
_	He also said “Christians haven’t got much further than thinking that the whole world was made for us, with the result that animals are only seen in an instrumental way as objects, machines, tools, and commodities, rather than fellow creatures," and it is claimed that he "wants to see animal abusers placed on a register and forbidden from keeping an animal, or working with them."
_	Substituting this into formula_1 gives the result that formula_37 globally, compelling both formula_38 and formula_39 to be zero.
_	With the result that many floor traders and brokers were removed from the trading process.
_	One 1980 study explored the notion of reducing the optimism bias by showing subjects other subjects' outputs from a reasoning task, with the result that their subsequent decision-making was somewhat debiased.
_	He also created a law to allow for the confiscation of the property of anyone who attempted to avoid the suan tax, with the result that he was able to destroy powerful families and landowners by a crafty application of the law.
_	During his time as organist at Arnstadt, Bach was upbraided in 1706 by the Arnstadt Consistory "for having hitherto introduced sundry curious embellishments in the chorales and mingled many strange notes in them, with the result that the congregation has been confused."
_	Furthermore, investigative, clinical, scientific, and academic authors frequently measure, analyze and discuss the effects of both creative visualization and guided imagery collectively and inseparably from the other mind–body interventions with which they are commonly combined, including meditation music or receptive music therapy, relaxation, guided meditation or meditative praxis, and self-reflective diary-keeping or journaling, with the result that it is often difficult to attribute positive or negative outcomes to any one of the specific techniques.
_	By the dawn of the sixteenth century, the care of souls was to many priests and not a few bishops a lost or a never-acquired art, with the result that the laity were ready to throw off what was deemed to be a useless clerical yoke.
_	Carol unconvincingly denied knowing anything about what Tilea was up to in London, but the British warnings to Germany against invading Romania in March 1939 led to the Germans to relax their demands with the result that the latest German–Romanian economic treaty signed on 23 March 1939 was, in the words of Watt, "very vague".
_	There is hardly any objective or correct information on the psychological, sociological and legal aspects of homosexuality in Azerbaijan, with the result that the majority of the society simply does not know what homosexuality is.
_	RMSP gave each of this series a name beginning with "A", with the result that colloquially they were dubbed the "A-series" or "A-liners".
_	Towards the end of the 13th century and until about 1500, the Gothic style became the norm with the result that most of the older Romanesque churches were rebuilt or adapted to the Gothic style.
_	Some blame the authorities, whom, they say, did not attach enough importance to this historical building to protect it, with the result that the construction has been suffering from years of neglect.
_	In this theory, the speed of light in a vacuum is the same for all observers—which has the result that two events that appear simultaneous to one particular observer will not be simultaneous to another observer if the observers are moving with respect to one another.
_	In the 1963 Five Nations match against Scotland, in wet and muddy conditions, Rowlands decided to kick for touch as many times as possible, with the result that there were 111 line-outs in the match and Wales outside-half David Watkins only touched the ball five times.
_	The court held that for an act to be a criminal attempt, it must be so near the result that the danger of its success must be very large.
_	The dolphin is a voluntary breather, even during sleep, with the result that veterinary anaesthesia of dolphins would result in asphyxiation.
